BOOK I.
BOYHOOD.
Childe Harold
was he hight:but whence his name
And lineage long, it suits me not to say;
Suffice it, that perchance they were of fame,
And had been glorious in another day:
But one sad losel soils a name for aye,
However mighty in the olden time;
Nor all that heralds rake from coffin'd clay,
Nor florid prose, nor honied lines of rhyme,
Can blazon evil deeds, or consecrate a crime.
*  *  *  *
Oh, Love! what is it in this world of ours
Which makes it fatal to be loved!
*  *  *  *
The Childe departed from his father's halls.
Byron
.
LAFITTE:
THE PIRATE OF THE GULF.
BOOK I.
CHAPTER I.
Fame sometimes gives her votaries visions of their future destiny,
while yet in early life. There is then a sort of sympathy created
between
their youthful aspirations and coming deedsa reflection of the
future upon the present.
Edgworth
.
AN EXILE'S HOMERIVER SCENERYAMBITIOUS MUSINGS.
In
a secluded and richly-wooded amphitheatre,
formed by a crescent of green-clad hills, among
which the romantic Kennebeck wanders to the
ocean, there stood, until within a recent period, the
ruins of a stately mansion. Its blackened walls
were enamelled with dark-green velvet moss, and
mantled with creeping vines, as if Nature, with a
gentle hand, had striven to conceal the devastations
of ruthless Time.
Huge chimneys, terminating in fantastic turrets,
heavy cornices, deep mouldings and panel-work,
combined with the costly and elaborate architecture
of the whole venerable structure, indicated a relic
of that substantial age immediately subsequent to
the revolutionary war:an age, although then in
its decline, as eminently characterised by moral
and physical stability as the present by their
opposites
.
That, was an age of ironthis, of tinsel.
At the period with which our tale is more
intimately
connected, the handsome edifice of which
these melancholy ruins were both the monument
and mausoleum, reared its lofty walls amid a grove
of oaks, whose hoary bodies, and the majestic
spread of their gnarled and giant limbs, while they
told of their great agenumbered by centuries, not
yearsbore testimony to the dignity and grandeur
of the primeval forest, of which they were alone
the representatives. Here and there, among these
sylvan patriarchs, glistened the silvery trunk of the
classic beech, intermingled with the dark cone of
the gloomy pine, and the tall, spiral poplar, swaying
its graceful head in the breeze.
Beneath the thickly interlaced branches of these
trees, and sloping gently to the pebbly shore of the
river, lay, out-rolled, a lawn of the thickest verdure.
Its green and quiet beauty was relieved and
enlivened
by half a score of ruminating,
well-conditioned
cows, standing or reclining in those luxurious
attitudes indicative of comfort and repose, and a
small flock of long-fleeced sheep, of a rare and
valued breed, was dispersed in picturesque groups
under
the more venerable trees. A gracefully formed
jennet, conjuring up visions of lovely woman, in
velvet hat, nodding plumes and generous robes
sweeping the earth, which the spirited animal
beneath
her disdains with his delicate hoofsa
beautiful
,
slender-limbed saddle-horseand a brace of
coal black ponies, with long tails and flowing
manes, which are at once associated with boys and
holidaysstood together in a social group beside a
small but romantic lake in the midst of the wood.
They were mutually reclining their heads upon
one another's necks, each manifesting his sportive
Vol. I.2
feelings, by occasionally fixing his large white teeth
into the glossy hide of his neighbour.
This pellucid sheet of water was spanned by a
fantastic bridge of tressel-work, suspended with the
lightness of a spider's web, from one green bank to
the other. It connected a broad gravelled avenue,
which, commencing at the river, wound among the
trees, yielding to the natural undulations of the
grounds, and terminated at a spacious flight of steps
leading to the piazza of the mansion, the two fronts
of which were ornamented by a light colonnade of
eight slender Ionic columns. Tall windowshung
with rich curtains of orange-coloured damask and
snowy muslin, costly with deep broideries of oak
leaves, large as the life, and curiously wrought with
silken floss, in their autumn hues of green and
yellowextended quite to the floor of the piazza,
and, defended by venetian blinds, served as the only
entrances to the interior, from the front.
The house faced to the west, and commanded an
extensive prospect of the river, sweeping boldly
around the peninsula upon which it was situated,
and forming at the distance of half a mile, and
directly
in front, a noble bend, remarkable for the
extreme beauty of its curvature. Beyond,
ascending
to the horizon, as they retreated from the eye,
spread cultivated farms, studded with low, black,
farm-houses and huge barns; more remotely, dense
black forests blended with the bases of a chain of
low, blue mountains, known as the Monmouth hills,
which, while they confined the prospect, constituted
a magnificent back-ground to the picture.
At the north and south, the view was shut in by
alternately cultivated or thickly-wooded hills and
rocky eminences, retreating on either hand from the
river in a semicircular from, to a little less than a
mile in the rear, and enclosing the dwelling and
grounds in a spacious vale or glen, which, also
embraced on the western side by the curve of the
river, presented an area nearly circular in its shape.
Political events in sunny France,that great
political index of this revolutionizing agein which
the proprietor of this lovely domain bore no ordinary
share, compelled him to seek a land where he could
cherish his liberal principles with safety, and
educate
his twin-sons to act their part honourably and
with distinction on the theatre of life. And where
should the expatriated old soldier bend his footsteps
but to the shores of America? Daughter of
Europe
!
Yet she opens her arms to receive her
exiled children, with the affection of a young
mother
.
Noble and glorious land! the errors of the
old world shall be redeemed in theeand, although
the continents of the east have been enrolled,
century
after century, upon the scroll of history, yet
their history is endedthine only begun; and dark
and guilty as are ITS pages, shall THINE be bright
and pure!
Orphans from their birth, his sons never knew
their mother. The hour which ushered them into
existence ushered her spirit into heaven. Strangers
to maternal love, and educated, since the exile of
their stern parent, in almost monastic seclusion,
they early attained an uncommon maturity of mind
and firmness of character, combined with manly
sentiments and a habit of thinking independently,
early taught them by their father's example, and
inculcated, cultivated, and wrought out to maturity
by him, with untiring assiduity.
Their fifteenth birth-day arrived, and although
in yearsthey numbered equally, both in mind, and
person, and habits, they were wholly dissimilar.
Achille, the eldest of the twins, had attained
dignity
of mind and manly beauty of person, far in
advance of his years. Tall and finely proportioned,
he was the youthful image of his noble father.
Proud, aspiring and ambitious, with a spirit that
spurned severity, but yielded to gentleness, he acted
from impulse rather than from reflection or a sense
of duty, while a mine of passions, never yet sprung,
existed like a slumbering volcano in his bosom. It
required but a spark to produce a conflagration that
should feed upon and torture him like another
Prometheus, or burn on, extinguishable only with
life.
That spark was at length elicited by his brother,
an amiable boy of a gentler nature, retiring in his
habits, mild and quiet in disposition. The reverse
of Achille, he was apparently as meek as his brother
was spirited. The former resembled his father; but
Henri represented his mother and all her gentler
virtues. Not only did he represent the excellences
of her heart and mind, but her lovely image was
revived in his beautiful countenance; and, as year
after year unfolded in his youthful face the more
striking and perfect resemblance his graceful
features
bore to those of his deceased mother, the father
recognized the features of the fair girl who had won
his early affections, and whom, during the few
short months he had owned her as a bride, he
had worshipped with religious devotion.
Notwithstanding the contrarieties of character
exhibited by the brothers, they grew up together,
mutually interchanging all those amiable
kindnesses
which are the offspring of fraternal affection.
Achille was the stronger, physically and
intellectually
,
and unconsciously to the subject, exerted that
wonderful influence over Henri which mind often
asserts over mind. He was his guide in his
studies, his leader in sports, his enticer into dangers,
and his assistant in the thousand petty difficulties
of childhood. He loved him with a sincere and
devoted attachment, fervently reciprocated by his
warm-hearted and unsophisticated brother. But
their mutual affection was the principle which
unites the vine and the oak. His brother's love
was to Henri sufficient happiness, the stay of his
clinging affections; and on the other hand, his
kind and endearing attachment, by drawing out
the kindlier feelings of his brother's sterner nature,
rendered him better and happier.
The morning which ushered in their fifteenth
birth-day was bright and cloudlessa more
beautiful
never dawned upon the earth. Could the
tempter have chosen such a day to enter paradise?
Yet on this day his presence was first felt in their
peaceful home.
Achille was standing in the south window of his
father's library, which opened upon the piazza, his
person half-concealed by the rich drapery, gazing
out upon the limpid river as it glided silently past,
bearing upon its waveless bosom the single-masted
sloop with its huge mainsail, the more graceful and
bird-like schooner, her white canvass extended on
either side like wings, the lofty, square-rigged
merchantman
,
and swan-like sail-boat; their sails
flashing
back the morning sun, or changing to a dark
hue as they moved in the black shadows thrown
from overhanging cliffs.
The green meadows beyond the river, sprinkled
with flocks, faded into the blue haze which floated
around the distant hills. The air was alive with
melody from a myriad of glad birds, climbing the
rosy skies, and emulating the poised lark thrilling
forth his matin-song to the rising sun. There was
a charm of beauty, peace and rural happiness
thrown over nature. Her works breathed
inspiration
,
and spoke that morning in the sweetest accents
to his heart. But he heeded not her language. A
voice, softer-toned and more eloquent pleaded to his
soul. It was the voice of ambition. Of boyish
ambition it is true, but still ambition in her loftiest
2*
mood. In years but a boy, the sterner spirit of a
man dwelt in the swelling bosom of the youthful
aspirant. Visions of the unveiled future, wherein
appeared pageants of conquering armies, thrones,
and scenes of vast dominion flcated before his
youthful
imagination; and in the leader of the armies,
the occupant of the thrones, the controller of
empires
,
he recognized HIMSELF!
CHAPTER II.
The love or hatred of brothers and sisters, is more intense than the
love or hatred existing between any other persons of the same sexes.
Probably, nothing so frequently causes divisions between those whom
nature has blessed with the holy relationship of brother and sister,
perhaps that it may be the depository of pure affection, as an unequal
distribution of the affection of parents.
H.
More
.
AN INTERVIEW BETWEEN FATHER AND SONA CATASTROPHE
REMORSE
.
Achille
!
The young aspirant started from the
contemplation
of scenes of triumph and empire, carnage
and bloodthe last too soon to be realizedand
beheld
his father standing by his side, who had entered
the library and approached him unperceived.
Seating
himself in the recess of the window he motioned
his son to a chair, placed opposite to his own. The
bearing of the veteran exile, was at all times in the
highest degree dignified and imposing. His was
the brow, eye, and presence to command respect
and receive homage.
The affection of Achille towards his father was
not unmingled with sentiments of fear. But he
was the only being before whom the proud eye of
the boy quailed!
That his father loved him he had never doubted.
He knew that he was proud of him, his noble,
fearless boy, as he would term him, while parting
the dark clustering locks from his handsome
forehead
,
after he had performed some daring feat of
boyhood. But when he spoke to Henri, the
gratified
and proud expression of his eye softened under
the influence of a milder feeling, and his smile
would fade into a sweet but melancholy expression;
nor would Achille have exchanged his inspiring
language to him, his daring boy! for the kind
tone, and manner he involuntarily assumed when
he would say, Henri, my beloved child, come and
amuse me with your prattle!nor would the tearful
eye, as he gazed down into the upturned face of the
amiable boy, have pleased his wild spirit like the
enkindling
glance of that admiring eye, when turned
upon him in paternal pride. Achille translated his
glance of pride into an expression of love, and
sympathized
with one so evidently regarded with an air of
sorrow, if not pity, as his brother. If he gave the
subject
a moment's reflection it resulted in the flattering
conviction that he himself was the favourite son.
But on the morning which introduces him to our
notice, he had to learn too painfully, that Henri
was the favourite child of the old soldier's affection,
and that so far from loving him but a little less, he
loved him
not
. That look of affection which he had
translated as an expression of compassion for the
gentler nature of his brother, he had to learn was
an expression of the intensest parental affection.
In his brother, his father worshiped the image of his
departed wife, and all his affection for her, which
the cold hand of death had withered in its beauty
and bloom, was renewed in his beloved Henri. He
was doubly lovedfor his mother and for himself
and there remained for Achille, so the sensitive and
high spirited boy learned that day,no place in the
affections of his sole surviving parent.
His father being seated, addressed him:
Achille, you are now of an age to enter the
university
,
for admission to which the nature and
extent
of your studies eminently qualify you. In a
few days the annual examination of candidates will
take place, and in the interval you can select and
arrange a library for your room, and collect what
other conveniences you may require. You will
leave in the first packet that passes down the river.
This was a delightful announcement to the subject
of it, and not wholly unexpected. To the
university
,
that world in miniature, he had long looked
forward with pleasurable anticipations. It was a
field of action, at least, and he panted to enter
upon
it.
The two brothers had both prepared for admission
into the same class, and he inquired if Henri was
to accompany him.
He is not, replied the father, coldly and firmly.
He is certainly prepared, sir!
Undoubtedly! But I have decided that he is
to be my companion to Europe this season, as I fear
his delicate constitution will not admit of his
confining
himself at present to sedentary pursuits.
I was anticipating that happiness for myself,
replied Achille, chagrined at his father's preference
for his brother, so unexpectedly manifested, not only
by the words he uttered but by his tone and
manner
.
He had long known his intention to visit
his native land, and expected to accompany him,
although his expectations were founded rather
on his own wishes than any encouragement he had
received from his parent.
Now that he learned his intention of taking Henri,
instead of himself, he felt keenly the preference;
and the coldness, if not severity, of manner he
assumed in communicating his determination,
offended
his pride, whilst his decided partiality for his
brother wounded his self-love. The old soldier
was a man of few words, and his son was well
aware, that, his resolution once formed, he was
unbending
.
He knew that his brother was to go, and
and that he was to remain; and with a bitter and
wounded spirit he turned his darkening brow from
the penetrating gaze of his father, and looked forth
upon the beautiful scene which lay out-spread
beneath
the windows of the library.
A closing door roused him from his gloomy and
sinful reverie, and turning, he found himself once
more alone! Nonot quite alone! An evil spirit
Jealousy! pregnant with dark thoughts and evil
imaginings
was his companion. A long hour passed
away, during which, his first fierce conflict with his
hitherto slumbering passions took place. The first
suspicion that his brother was best loved, then
entered
his thoughts. Once admitted, it underminded,
by its subtle logic, the better feelings of his heart.
Doubts were strengthened to confirmations,
suspicions
magnified to certainties, in the rapid and
prejudiced retrospect he took of his father's
bearing
towards his brother and himself, from the
earliest
period of his recollection.
But an hourone short, but momentous hour,
for then was fixed the lever which moved the world
of passions within him, with all their evil
consequences
,
had expired, and the canker-worm of
hatred with its venemous fangs, was gnawing at the
last slender fibre that bound him to his brother, when
the hall door was thrown open and the unsuspecting
and innocent subject of his dark meditations
bounded
into the room, holding in his extended hand a
gemmed locket.
See brother, see! he exclaimed, in a loud and
delighted tone, see what my dear father has
presented
me as a birth-day's gift!
Achille raised his eyes and fixed them upon
the sparkling locket which enclosed the miniature of
an exceedingly beautiful female, with a form, cheek,
and eye, radiant with feminine loveliness.
He recognized the portrait of their mother, which
till that moment had ever been worn, as the holy
pilgrim wears the sacred cross, next to the heart of
his father. So dearly treasured had that sacred
memento
of his departed wife ever been, that he
never was permitted to remove it from the
mourning
ribbon by which it was dependant from his
neck. Now, he saw the cherished relic in the
possession of his brother, a gift from him. His
lip curled, and his dark eye became darker still at
this stronger confirmation of his father's partiality,
yet he neither spoke nor betrayed his feelings by any
visible emotion; but the fires within his breast raged
deeper still. Like pent up flames, his passions
gained
vigour by the very efforts made to smother them.
For the first time in his life he looked upon Henri
coldly, and without a smile of tenderness. He felt
indeed, although his lips moved not with the biting
words that rose to them, that the poison of his heart
must have been communicated to his eyes, for, as
his brother caught their unwonted expression, he
suddenly checked himself, and the gay tones of his
voice sunk subdued to a strange whisper, as he
faintly inquired, at the same time placing his
delicate
hand upon his shoulder, if he were ill?
No!
he replied, with an involuntary sternness
that startled even himself.
The next moment he would have given worlds
to recall that fatal monosyllable, and pronounce it
over again, more gently; but it was too late. The
sensitive boy recoiled as though he had encountered
the eye of a basilisk; his forehead changed to a
deadly hue, the blood fled from his cheeks, and he
seemed about to sink upon the floor; but, suddenly
recovering himself, he laughed, and the rich blood
came back again, and his eye glanced brightly as
he exclaimed, but half-assured,
Brother, you did but try to frighten meyou
were not in earnest angry with me?
His heart melted for a moment at this affectionate
appeal, but with a strange perverseness he steeled it
to insensibility.
Leave me to myself, he roughly replied, I
am not in the humour to be trifled with.
Mysterious inconsistency of will and action! He
would have given his right hand or plucked out his
right eye, to have recalled the first angry word he
uttered. In his own mind he did not will to speak
thus harshly; yet, by a singular yet frequent
anomaly
,
his words and manner were directly in
opposition
to his will. The first word spoken in an
angry mood, hewed out a broad pathway for
legions
.
As he uttered his last words, the tears gushed
into Henri's eyes, and yielding to the influence of
affection, he sprung forward and threw himself into
his elder and beloved brother's arms, wept aloud,
and sobbed out amidst his tears,
Brother! Achille! wherein has Henri offended
you?
An evil spirit now seemed indeed to have taken
possession of him. With angry violence he thrust
Henri from his embrace, while a curse sprung
to his lips. The poor youth tottered and reeled
fell forward, striking his forehead as he fell, violently
against a marble pedestal upon which stood an
alabaster
statue of the Madonna, and the warm blood
spouted from his gashed temples over the cold, white
robes of the image.
It was a spectacle of horror! and the guilty being
gazed wildly upon his prostrate brother, and thought
of Abel and his murdererupon the red-sprinkled
image, and laughed, Ha! ha! ha! as maniacs
laugh, at the fitness of his first offeringa mangled
brotherat the shrine of the virgin moher.
The momentary but terrific spell upon his reason
passed away; and throwing himself upon the
senseless
boy, he attempted to stop the ebbing current of
life as it trickled in a small red stream down his pale
forehead, steeping his auburn curls in gore,
at the same time, calling loudly and madly for
assistance.
His father followed by the servants rushed into
the library.
Help sir, my brother is dying! he cried wildly.
The old man sprang forward and caught his
bleeding child in his arms. His practised eye at
once comprehended the extent of the injury he had
sustained. He had received a deep cut in the shape
of a crescent over the left eyebrow, yet not severe
enough to endanger life. The free flow of the blood
soon restored him to his senses, and opening his eyes,
as his father with a tender hand staunched the
bubbling blood, he fixed them upon his brother with
an expression that eloquently spoke forgiveness.
God pity me! exclaimed the repentant and
now broken-spirited boy; for that look went to his
heart; and burying his face in his hands, he
precipitately
left the room.
The long and bitter hours of grief, remorse and
shame, he suffered in the solitude of his own room,
no tongue, but his who has felt like him, can utter.
He experienced sentiments of hatred for himself, a
loathing and detestation that tempted him to put a
period at once to his own existence. When he
recalled
the reproving yet forgiving look of his
suffering
and magnanimous brother, he felt degraded in
his own eyes, fallen, lowly fallen in his own
self-esteem
.
That he must be in his brother's he was
painfully aware, and for the first time he felt that
the gentle-natured Henri was his superior.
VOL. I.3
CHAPTER III.
Place the lever of Archimedes in the hands of love, and he will
find the point on which to rest it. Perhaps love has caused more evil
than ambition. Let us search from the cot of the humblest villager to
the tent of Mark Antony, and we shall find it has been the pivot upon
which some of the most affecting domestic, and many of the greatest
historical, events have turned. Doubtless, that love which is elicited
at the first sight of the object, is the most legitimate, the purest, and
the most enduring.
Anonymous
.
A STUDENTTHE RETURNGERTRUDE LANGUEVILLELOVE.
Day
closed in night, and night opened into
morning
,
for many long and tedious weeks, and still
the old soldier sat by the bed-side of his wounded
child.
The generous boy, too honourable to prevaricate,
yet too forgiving and fond of his brother to expose
all the truth, had told him that he had
fallen
against the pedestal, but not that Achille had
thrust
him against it.
Their father never knew the agency of Achille in
the accident; yet, bearing testimony to the truth of
the maxim, that suspicion is the handmaiden of
guilt, Achille suspected that he was informed of all
the circumstances connected with the act. This
suspicion, giving its own tinge to the medium through
which he viewed and commented upon his father's
deportment towards him after the accident, led him
to conclusions as unjust as they were unmerited by
his parent. Acting from these conclusions he
shunned
his society, and never entered his presence but
with a sullen air of defiance.
Occasionally he visited the chamber of his brother,
when, in answer to his frequent inquiries of the
nurse, he learned that he slept; and pressing the
fevered hand, or kissing the cheek of the sleeping
sufferer, he would watch over him with the
tenderness
of a mother till the restless motions of the
invalid
,
indicating the termination of his slumbers, or
the heavy footsteps of his father ascending the
stainway
in the hall, warned him to return to the
seclusion
of his own room, or the deeper solitudes of the
forests.
A few months passed away, during which Achille
became a student within the walls of a university
not far from his paternal home; while his brother,
entirely recovered, accompanied his parent on his
transatlantic voyage.
The period of Achille's residence at the university
afforded no incidents which exerted any influence
over his subsequent years. It glided away
pleasantly
and rapidly. He was known by the
professors
as one, who, never in his study, or a consumer
of midnight oil, yet always prepared for the recitation
room; and by his fellows, as a young man of violent
passions, honourable feelings, chivalrous in points of
honour, a warm friend and magnanimous enemy.
Often violent and headstrong in his actions, he was
just and equitable in his intercourse with those around
him. With a love for hilarity and Tuscan
pleasures
,
he never descended to mingle in the low
debauches
and nightly sallies, which, from time
immememorial
have characterized the varieties of college
life.
At the early age of nineteen, he received its
honours
,
and bidding adieu to the classic walls within
which he had passed so many happy hoursthe
happiest of his lifehe proceeded to an adjacent
port where he expected his father to disembark, on
his return from his long residence abroad.
The little green coasting packetin that early
day, when steam navigation had not superseded
those teachers of patience to domestic voyagers,
the sloop and schoonerhad passed up the river
the previous evening. He crossed to the opposite
shore, in a broad flat wherry, whose
representative
,
in the shape of a neatly painted horse-boat,
propelled by the Ixion-like labour of a blind
Rosinante
,
may still be seen plying frequently between
the opposite shores.
The sun had just set in a sea of gold and
crimson
,
and a rich mellow light hung like a veil of
transparent gauze over land and water, when,
after
winding round one of the graceful bends of
the romantic Kennebec, and ascending an abrupt
and rocky eminence, up which the road wound,
the beautiful and wooded glen, with the turretted
chimnies of his paternal roof appeared, lifting
themselves above the oaks, in the midst of which
it stood. Reining in his horse upon the brow of
the hill, he gazed down upon the lovely scene, with
its sweeping river, relieved by a little vessel at
anchor
upon its black glassy floodits surrounding
hills, its venerable oaks, and serpentine walks
with a thoughtful eye.
Gradually as he gazed, the scene before him
faded
into indistinctness, in the approaching twilight,
and the young moon had launched her silver
barque upon the western skya timid sailor,
venturing
each night, farther and farther up into the
heavens, and spreading her shining sail broader
and broader as she gains confidence from temerity
before the young horseman shook of the spell
which had rendered him indifferent to external
objects
a
spell, whose workings, to judge from the
knitted brow, compressed lips, and pale cheeks,
were of no pleasant nature. We will not attempt
to analyze his thoughts,he dared not do it
himself
nor
will we. Spurring his restless horse
down the precipice before him, as he perceived the
shades of night thickly gathering. he soon gained
the winding avenue leading to his paternal
dwelling.
Nearly four years had elapsed, and its halls had
echoed to the fall of no familiar footstep. During
that period, he had never visited it but once, when
scenes and events he would fain forget, were too
vividly revived, and he shunned a second time to
recall such unwelcome associations.
Now, as he rode forward the retrospection of the
past was clouded by a reminiscence that weighed
depressingly upon his spirits. Entering the
bridle-path
which led to the dwelling, he slackened his
rein and moved slowly onward, musing upon the
approaching interview with his long absent parent
and brother, when the sudden glare of a light
flashed from one of the windows of the library full
upon his face, and roused him from his
meditations
.
Dismounting at the spacious gateway, he
traversed
the broad gravelled walk to the house, with a
rapid step, anxious to hasten the meeting, which
his heart foreboded, would be tinged with both
pleasure
and pain. He had placed his foot upon the
first step, to ascend to the portico, when the
apparition
of a graceful female figure, gliding past the
brightly-illumined window, stayed his ascent, while
emotions of surprise and curiosity usurped for the
moment every other feeling.
Who can she be? was his mental
interrogation
as her retreating figure disappeared. But
he had no time for conjectures, for the old
grey-headed
gardener Phillipe, who had followed his
3*
exiled master, through all his fortunes, recognized
him as he was taking his evening round about the
grounds, and by a loud exclamation of joy,
intimated
his arrival to the whole household. The next
moment he stood in the presence of his father and
brother!
We will briefly pass over the interview between
them. By the former, his reception was dignified
and condescending; yet there was absence of
affection
in his manner as he received his
congratulations
,
imperceptible to an ordinary observer, but to
which the lively feelings of the young man, were
keenly sensitivea cold politeness in his look and
tone, such as a father should not wear to greet a
long absent son. And such was the proud spirit of
Achille, that he assumed a bearing of
hauteur
and distant respect, which measured his parent's
coldness.
Henri, whose slight form and girlish beauty
were lost in a manlier elegance of person, met him
as brother should meet brotherfrankly,
affectionately
,
and ardently. Achille returned his
embrace
as cordially and sincerely as it was bestowed;
but a cold chill curdled the blood in his veins, as
unfolding him from his arms, the purple scar
glaring
,
half-hid by his flowing hair, upon his beautiful
forehead, caught his eye.
Days and weeks glided by, and Achille loved!
M. Langueville, a distinguished Frenchman, his
maternal uncle, and the only brother of his mother,
had married an American lady of eminent beauty,
and princely fortune. They both died within a
short period of each other, leaving an only
daughter
,
appointing his father the guardian both of her
person and inheritance. To receive this trust, was
the object of his visit to Europe; and on his return,
his ward accompanied him to make her uncle's
mansion her future home.
The lovely vision of the library was this cousin.
Gertrude Langueville, at the period of our tale, was
a noble creature, with a form of faultless symmetry,
voluptuously rounded, and just developing into
woman-hood
a
rich bud bursting into a full-blown
rose.
Neither too tall, nor too short, her figure was of
that indefinite size, which a graceful poet has
termed
beautifully less. In her manner she
combined
the dignity of a woman with the naturalness
and infantile grace of a wayward child. The
infinite
delicacy of her chiselled features, and the
finely
turned contour of her expressive head, were
unsurpassed
.
Just turned sixteen, she knew the power to charm,
while she seemed not to use it, as, with the
bewitching
grace of a girl and the refinement of a woman,
she enchained the admiration of those around her,
while they bent forward to listen to the rich, harp-like
tones of her voice in conversation. Her eyes were
of the mildest blue of heaventhe indices of a
pure and faultless mind. They spoke of a spirit
mild and gentle; yet her lofty forehead told that also
a spirit proud and high, slumbered within their
gentle
radiance. Intellectual, she was both romantic
and imaginative. Few of her sex were gifted
with a mind of higher order, or more accurately
cultivated.
Obedient to the waywardness and contrarieties
of her character, she was at one moment a Hebe,
charming by her grace and vivacity, heightened by
the sparking expression of her eloquent eyes and
beaming face, upon which every thought brilliantly
played, like the reflection of sunny landscapes upon
a shadowed lake, mantling it with a richer beauty
or, now a Minerva, commanding admiration and
esteem
by her originality of thought, and the lofty
character of her mind.
Achille admiredlovedworshipped her!
We will not linger over the recital of his first
meeting with this charming girl, and the wild
impassioned
progress of his love. With the
impetuosity
of a mountain torrent, it merged every
passion
in itself, absorbing all the faculties of his soul.
His love was unrequited.
CHAPTER IV.
Your true lover is a monopolizer. He must himself receive all
favours and do all favours. He can bear no participator. He will
sooner forgive acts of indignity against himself, than the man who steps
between him and his mistress danger. If he cannot aid her himself,
he would rather lose her than that another should boast of the honour.
If I wished to make him my enemy, I would save his mistress' life.
Brown
.
A MORNING EXCURSIONSCENE ON THE ICEAN ESCAPE
LOVE AND JEALOUSY.
Spring
was just opening in that enlivening and
rapid manner peculiar to northern latitudes, when
Achille and his brother accompanied their cousin
on a morning excursion along the beautiful shores
of the river. The earth was clothed with the
mantle
of green and grey, which young spring loves to
throw around her, and the morning was bright and
warm for the season, as if June had usurped the
wand of rude and blustering March.
They had reined in their horses on the verge of
a lofty cliff overhanging the river, and remained
gazing upon its icy surface, which, as far as the eye
could reach, north and south, presented one vast
plain of chrystal. The lateness of the season
rendered
it imprudent to venture upon it, although,
except in its soft, white appearance, under the warm
sun, it presented no indication of weakness.
Gertrude
,
excited by the gay canter along the cliff, and
in unusually high spirits, proposed galloping across
the river, which, during the winter they had
frequently
done, and ascend a hill on the opposite
side, from whose summit there was an extensive
prospect she had repeatedly admired.
By no means, Gertrude, exclaimed Achille,
it would be rashness to attempt it.
I think not, cousin, she replied, with that love
of opposition which is the prescriptive right of the
sex. It is evidently very firm; only three days
ago, I saw several horsemen passing down the river
at a hand gallop.
But you forget the warmth of the sun,
Gertrude
!
Not enough to affect this solid mass before us,
she replied, at all events, I can but try it.
So, slightly shaking her bridle, she cantered down
the smooth road to the foot of the cliff, rapidly
followed
by the brothers.
Do not venture upon the ice, cousin Gertrude,
I beseech, mildly remonstrated Achille, when they
gained the beach, you will certainly endanger
your life!
How very pathetic and careful, cousin of
mine, she replied, with a playful, yet half-vexing
air; if you really think there is so much danger,
we will excuse your attendance. I am fearless as
to the result, and quite confident that the ice will
bear Lon and me. See, now, added she, as her
beautiful jennet bounded forward on hearing his
name,  `Lon is more obedient to fayre ladies'
commands
than their sworn esquires;'  and her fine
eyes glanced mischievously as she spoke.
This badinage touched Achille, who was
sensitively
alive to ridicule, especially from the lips of
the lady of his love. Biting his lip to suppress his
feelings, he calmly observed, I regard not myself,
Gertrude, it is for you I speak. If you are resolved
to go, I shall certainly accompany you, although
the greater the weight, the more imminent will be
the danger.
So will Henri, will you not, Henri? she said,
half-assuredly, half-inquiringly; and a sweet
smile, such as maidens love to bestow on their
favoured
swains, dwelt, while she spoke, upon her
pretty lips, and mantled her cheeks, with a scarcely
perceptible shade of crimson.
Henri, who had remained silent during this brief
colloquy, though always close to his cousin's rein,
replied.
Certainly, Gertrude, although I think with
brother
,
that there is a spice of temerity in the attempt.
Allow me to dis
Allons
then, she gaily cried, placing her
gloved finger upon her cousin's mouth, and
exciting
the spirited animal upon which she was
mounted to spring forward on to the crumbling
verge of the ice.
Achille buried his spurs in the sides of his horse,
and, in one bound, was the next moment at the
head of her palfrey and dismountedwith the rein
in his grasp.
For God's sake, Gertrude, stop! you must not
venture so rashly, he cried, with energy, do not
go, I beg of you!
Loose my rein, Achille, and don't be so earnest
about a mere trifle, she said, hastily.
Nay, cousin, said Achille, in a softer tone, the
life of Gertrude can be
Now don't be sentimental, cousin Achille; she
laughingly interrupted, do be just good enough to
free Lon's head. See how impatient he is.
Do, cousin, allow me to plead!
No, no, you know how I hate pleading; and,
without replying further, she dexterously extricated
her bridle from his grasp, touched her impatient
horse smartly with the whip, and gaily crying,
Sauve qui peut
, sprung forward like an arrow.
Achille! your horse! exclaimed Henri. Mad
girl, she is lost! he added, and spurring after her,
was in an instant galloping by her side. Achille
turned on the instant to vault into his saddle, and
beheld his horse, which he had left unsecured on
dismounting, coursing, with his mane flowing, and
the stirrups wildly flying, at full speed on his way
homeward.
Holy devil! ejaculated he, through his clenched
teeth, at the same time uttering a malediction upon
the flying animal; then turning to look after the
rash girl, he scarcely forbore repeating it, as he saw
her with his brother at her side, cantering over the
brittle and transparent surface of the river.
They were more than half-way to the opposite
shore, when a loud report, deadened like the
subterranean
discharge of cannon, or the first rumbling
of an earthquake, struck his ears, accompanied by
a white streak, flashing, like lightning, along the
surface of the ice, from shore to shore.
God of heaven! he exclaimed, uttering a cry of
horror, as he saw the vast field of ice shivered along
its whole extent. With a loud voice he shouted for
them to return for their lives. Yet they heard him
not, although now evidently aware of their danger;
for they increased the speed of their horses, and
made for the opposite shore, to which they were
nearest, as the only chance for safety.
Suddenly, sharp reports, in rapid succession, like
the near explosion of musketry, reverberated along
the ice, which began to swell and heave like
the surface of the ocean in a calm. Save the
agitation on the river, all else was still. The skies
wore the pure blue of spring, the winds were
hushed, the air was close and sultry, and a deep
silence
,
like that of night, reigned over nature.
A wild cry of terror suddenly reached his ears,
fearfully breaking the stillness of the morning. His
heart echoed the cry, but his arm could bring no
aid. The adventurers had diminished their furious
speed, and were hovering on the verge of a
yawning
chasm, which had suddenly opened before
them. To advance was destruction; to retrace
their way equally threatening. There was a
moment's
hesitancy, Achille observed from the
summit
of a pyramid of ice, which had been thrown
upon the beach, and then he saw them turn their
horses' heads, and, with a rapid flight, seek, over
the moving, unsteady surface of the heaving flood,
the shore they had left.
Onward they flew, like the wind. The
labouring
ice shivered and groaned in their rear, heaving
itself in huge masses of wild and fantastic shapes
into the air behind them. Near the shore towards
which they were now directing their fearful course,
the ice had yet remained firm. But, as they
advanced
,
it groaned, heaved, and rose in vast piles
in their path, while a yawning chasm gaped wide
before them. Loudly and despairingly Achille
shouted, as he indicated with his riding-whip, the
surer way of escape from this chasm, which was
momently enlarging; otherwise he could render
them no assistance.
They saw their danger, but too late. Their
impetus was too powerful to be resisted by the
slight fingers of the maiden, as she drew in her
reins with painful and terrified exertion, and her
horse dashed in among the broken and heaving
masses of ice, as they were agitated by the swelling
current, and hurled, crashing and grinding with a
loud noise, against each other. A wild cry pierced
the ears of the paralyzed Achille, and horse and
rider disappeared beneath the terrific surface.
VOL. I.4
Henri, who with a stronger arm had reined in his
fiery animal, no sooner witnessed the fearful plunge,
than, springing from his horse, he flew to the verge
from which she had leaped, and for an instant gazed
down into the cold, black flood, which had closed
like a pall over the lovely girl. The next moment
the deep waters received his descending form into
their bosom!
A moment of intense suffering, during which
Achille's heart distended almost to bursting, passed,
and the waters were agitated, and the head of her
favourite Lon came to the surface. The affrighted
animal glaring around, his dilated eyes intelligent
with almost human expression, uttered a loud and
terrific scream, and pawing with his fore-feet upon
the cakes of ice floating near him, made several
violent and ineffectual attempts, with the exercise of
extraordinary muscular exertion, to draw himself
up on to them; while the big veins swelled and
started out in bold relief from his glossy hide, his
nostrils expanded and gushed forth blood upon the
white ice, and audible groans came from his
bursting
chest.
In vain were the tremendous and sublime efforts
of the noble animalhis strength gradually failed,
and he could at last retain his hold only with one
hoof upon the crumbling verge: that at last fell
into the water. The dying steed gave an
appalling
cry, which the other horse, who stood gazing
on him with a look of sympathy, repeated, and the
shores caught up and re-echoed from cliff to cliff, till
it died away in the distance, like the wailing notes
of suffering fiends. Then, rolling his large eyes
round in terror and despair, he sunk from the sight
of the horror-stricken Achille.
She is lost, lost, lost! he exclaimed, mentally
imprecating his situation, which rendered it
impossible
for him to assist her.
Vast cakes of ice, between the elevation upon
which he stood and the place where they had
disappeared
,
constantly rolled by, tossed and whirled,
like egg shells, tumultuously upon the fierce torrent.
Conscious of his total inability to afford the least aid,
he stood gazing like a rivetted statue upon the dark
sepulchre which had entombed the only being he
loved.
Merciful providence, I thank thee! he
exclaimed
,
dropping impulsively upon one knee, with
clasped and uplifted hands, as he saw appear above
the water, far below the spot where Lon sunk, one
after another, the heads of his cousin and brother.
She was lifeless in his arms, her luxuriant tresses
floating upon the waves, her beautiful head pillowed
upon his shoulder!
With a cry of joy he sprang forward to the point
towards which he was swimming among the
floating
ice with his lovely burden. Henri was a bold
and experienced swimmer. In boyhood it was the
only amusement in which he delighted or
fearlessly
engaged. Achille stood upon the utmost verge
of the ice, and cast his riding cloak out upon the
water, retaining the tassel that he might draw them,
now almost exhausted, to the shore.
No, brother, said Henri faintly, yet firmly.
And a triumphant smile lighted his pale cheek as
he declined the proferred aid. In a moment
afterwards
he laid the fair girl upon the bank
the
preserver
of her life!
Achille cursed in his heart the fortune that had
blessed his brother. When as he swam with her,
he saw her marble cheek reposing against his, his
arm encircling her waist,
Would to God, he muttered, in the dark
chambers
of his bosom, that she had made the cold
waters her tomb than be saved thus! But no, no,
too blessed a death for that proud boy to die. His
death shall be less sacred.
His lip curled bitterly as he spoke, and his blood
fired with the dark thoughts his new-born hatred
and revenge called up. The passions which had
slumbered for years were once more roused within
him, hydra-headed and terrible.
Like a superior being, his brother gently laid the
breathless form of his cousin upon the bank. Achille
gazed upon them both for an instant in silence, and
while he gazed, felt his bosom torn with conflicting
emotions of love and hatred.
As he bent over the lifeless girl, chafing her
slender
fingers and snowy arm, he half breathed the
wish that she might not return to consciousness to
be told that Henri was her preserver. He looked
upon his brother as he assisted him in restoring her
to animation, and felt that hatred, malice, and
revenge
burned in the concentrated expression of his
glowing dark eyes; but as he encountered the proud
glance of his brother, and witnessed the calm dignity
of his demeanor, he withdrew his gaze from his face,
but hated him the more.
But a few minutes elapsed after she had been
laid upon the bank, when, accompanied by the old
gardener and one or two of the servants, their father
advanced rapidly towards them, having been
alarmed
by the appearance of Achille's horse flying
riderless
to the stables.
The breathless old man, instinctively
comprehending
the whole scene, kneeled by the side of his
beloved
niece, and by their united efforts she was soon
resuscitated. Then, for the first time, he looked up,
and observing the dripping garments of Henri, he
smiled upon him with that comprehensive and
affectionate
smile, he wore when he looked upon those
he loved. But as he turned upon Achille, there was
no glance of affection, no smile of approvalhis eye
was cold, severe and passionless.
Gertrude at length unclosed her eyes, gazed
intelligently
upon those around her, and then resting
them for an instant upon the saturated dress of her
cousin, slowly dropped the lids again to shade them
from the light, while her lips, gently parted, and
almost inaudibly pronounced,
Henri!
Achille sprung as though a serpent had stung
him, and a fearful imprecation thrilled upon his
tongue. His father frowned menacingly, while a
smile, just such a one as passed over his face when
he rejected the proferred cloak, and which, from its
proud and happy, if not exulting expression, entered
his bosom like a poisoned barb, re-opening the wound
years had not healed, lighted up his brother's
features
,
and the glance accompanying the smile was
a glance of conscious victory.
4*
CHAPTER V.
As is the lion in the hunter's toils, thou art caged in. Thy doom
is settled; ay, as sealed as if the genius of your star had writ it.
I am prepared.
'Tis well. The hour is fitting for a traitor's death.
Dugald Moore
.
The first crime is the Rubicon of guilt already crossed. Man, like
that beast of prey which tasting human blood will touch no other, if
perchance he stain his finger in his fellows' blood, is not content till he
wash both hands in it. The first crime, give it leisure and convenience,
will have its second.
A DECLARATIONSOLILOQUYA MEETING BETWEEN THE
BROTHERSITS TERMINATIONA FLIGHT.
But
a few days had expired since the events just
related, and the fields of ice had been swept to the
ocean. The beautiful river flowed onward silently
and majestically, gently meandering along the verge
of green meadows, or darting swiftly with noise and
foam around projecting rocksits pellucid bosom
dotted with white sails, its sloping hills bursting
into green luxuriance, and its overhanging forests
enveloping themselves in their verdant robes.
Achille had passed the day ostensibly in hunting,
but really to prey undisturbed, in the deep-wooded
solitude of the cliffs, upon his diseased spirit.
The approach of night found him leaning
on his hunting piece, his empty game-bag lying
at his feet, standing upon the summit of a cliff
which overhung the river. The sun had just gone
down beyond the hills of Monmouth in his own
created sea of sapphire, the western star hung
tremblingly
in the heavens, while the crescent moon,
half unveiling her chaste face, shed a holy light
down upon the earth, mingling her pale rays with
the golden hues of twilight.
The scene of his cousin's rash adventure and his
brother's triumph lay beneath him. A calm and
hallowed silence, broken only by the gurgling of
the waters as they swept by among the loose rocks
at the base of the cliff, or the sighing of the trees as
they waved heavily to the low, night wind, reigned
around him. The wildest spirit becomes gentler
under the soothing influence of such a time! But
the bosom of the young man was insensible to every
external impression. With a troubled brow and
trembling lip, while he crushed a starting tear
beneath
his eyelids, he communed with his own
wounded
spirit.
Virgin mother! have I not loved her! loved her
as man seldom loves! Loved her did I say?was
she not the object of my thoughts by daythe bright
spirit of my dreams! Did I not adore, (forgive me,
Mary mother!) worship her next to thee? Was
not her image enshrined within the inner and most
hallowed temple of my soul? Oh God, oh God!
and he leaned his head upon his gun, and the big
tears coursed down his manly cheek.
The momentary weaknessif sorrow for
shattered
hopes, and crushed aspirations be weaknesssoon
passed away, and he stood up with a firm and
collected
manner. His brow gradually became set, his
eye glowed, and a withering expression of rage,
curled and agitated his lip, while he continued in a
changed voice
Burning, burning truth! my thoughts will
consume
me! I would not have profaned her hand by
a careless touchyet I have beheld her in my
brother's arms! With fearful calmness he uttered
these last words and in the same tone, added,
The cheek by me held sacredits profanation
sacrilege! I have seen laid upon his bosom. Nay!
I
will
think of itturn each minute circumstance
over and round that I may survey it wellfor it
feeds a passion I must let live, or die myself! Yes,
that cheek, that rich, delicate cheek, with the hue of a
rosy cloud, have I seen reposing upon my brother's
imbibing from it life and warmth! I have beheld her
tresses mingled with his, her sylph-like waist encircled
in his embrace, and knew that their throbbing hearts
beat together, as in one bosom, beneath the wave.
And I remained silent!calm!for myself
calm. Calm! I burned,my glowing bosom was
in flamesyet
His dark meditations were interrupted by the hum
of low voices, ascending from the beach at the foot of
the cliff upon which he stood. Leaning over the
precipice
he looked down, but the deep shadows at the
base obscured every object. Yet he listened with
every sense dilated and resolved into one single one,
as the wily Indian watches for the light footfall of
his foe; his expanded ear alone the organ of
communication
with external objects.
A low melodious voice rose upon the still air like
music. It fell upon the heart of the listener, not as
melody falls upon the soul, soothingly, but with
the unholy influence of a spell, withering it to its
core.
Nay, Henri, I love him not, I fear his wild and
ungovernable spiritI
fear
, but I
love
him
not!
But now, you said, dear Gertrude, that you could
not refuse your admiration for what you have termed
my fiery brother's noble nature and chivalrous
spirit. Are not these the qualities that win a
maiden's
heart?
How little you are skilled, my dear Henri, in that
riddle,a woman's heart! Such qualities may
allure
,
but never win. Achille can, and will command,
but never win, esteem. He may elicit
admiration
,
but never
love!
This was the language of the being Achille so
madly worshipped. And did he listen to the silvery
tones of her voice, thus crushing forever all his
hopes, in silence? Yes, such silence as precedes the
earthquake before it bursts. The voices had died
away, but they still rung with fearful echoes through
his bosom. In a few moments, whilst he stood
transfixed
,
overwhelmed by a wave of passions, a
winding
in their path, brought the voices of his brother
and cousin again within reach of his ear, and as
they walked slowly along, he saw the white
garments
of Gertrude glancing through the branches
of the intervening trees.
Then, then it shall be yours, if the gift be worth
accepting! he heard, in a scarcely audible voice.
Richlovely treasure! warmly exclaimed the
happy and favoured youth, seizing the graceful
hand she had ingenuously given him, and pressing
it passionately to his lips.
Hell and devils! muttered Achille through his
set teeth, and striking his forehead with his clenched
hand.
He had stood till now, with suppressed breath, a
burning eye and expanded ear, like a statue of
stone. But he could endure no more; and scarcely
suppressing a fierce cry, he sprung, leaping and
bounding like a mad-man, down the face of the
precipitous rock, in a direction opposite to that
taken by the lovers, and in a moment stood upon
the beach.
Hour after hour he paced the hard white terrace
of sand, and strove to calm the raging tempest in his
bosom. He bared his head to the cool night-breeze
bathed his heated brow in the clear flood at his feet.
He gazed upon the placid moon and wooed its
soothing
influenceupon the solemn forests and peacefully
flowing river; but the low voice of nature spoke to
his warring spirit in vain. Hour after hour passed
away, and he had given himself up to the guidance
of the dark spirit he could not control, and had
purposed revenge.
The exulting boy shall feel what it is to cross
my path. He shall die! by heaven, he shall die!
he whispered, through his compressed lips. At
the same instant a loud voice from the cliff rung in
his ear.
Achille! Achille! are you there? It was his
brother. Ascending the cliff with rapidity, the
next moment Achille was at his side.
No, brother, he sarcastically replied, with his
mouth close to his ear, I am not there, but
here!
and as he spoke his voice sounded hoarse and
unearthly
.
Henri started; but observed, without further
noticing
his brother's singular manner, that his father
having apprehensions for his safety, from his
remaining
so long abroad, had requested him to seek him.
Have you met with any game, brother? he
enquired.
Yes brother, a sweet dove and a cunning
hawk.
Did you secure the birds?
Aye, the hawk, but the dove,the dove,
although
it wounded me with its angry bill, I could
not stain its snow-white plumage with red blood.
But the subtler bird I have meshed.
Brother, your language and manner is strange
and unwonted, and your face by this faint light
looks pale and haggard. Have you met with aught
to embitter your spirit during the day?
They now, having walked slowly forward while
speaking, stood upon the spot where Henri and
Gertrude plighted their loves in the sight of Achille.
He made no reply to his brother's inquiry, but
stopping
suddenly, seized him with energy by the arm,
and gazed fixedly and revengefully upon his face.
What mean you, brother? unhand me Achille!
exclaimed Henri, alarmed.
The fires within, smothered for a brief space,
now raged tumultuously and fierce, breaking out
like a volcano, long pent up in the bosom of the earth.
Know you where you stand? he loudly and
angrily demanded.
Release me, brotherwhat is your mad
purpose
?
Aye,
mad!
he reiterated. Yes, I
am
mad.
Know you where you stand? he repeated, in a
harsh voice, while his eyes glowed visibly even
in the darkness of the deep shadows in which
they stood.
God of heaven! he shouted fiercely on
receiving
no reply. Speak, craven, or
thus
, I'll crush
you! and with his iron fingers he pressed the
throat of his victim.
Unhand me, brother! cried Henri, till now
unresisting
in the grasp of one, from whom he
apprehended
no real injury, and whose violent rage he
supposed would soon subside. But he knew not the
irresistible power of the stream which he himself,
perhaps unconsciously, had contributed to swell.
He had not traced it from the fountain through all
its devious and subterranean windings, fed by a
thousand hidden springs, until it approached the
precipice over which it was about to thunder
terrible
and mighty cataract.
Do me no harm, Achille, I am your
brother!
he exclaimed, and with a strong effort freed his
throat from his grasp.
So was Abel his brother's brother, and so
and his lip withered with scorn and hatred as he
spoke:and so is Henri MINE! but revengeI
love dearer still. Henri, I hate you? Know you
this accursed spot, I again repeat?
Henri now released from his violent hold stood
proudly up, and bareing his pale brow to the
moonlight
,
which fell down upon it through an opening
in the foliage like the visible presence of a blessing,
answered,
I do, sir; it is consecrated ground; and I learn
from your strange language and manner, that you
have witnessed the sacred ceremony which
hallowed
it!
He spoke calmly, and in a tone of dignity, while
a proud, if not sarcastic smile played faintly over
his lips. Achille already insane with passion,
fiercely shouted,
And it shall be doubly consecrated by a
sacrafice
of blood! Proud fool, your mockery has sealed
your fate. I needed only
this
, and springing
fiercely upon him, he seized him by the breast with
one hand, and, glancing in the moon while he
brandished it in the air, his glittering
hunting-knife
descended like lightning into the bosom of
his victim. The warm blood spouted into the
face of the fratricide, and bathed his hand in
gore.
Oh, Gertrudemy fatherGodbrother! I
for-forgive, he faintly articulated, and with a
groan that sunk to the heart of the murderer, fell
heavily to the ground.
For a few moments the guilty being stood over
the prostrate body, with his arm outstretched in the
position in which he had given the fatal blow, his
features rigid his eyes glazed, and his whole person
as motionless as marblethe statue of a murderer
chiselled to the life! During that brief moment he
endured an eternity of suffering. The torments of
ages were expressed into one single drop of time!
Who may tell the feelings of the impulsive
murderer
as he sees the life-blood gush outthe
features
pale and stiffen, and the strong man become
at once a cold corpse at his feet, and when
conscience
asks, who has done thisI, I, I,oh,
how bitterly is the confession wrung from his bosom.
But we will not dwell upon this scene. The
fratricide fled, beneath the cold moon and
glittering
stars, which like eyes of intelligence seemed to
look down reprovingly upon him. On he fled, nor
dared to look up to them; the little light they shed
became hateful, and he felt as though he would
draw darkness around him like a garment, hiding
himself from both God and man.
Oh that the rocks would fall upon me and hide
me ever from myself! he groaned inwardly; and
a loud voice within cried, Vain, vain! live on!
live on forever! And he buried his face in his
cloak and fled still onward.
The morning broke, and the miserable fugitive
still pursued the path which led along the shores of
the river to the sea. As the light increased, he
saw, for the first time, that his dress was sprinkled
with his brother's blood. He shuddered, and the
fatal scene rushed once more upon his mind in all
its horrors. Hastily plunging into the river, (alas!
for the tales of blood, of which river and sea are the
dumb repositories!) he removed all traces of the
deed he had committed, from his person.
Two hours before sunset he came in sight of the
bay, its bosom relieved by many green islands and
dotted with white sails. He hailed the broad
ocean in the distance with a thrill of pleasure.
Hastening to the coast, which was guarded by
lofty mural precipices, he swung himself down their
sides with that daring wrecklessness which is often
the surest means of success, and throwing himself
into a small boat which had been left in a cove by
some one of the fishermen, whose huts were
scattered
in picturesque sites along the cliffs of the
romantic
and rock-bound coast, he raised the little
sail, and steered out to sea.
VOL. I.5.
BOOK II.
LOVE AND PIRACY.
He had an only daughter,
The greatest heiress of the eastern isles;
Besides so very beautiful was she,
Her dowry was nothing to her smiles:
Still in her teens and like a lovely tree
So grew to womanhood
*  *  *  *  *
Irad
.
I loved her wellI would have loved her better,
Had love been met with love; as 'tis, I leave her
To brighter destinies, if so she deems them.
Japh
.
What destinies?
Irad
.
I have some cause to think
She loves another.
*  *  *  *  *
But who that chief? His name on every shore
Is famed and feared?
Byron
.
BOOK II.
CHAPTER I.
Smuggling or frauds practised against the revenues originated in
certain vices or imperfections in our laws, by which, as they are not
yet reformed, this system of piracy is still pursued. Smuggling is at
best but a school of piracy; but wiser legislation might prevent much
crime and render the navigation of the high seas more secure.
Letters on Political Economy
.
Circumstances sometimes impel men to crimes against which
their nature revolts, yet they are not the less guilty.
Ibid
.
SKETCH OF THE BUCCANEERS OF BARRITARIASCENE IN
JAMAICA
A
NIGHT EXPEDITION.
About one-fifth of the brief term of years to
which Divine Wisdom has limited the life of man
we have suffered to roll unrecorded down the tide
of time.
Our tale now opens in a new theatre, with
scenes of fresher and more exciting interest, before
which characters move and act who have borne no
inconsiderable part in the great drama of the
second
,
and last war of independence, between the
United States of the North and Great Britain.
A few years before the commencement of this
memorable and decisive war, a daring band of
privateers-men
,
inured to every hardship to be
encountered
in storms of battle, or of the elements, and as free
as the winds which filled their flowing sheets, had
obtained commissions from the new government of
Carthagena, then first struggling for independence,
to cruise against the royalists, or vessels sailing
under
the flag of Spain. By the authority of these
commissions, they not only made numerous
captures
on the great highway of nations, but
blockaded
many ports of the royalists in the Mexican
and West India seas.
Giving a latitude to their commissions which the
government from which they received them did not
recognize or foresee, they embraced in them,
besides
the ships of the royalists, such other vessels as
they might fall in with, which, on trial, proved
unable
to withstand their superior force. From
privateers-men
,
sailing under the flag of a South
American
state, emboldened by success and power, they
became rovers of the wide blue sea, independent of
every flag but their own bright-red banner, and
acknowledging
no commission but that written upon
the edge of their gleaming sabres. The flags of
every nation struck to their own, and the broad
waters
of the Mexican sea became at the same time
their empire, their battle-field, and their home.
The prizes, their lawless mode of
translating
special commissions, and that delusion of the
visual
organs which led them to see in every flag, the
gorgeous blazonry of his Majesty of Spain, against
whom they had declared open war, enabled
them to seize, were taken into the secret bayous and
creeks adjacent to the mouth of the Mississippi,
where they were effectually concealed and safe from
capture or pursuit.
The most important passes made use of by these
buccaneers, and with which the scenes of our tale
are more immediately connected, lie about twenty
leagues to the west of the delta of the Mississippi,
5*
and about forty miles south-west of the city of
New-Orleans. Here, an arm of the Mexican gulf
extends four or five leagues inland, terminating in
the mouths of several bayous or creeks, which, by
many devious and intricate windings, known only
to the smugglers, reached to within a few miles of
New-Orleans. They were navigable only for
boats, which here were accustomed to discharge
their unlawful freights taken from captured vessels,
from whence, through other and more commercial
hands, it obtained a rapid and secret conveyance to
the city.
This arm of the gulf is termed the bay of
Barritaria
,
so called, from that system of naval
barratry
which characterized the class of men which
usually frequented it. The mouth of this bay, or
lake, as it is more generally denominated, from
being
nearly encircled by the land, is defended by a
small island about two leagues in length and three
miles in breadth, which lies in a direction east and
west, and nearly parallel with the line of the coast,
leaving two narrow passes or entrances to the lake
from the gulf.
That, on the east, at the period with which we
are to identify our tale, was exceedingly shallow,
allowing only the passage of boats of light draught;
the western and main pass only admitted
vessels
drawing nine and ten feet of water. This
island, which is called indiscriminately, Grande
Terre
and Barritaria, is not an unbroken level, like the
surrounding low lands, or prairies, constituting the
southern section of Louisiana, but, with a striking
geological feature in reference to the aspect of this
region, it rises abruptly from the sea, with bold and
precipitous sides, sometimes swelling into slight
eminences
several feet in height, covered with dense
forests of trees, among which, superior to all, towers
the live-oak in its iron strength. It also abounds in
a great variety of game; and an abundance of
excellently-flavoured
fish are taken in its waters. Each
extremity of this island, at the time of which we
speak, was strongly fortified and bristly with
cannon
,
completely commanding both entrances to the
inner bay or lake.
Close within the western and deeper inlet to the
right, and effectually concealed by the intervening
islands from the open sea, from which it was about
three leagues distant, was a safe and commodious
anchorage; the only secure harbour for many
leagues along that dangerous coast.
This island, with its anchorage, was the
principal
resort of the Carthagenian smugglers. From
their little territory, which in the face of the
government
of the North United States, they had boldly
usurped, the fame of their extraordiuary deeds
went abroad over sea and land, till the name of
Barrataria was associated in the minds of men,
with crimes and deeds of outlawry, unparalleled in
the history of banned and out-cast men.
For better security, and more efficient operations,
these men, at first sailing singly, each upon his
own desperate enterprise, ultimately associated
themselves into one body, conferring the command
of their squadron on an individual of their number,
whose distinguished qualifications as a
commander
over such a fleet, and such men, manifested on
many a bloody deck and many a desperate fight,
marked him singularly as their leader.
Besides this rendevous of the buccaneers of
Barritaria
,
in Louisiana, there were two others of less
importance; one of which was situated in an
uninhabited
part of the coast, in the neighbourhood
of Carthagena, and the other in the West India
seas, on the west coast of the island of St.
Domingo
.
In these seas, and ultimately in this
last-mentioned
spot, are laid the scenes of our second book.
In one of the romantic bays, with which the
southern shore of the island of Jamaica is indented,
and on one of the rich autumn evenings peculiar
to the Indian seas, about fifteen years subsequent
to the period embraced by the last book, a long,
low, black schooner, very taunt and sharp in the
bows, with all light sail drawing freely, and a red
and blue signal fluttering aloft, might have been
seen bowling gallantly over the miniature waves
of the bay, which glittered in the sun-light as
though overlaid with golden mail.
On the deck of the little vessel, which was
heavily
armed and full of men, stood one of
commanding
person, whose features, as he leaned over the
quarter-railing
,
were partially concealed by the drooping
front of his broad palmetto hat; that portion of his
face, however, which could be discerned, displayed a
black silken mustacho, curving like cupid's bow,
over a fine mouth, whose general expression was
resolution
.
Now, however, a yellow segar severed his
lips, which languidly embraced it, while an
occasional
cloud of blue smoke emitted from beneath
his overshadowing hat, curled above his head, and
floating to leeward, blended with the evening
haze.
Listlessly, like one familiar with the scenery, he
gazed upon the glorious prospect spread out before
and around him, rising from the shores of the bay
and retreating backward and higher, till the
distant
clouds bounded the viewa scene of gorgeous
sublimity. Precipice on precipice, avalanche on
avalanche rose, piled one upon the othera
theatre
of magnificent desolation; while the soaring
ridges of the Blue Mountains, half mantled in
clouds, and the lofty peak of St. Catharine,
elevating
her summit several thousand feet above the
sea, towered proudly above all.
Immediately on his left, rose, to a lesser height, a
chaos of inaccessible cliffs, abrupt rocks, shooting
upward like towers and craggy peaks, exhibiting
the stern aspect of some great convulsion which
had laid nature in ruins. As the schooner shot
farther into the bay, these wild features were
concealed
by intervening wooded hills, which, with
round green summits, swelled from the shore; and
as she still lessened her distance from the land,
numerous
verdurous spots sprinkled along the
precipitous
side of the mountains, or laid, like green
carpets
,
upon the rocks, and among the trees, softened
and relieved the harsher character of the scenery;
while the traces of human ingenuity, taste and
labour
,
were discerned on every hand. Majestic
forests
,
groves of palmetto, and pastures like the softest
lawns, now lining the shore and overhanging the
water, were rapidly passed; and vast savannas,
covered
with variegated cane, as far as the eye could
distinguish, displayed, in their changing tints, the
verdure of spring, blended with the exuberance of
autumn.
As the rover sailed farther into the bay, his eye,
as he glanced with momentary animation along the
land, rested upon the cots and hamlets of the
negroes
,
the walls of a distant military post, and the
white villas of the planters, dispersed picturesquely
on the precipices, and in every green nook along the
sides of the receding hills. The schooner, after
running about a league into the land, suddenly
altered
her course, and stood for the entrance of a
little harbour or recess of the bay; and now, under
her mainsail and jib alone, coasted along a bold
shore, dotted here and there with a magnificent
pimentogroves of which clothed the distant
eminences
.
The summits of the cliffs, beneath which
it sailed, were verdant with trees of thickest foliage,
while, from their over-hanging brows, tiny cataracts,
like slender threads of silver, leaped down into the
sea, ringing musically as they fell, or struck upon
the deck of the vessel, sprinkling a cool shower
upon the seamen.
The inlet towards which she was rapidly
advancing
,
was nearly enclosed by a chain of isolated
rocks, towering like gigantic pinnacles; and a
craggy promontory overhanging the basin, half
encircled
it on the west. Between the termination of
this promontory, and the chain of rocks, was visible
a narrow passage, by which craft of small size only
could pass, one at the time, into the dark, circular
pool, sleeping calm and deep within its rocky
sides, which, frowning terrifically over it, cast beneath
a black shadow, even whilst the sun hung high in
the heavens. Now the shadows were deepened in
the approaching twilight, and a mysterious gloom
gathered over the spot as the day receded,
presenting
to the imagination dark caverns and horrid
ravines
on every side.
Into this secret nook the little vessel rapidly shot,
under the guidance of a skilful hand, and
running
into its farthest extremity, towards the main
land, came to anchor under a projecting rock,
which, cleft to its base, admitted a footway from
the water to the highland plantations in the
interior
.
In a few minutes the white sails disappeared,
and the tall, black masts of the vessel relieved
against the sky, alone betrayed her presence; for
the dark hull itself was invisible in the deep
shadow
of the cliff. Not a sound was heard from her
deck after she entered, save an occasional order
given in a suppressed voice, and the rubbing of the
cable as the anchor sunk noiselessly into the
water
.
The trees were motionless, and not a breath
ruffled the limpid surface of the basin.
List! said a low, deep voice, from the stern of
the vessel; and the distant wail of a bugle fell,
with a melancholy cadence, upon the ears of the
listening seamen.
Again it rose and fell, low and plaintive; and
hardly had the sound died in the air when three
sharp blasts were blown in rapid succession.
That's the signal! Valasquez is as true as
steel to his own avarice! exclaimed the
commander
of the schooner, whom we have just
introduced
to the reader.
Be ready all! Ten of you go with me. See
to your pistols, and let every other man take a dark
lantern and a cutlass, and have two oars slung for
a barrow. The rest of you be still as the grave,
and on the alert to obey my signals. Three
pistols
,
Ricardo, he continued, addressing one of his
officers, fired in succession will be our signal for
a reinforcement, should the old Don be too hard
for us. Now ashore, my men, all, he added with
rapidity and energy.
Accompanied by a handsome youth, and a
deformed
slave, and followed by ten of his men, in red
woollen caps and shirts, and without jackets, he
sprung on to a projecting point of rock, heavily
armed, and the next moment stood in the mouth of
the cleft or defile, terminating at the top of the
cliff.
Madre de Dios! exclaimed one, in a
suppressed
whisper, to his comrade by his side, casting his
eyes up the narrow and precipitous pass, which
they were slowly ascending, this must be the
upstairs
to purgatory.
Rather, Mister Spaniard, drawled his
companion
a
tall, light-haired, ungainly seaman
through his generous nasal organ, rather, it may
be another guess sort of a road.
And what may that be? inquired a Spanish
sailor, gruffly, who toiled on just before him.
The road to the good place, I guess, Senyore.
Gif proof o' dat! said a lank Frenchman, by
trade a frissieur, but who had now taken to
cutting
men's throats instead of their beards. Gif
proof o' dat, by Gar, Monsieur Yenkee!
Why, Mister Parley-voo, you see, articulated
the other slowly, in reply, I can prove it to a
demonstration
from scriptur, if ye happen to know
what that are is. Don't it say, `strait is the gate
and narrow is the way that goes up to heaven?'
and the scriptural quoter cleared his throat
emphatically
,
and wiped his loose lips upon his red woollen
sleeve, with an air of self-complacency.
Give preacher Sol a quid o' tobacco for that
sarmont, said one; blast my eyes if he haint arnt
it; and a low suppressed laugh was heard from
two or three of his comrades.
Silence there, said their leader, in a low,
distinct
voice; and the rest of their way up the defile
was effected, only occasionally interrupted by the
splash of a loose fragment, which, agitated by
their feet, fell into the water, or the whispered
execration
of some one, as a false step had nearly sent
him headlong down upon his companions, and into
the dark gulf beneath.
Now, my brave fellows, said the leader of this
night-party, as he stood at the head of the defile,
upon the summit of the cliff, whilst his men filed
past him, and gathered in a group, beneath the dark
shadow of a cluster of palm, cocoa-nut and
bamboo-cane
trees, which crowned the heights. Now, my
good men, we are on an expedition, which, if
successful
,
and its success depends on your own wills,
and sharp cutlasses, will redeem all our past losses,
which tempted the crew to mutiny. These wars
have made all craft, but those who show their teeth,
full timid enough in venturing on our legitimate
empire; but this henceforward shall be no cause of
complaint. I have yielded to your wishes on this
occasion, not, you well know, because I feared to
withstand them, although it is against my own
feelings
to rob an old man of his hoarded ingots.
The free flag, a flowing sheet, and open sea
for me. But be ready. I will lead you on this
adventure. Ho, Cudjoe! he said to his slave,
give the answering signal to Velasquezclearly
and well, now, for your boar's head may pay the
forfeiture for bungling; and the clear, wild and
discordant cry of the galena, when alarmed,
suddenly
broke the stillness of the night, now
prolonged
and low, now sharp and loudthen suddenly
ceased.
Well done, my Guinea-bird, said his master;
your beldam mother, Cudjoe, must have fed you
on guinea-eggs.
Hark! it is answered; and a similar cry came
from the depths of the wood. In a few moments
afterwards it was repeated nearer, and then ceased.
The silence which succeeded, was interrupted
by a screech and rustling on the left, in the
direction
of a patch of coarse grass, terminated by
clumps of aloes, torch-thistle, and palmetto, which
formed the boundary of the cultivated
portion
of the estate. Every eye turned instantly
in that direction, and every man's hand was laid
upon the butt of his pistol.
Ho! Lon, my fine creature, but you are a
welcome pioneer! exclaimed the chief, as a noble
dog, of majestic size, bounded into their midst, and
sprung fawningly against his master's breast. But
down, sir, down, you hug like a Greenland bear!
What news bring you from my trusty spy?
The sagacious animal, as if the careless question
of his master had been intelligible, looked into the
face of the querist, and strove to draw his attention
VOL. I.6
by raising his fore-paw to his neck and striking
once or twice forcibly the broad, studded collar
encircling
it.
Ha! it is so? Thodore, open your lantern,
said the chief to the youth; cautiously, though:
and the pirate bent over the collar and examined
it, while the dog stood wagging his huge tail with
a motion expressive of much satisfaction.
Nay, Lon, you are a cheat, sir! said his
master
,
angrily, after a close examination of the collar,
which on other occasions had served him for the
transmission of billets relating to both love and
battle
.
Go, sir! but the noble animal crouched at
his feet, forced his paw under the collar, and
struggled
to break it from his neck.
The key! the key, Cudjoe! he cried; and
the slave thrust his huge hand into a kind of
Pandora's
box made in his lower garments, from which,
among a heterogeneous display of broken pipes,
chicken breast-bones, beads, ebony hearts, broken
dirk-knobs, charmed relicks, and spells against
obeahs, fetahs, and melay men, he produced the
key to the collar.
His master unlocked it, and stepping aside with
his back to his men, he secretly slid aside the smooth
plate which constituted its inner surface, and
displayed
an opening nearly the whole length and
breath of the collar. From this concealed
repository
,
which he thought known only to himself and
a fair inamorata, then in a distant land, he took a
folded scrap of paper.
Curse this prying knave Velasquez! he
muttered
;
how in the devil's name could he have
learned this secret? But how or when, he has
made good use of it, he cast his eyes over the note
upon which the rays of the lamp fell brightly through
a carefully opened crevice in the sides of the lantern.
Well, men, he said, turning to his party, I
find Lon has been a trusty messenger;
Velasquez
has written upon his collar what chances await
us at the old villa. There are but two old slaves,
the old man and his daughter, besides his trusty
nephew and secretary, Hebrto Velasquez!
Onward
.
Lead, my trusty Lon!
How I do hate such treacherous tools, he said
mentally, as, preceded by his dog and followed by
his men, he threaded the forest; open villany
were virtue to such secret machinations. And
against an uncle too! who has been but too
indulgent
that
he may a little earlier have his heaps
of gold to squander upon his debaucheries. Holy
father! if I did not fear a general mutiny
throughout
my squadron, by reason of our late scanty
harvest
on the seas, I would not lift a finger to help this
rou to his wishes. But fate, fate! I am the
football
of circumstances! How often have I been led by
my destiny to do deeds at which my soul revolted!
Oh, God! oh, God! that I could be at peace with
my own heart! Peace! there remains no peace for
me! I have bathed my hand in blood, and there is
no retracing my footsteps. My first mad crime has
been the prolific parent of all my subsequent ones.
If my arm had been staid at that fatal period by
some good angel, I should have been an
honourable
perhaps,
a good man! That deed ruled my
after destinies. My hand is now red
red!
and
nothing but my own blood can ever wash out the
stains which crimson it. And is there a future, too,
where men must give account of their earthly deeds?
Is there a day of retribution for the murderer? Do
the innocent and the guilty go alike to one destiny
to one reward or punishment? Oh, God! No,
no!There was one pure spirit released by this same
bloody hand from the snowy bosom which confined
it, panting to be freeand shall our destinymine
and hersbe the same in the coming world? Oh,
no! Oh, no! she must be glorious and happy there!
and I
there is surely a hell for thee
,
Lafitte
!
he exclaimed bitterly. The wretched and guilty
man pressed his temples for a moment, and turned
to cheer his followers, striving in the action of the
time to forget his own miserable thoughts.
The party had now issued from the dark recesses
of the wood, the vivid green of whose foliage was
was just tinged with silver from the rising moon,
and after passing with a swift tread around a hedge,
or border of bamboo and orange trees, came at once
in front of a large, old mansion, situated on the side
of a gentle eminence facing the bay.
From the point where they first beheld the house,
several avenues, overgrown with rank and
luxuriant
grass, diverged in various directions. One of
these paths immediately in front of them was
broader
,
and by the light of the newly-risen moon, which
glanced along its whole length, seemed some worn
by recent use. This avenue, which afforded to
the freebooters a glimpse of the house containing
their prey, was bordered by the rich-leaved oleander,
numerous beautiful trees bearing roses of every dye;
with the jessamine, and grenadilla, yielding to the
caprice of nature, entwining its luxuriant vines into
gracefully-formed alcoves. At a gateway, obscured
by the shade of many large trees standing around
it, the party made a halt.
Now listen to my instructions, each man of you,
said their leader, as they paused here, awaiting their
guide. There is to be no violence; the persons
of the old man and his family shall be held sacred.
It is his wealth, not his life you seek. Let no man
pull a trigger, if he love his life, this night. If we
are attacked by the patrol, then, and only in the last
emergency, use your fire-arms; for one report of a
pistol, would bring the neighbouring garrison down
upon us in force; and our little Gertrude, lying so
snugly in the Devil's Bowl below, would be
intercepted
by a king's cruiser before she could gain the
open sea. Be cool and discreet, and we succeed,
he added, as the men were about to murmur their
assent; be imprudent, and it will be a short grace
from the red coats, and a swing from the nearest
tree.
Hist! here comes our guide. What, ho, there,
the word!
Creeping on his hands and knees, as he spoke,
appeared from beneath a clump of bushes
growing
by the gate, a low, square figure, naked to the
waist, from which, to his bony knees descended a
garment equally participating in the honours of the
petticoat and small-clothes. As he emerged from
the shadow of the hedge into the moonlight, his
black glossy hide glistened like a polished boot.
Gathering himself up to his full height, which
was perhaps a little exceeding three feet eleven
inches, he replied, with rapid, nervous articulation,
while his teeth, and the white of his eye glittered in
the moonlight,
De word, mass' buckra? de word, mass' 'berto
tell me say be, `de collar.'
You are my man, he exclaimed; lead on to
your young master. Where does he await us?
Close by de big tam'rind tree, mass'! 'hind de
soute wing ob de house.
On, my beauty! said he, gaily; the momentary
depression having passed away; lead on, we
follow
.
The guide darted again under the hedge, where
the ground had been burrowed, leaving room for a
full sized man to draw himself under with ease,
by putting aside the lower branches of the armed
hedge, encircling the grounds. Through this
opening
,
each man, after getting upon his knees, passed
through into the garden, followed by their leader,
6*
who hewed with his cutlass a broad passage, through
which to retreat. Here, forming his men into a line,
he placed himself at their head, and with rapid and
noiseless footsteps the whole party followed their
sable guide through many dark and devious
labyrinths
,
towards the rear of the villa.
CHAPTER II.
There exists no treachery so criminal as that of youth against old
age. But when with grey hairs are united the ties of benefactor and
kindred, it becomes the blackest of crimes, claiming neither extenuation
nor forgiveness. The man who would be thus guilty, is the basest of
menthe most accomplished of demons.
M.
Rollin
.
A lovely girl watching over the dying pillow of a venerable father,
must be a scene over which angels love to linger.
Hamilton's Essays
.
A RUINED VILLAA CASTILLIAN MAIDENTHE VENERABLE
SPANIARDSCENE IN A SUBTERRANEAN APARTMENT.
While the band of piratical marauders were
winding their way through the intricate paths
which led through the grounds, we will precede
them to the villa.
This was a long, low, steep-roofed edifice, with
a dilapidated and sunken gallery running along its
front, supported by a row of heavy, dark-coloured
columns, some of which leaned inward while one
or two were lying prostrate upon the green sward
before the house. At either end of the gallery, stood a
bronze statue of some classic hero, while in various
points in front of the building and half-concealed by
the wild and neglected shrubbery, were several
marble
statues, a few standing, but more broken into
pieces and thrown down, fragments of which were
scattered in every direction over the grounds. A
green terrace, fronting the bay and bound with
marble
,
up to which a ruined flight of steps ascended
from the shore, extended the whole length of the
parterre, or ornamented garden, before the villa.
The chimneys, and in many places the walls of
the house had crumbled and fallen; windows were
without shuttersthe ascent to the piazza, the
entrances to the dwelling, and the various walks
diverging from it, were choked up with tall coarse
grass, and fragments of brick, stone and marble.
The whole premises presented a scene of
melancholy
desolationthe sad record of past opulence
and grandeur.
The northern wing of the building, alone
withstood
the devastations of decay, and at this time,
served as the abode of the family whose reported
wealth, had held forth temptations to a band of
pirates to invade the sanctity of its domestic circle.
The opulent proprietor, an old Castillian soldier,
lived in the enjoyment of vast possessions in
Mexico
,
when one of the many revolutions in that
ill-fated
land, sent him forth an exile to other shores.
With the value of his estates exchanged for Spanish
coin and vessels of gold and silver, or melted down
into ingots, and accompanied by his only child, a
beautiful dark-eyed Castillian girla nephew whom
he had adopted, and one or two faithful servants, he
came to Jamaica, and purchased the estate on which
he now dwelt, from one of those old, ruined planters,
who once lived princes of the island.
The old Spaniard's heart was broken by his
exile. His proud spirit was fallen, and he had
become again a child, and the child of his bosom,
the young Constanza Velasquez, was the only
solace of his age and solitude. But the nephew,
turned upon his benefactor, and like the serpent,
stung the bosom that nourished him.
The hour of vespers had long passed, and
Constanza
kneeled by the couch of her father.
Her figure was round, finely developed, and
displayed
to advantage by a laced jacket, or bodice of
black satin, enriched with a deep lace border closely
fitting her shape. The curve of her shoulders was
faultless, terminating in arms that would have
haunted Canova in his dreams. On either wrist
sparkled a diamond button confining the bodice at
the cuffs. At both shoulders it was also clasped
by a star of emeralds. Her fine raven hair was
drawn back, and arranged in the form of a crest of
tresses falling around her finely-turned head. A
single white flower was secured in a rich curl
above her forehead, by a gold-wrought comb,
inlaid
with many coloured stones. Over her head
was thrown a white mantilla or veil, fastened on
the comb by a pearl pin, so disposed as to fall down
the back, to the feet of the wearer; yet it could
be readily brought forward and dropped over the
whole person. At this time, it was gathered in
folds, and hung gracefully on her left arm.
Beneath her robe of white satin, worn under
the bodice, and richly flowered with net work
of silver, appeared, fitted in a neat Spanish
slipper
,
a footsuch as poets of the northern clime
see in dreamsof the most perfect and
fascinating
symmetry. The complexion of the maiden
was a rich olive tinge, mellowed by the suns of
sixteen
Indian summers. Her eyes were large, dark,
and expressive, shaded by long silken lashes, even
darker than her dark shining hair, giving them,
when in repose, that dreamy look, which the pencils
of the old Italian masters loved to dwell upon with
lingering touches. They spoke of deep passion and
gentleness, while a smile of light danced perpetually
in their radiant beams. The general character of
her extremely lovely features indicated great
sweetness
of disposition and ingenuousness. The timid
expression of her eye, evincing indecision, was
relieved
by a firmness about the mouth and the
maidenly
dignity which sat upon her beautiful forehead.
In her left hand, she held a diamond crucifix
suspended
from her neck by a massive gold chain, each
link in the shape of a cross. Upon her right arm,
reposed the majestic head of her venerable parent,
her delicate fingers playing with the silvery, shining
ringlets that flowed about his neck, and curled upon
his massive forehead. His features were sharp and
rigid with illness and settled grief; and his dark
eye was lustreless as he gazed up into the face of
his child.
Have you said your prayers to night, my child?
I have, dear father; and they ascended for your
recovery. Oh, that the sweet mother of our Saviour
would grant answers to my prayers! she said
looking
upward devotionally.
She will, she will, Constanza, replied the
aged man, for yourself, but not for me! I have
lived my allotted space. I must soon leave you,
child. Be prepared for it, my daughter! Listen!
I dreamed this afternoon that I saw the blessed
Virgin
,
and she was the image of yourself.
Nay, father, let not your love for poor sinful
Constanza lead you to sin in your language,
interrupted
his daughter, blushing at the unintentional
flattery, while she trembled at its seeming impiety.
So, so, but yet hear me, child, he interrupted
impatiently; when I gazed upon her, wondering
she was so like you, she changed, and instead of you,
I saw your mother! How much like her you look
just now my child! Bend down and let me kiss
your brow. The fair girl bent her brow to her
father's cheek, her dark locks mingling with his
white hair.
You do not remember your mother, uttered he,
after a moment's affectionate embrace; poor child!
she was very beautiful. Your lofty brow is hers,
the same pencilled archthe same drooping lid
and when you smile, I almost call you, `my
Isabel
!'
Am I so like my sainted mother, father? I
wish I could recollect her or recall a feature, she
said, placing her finger on her lips in the attitude of
thoughtbut no, no, it is vain! she added,
shaking her head mournfully, her image is gone
forever.
Oh no, not forever, my child, you shall meet her
again in heaven.
All at once a cloud of sorrow passed across his
troubled features, and grasping in his trembling and
withered fingers, the soft, round hand of his
daughter
,
he said in an earnest manner,
Constanza, I feel that I cannot leave you, my
unprotected dove! in this sinful world alone. What
will become of you, my child, when I am gone?
Hebrto! and the old man's eye flashed with
anger
as he repeated the name, Beware of Hebrto!
Oh, that the proud name of Velasquez should be
dishonoured
by such a branch! Fear him, my child, fear
him as you would the adder that winds his glistening
folds along your path; and the old man clasped
his skeleton fingers upon the sparkling crucifix
which lay upon his breast and after remaining
silent for a few moments, he lifted his aged eyes to
heaven and said, Holy Mary! take her! she is
thy child, thy sister! Be a mother to my child, dear
Mary, Mother of Jesus! and as thy beloved son
surrendered
thee to the care of his beloved disciple
while he hung expiring on the cross, and he pressed
fervently and devotionally the jewelled
representative
to his lips, so do I, a poor penitent worm of
the dust, here and on my dying bed, give up to thee,
my childmy only beloved child! Thou hast her
mother in heaven. Oh keep her daughter while
on earth! Mary, Mother! in the language of thy
dying son, I say, `Mother, behold thy daughter!'
The venerable man, who in his momentary
devotion
had raised himself from the sustaining arm of
his daughter, as he uttered the last words, fell back
upon the pillow exhausted.
Oh, Agata! Agata! shrieked the
deeply-affected
and terrified girl, Come! hasten! my father is
dying.
The door of the anti-chamber burst open, and the
tall figure of young Hebrto Velasquez stood before
her as she turned to look for her aged attendant,
wrapped in a dark blue cloak, and his features
shaded by a drooping sombrero.
Ha, my charming cousin! what has tuned that
pretty voice so high, he said in a gay, yet
unpleasant
tone; at the same time coming forward and
bending gracefully down, he passed his arm around
the waist of the lovely girl.
The maiden sprung as if a demon had laid
his polluted hand upon her person. Heberto!
Seor Velasquez! and she stood before him as she
spokeher eye flashing with maidenly indignation
her cheek glowing with insulted modesty, and her
majestic figure and attitude like that of a seraph
whom Satan had dared to tempt. What mean
you, sir? begone! Would you press your hateful
suit to the daughter, over the corpse of her father?
Begone, I hate you!more than I have ever
loved
I now
hate
you! Oh shame, shame! that I
should ever have loved THEE! and her lip, eye
and brow, expressed withering scorn.
Leave me, sir! she added, as she saw that he
moved not. But the bold and unblushing intruder,
although his eye quailed before the proud look of
the maiden, stood with folded arms, a fierce brow,
and malicious lip, gazing upon her, as she turned to
bathe the aged temples of the unconscious invalid
and restore him to animation. Leave me, sir;
Oh, let not my father revive and find you here. It
will kill him. You know he cannot endure you,
soulless man, since you brought that fatal will for
him to sign.
Ha, do you throw it in my teeth, pretty one!
But prithee tell me, when first learned you the part
of tragedy queen? Nombre de Dios, my pretty
cousin! but you play your part excellently well.
Scorner! Insulter! awayOh that the count
were here to chastise insolence!
The count, slowly repeated Velasquez,
grinding
the hated appellation between his glittering
teeth, as he slowly articulated it.
At this moment the old man unclosed his eyes.
Go, sir, gowould you murder him? she
exclaimed
,
while her dark eye flashed with anger.
He will die full soon enough when his ingots
are gone, repeated Velasquez, scornfully. I will
go, my queenly cousin; but the time perhaps may
not be far off, when you will sue for this same
Velasquez
to stay, and with clasped hands and tearful
eyes pray him to speak you kindly; then will he
remember this evening. Adios, estrella mia! he
added with a mock, sentimental air, and kissing his
hand, while he cast over the voluptuous outline of
her shoulders, as, in her sacred duty she bent
affectionately over her father's form, a glance of
mingled desire and hatred, he pressed his hat over
his eyes, folded his cloak closelier about his form, and
left the apartment.
With a firm and rapid pace he passed through
the hall, and traversed the deserted apartments of
the large mansion, his way lighted by the moon,
which poured in floods of radiance at the open and
shutterless windows. Opening, and closing
carefully
after him, a door which communicated with
the opposite wing, he descended a broken staircase,
into a dark vault beneath, and unlocking a small door
VOL. I.7
concealed on the outside by thick shrubbery, he
pushed aside the bushes, and stood in the moonlight.
By the blessed Baptista! he exclaimed, as he
emerged from the secret portal, if these men
betray
me! Yet, without me they cannot hunt out
the old dotard's hoard. But if I am the buccaneer's
tool, you have lost your wits, Velasquez, if he shall
not be yours. And the dark plotter against a
helpless old man, and his lovely and unprotected
child, smiled inwardly at the pleasant thought his
fertile brain conjured up, as he paced to and fro,
beneath the shade of a large tamarind tree, which
grew near that wing of the mansion.
What can keep them? he muttered, as a
fancied sound in a clump of bushes, upon which his
eye was often turned, stayed for a moment his
footsteps.
It is a full half hour since they answered my
signal. Cesar has been long absent! The black
loiterer should have had them here, ere now.
A shrine to thee, patron saint! he suddenly
exclaimed
,
devoutly kissing a medal, suspended to his
collar, there is the square figure of my naked
Adonis; and that tall figure! I know it well;
once seen it is not soon forgotten; and there follow
his sturdy villains. Now, Herbrto Velasquez, thou
art a made man!
Seores, buenos tardes, he said, gaily
advancing
a few steps to meet the approaching party, as it
emerged from the avenue, and traversed the terrace
to the place of appointment. My good sir
captain, you are right gladly welcome to my poor
domicil. If it please you, draw up your men in
this shade, while we walk aside, he added,
proffering
his hand to the leader of the party.
Sir Spaniard, pardon me that I grasp not the
hand of a villain, replied the chief, without
removing
his hand from the cutlass hilt, upon which it
mechanically rested. Nay, start not! and leave
that rapier in peace. I know you, though we have
met but seldom. Thanks, or courtesy, I owe you
not. This adventure is not of my seeking; it is
the ill-begotten offspring of mutiny on the part of
my men, who will be in no other way appeased,
and of treachery, ingratitude, and base villany on
your own. Now, Seor, to business; but let there
be no friendship, and but few words between us.
Velasquez bit his lip in silence, and his inferior
spirit shrunk within him, as these biting words
rung upon his ear; and the penetrating,
self-powered
gaze of the pirate rested, while he spoke, full
upon his features. But his love of wealth overcame
any momentary struggles of wounded pride, and he
replied in a less assured tone than he had used,
when first addressing his companion.
It is well, Seor, he said, carelessly, if you
choose to be captious on so slight a matter. But
'tis a blessed chance my pretty cousin heard not
your romancing. I would wager my gold-headed
rapier against the iron one you wear, that she
would have loved you outright.
Your sword is more likely to be lost in such a
wager, than in one of battle, was the contemptuous
reply; but I came not here to lay wagers with
you, Don Velasquez, either of coin or battle. To
the matter in hand. We have no time for idle
dallying, and I am not given to bandying words.
For the privilege of taking possession of the large
sum of money in the possession of your uncle, you
are to be allowed one-half for your own personal
use, on condition, that without turmoil or
blood-shed
,
injury to persons or property, you conduct
my men to your uncle's strong-hold. These, he
added, after a moment's silence, are the terms we
made in Kingston. Say I not well, Seor?
There remains one other condition, replied
Velasquez, with the caution of practised villany;
that mutual secrecy be sacredly observed between
us, in relation to the removal of the treasures.
Even so, wary Seor Velasquez; that the
robbed
old man may lay all censure upon the pirates,
whom you would make the scape-goat of your
treachery to your uncle, and curse them when he
talks of his loss to his sympathizing nephew, if,
haply, he lives to relate the sad story. Well, lead
on, Seor, we follow, he added, sternly.
Call two of your strongest men, said
Velasquez
,
let them accompany us, and command the
rest to stand as close as possible with their weapons
ready for use, in case of alarm; and enjoin upon
them to observe the strictest silence. Now, sir! shall
we move?
Thodore, be alert, our lives depend upon
it, said the chief to his young attendant; and,
followed by two of his men, he approached the
secret
opening, guided by Velasquez, who had
constructed
it for his own private admission into the
vault, when his lavish purse required replenishing;
although, a certain indefinable respect for his name
and respectability among men, prevented him from
openly robbing his benefactor, or removing
sufficiently
large sums to excite suspicion.
Accident, in some of his visits to Jamaica, had
thrown him into the company of the commander of
the schooner, with whom, from a supposed
congeniality
of character, he sought to cultivate an
intimacy. Ignorant of human nature, whose
outward
seeming is often the most false, and anxious
to be regarded by the outlaw as a caballero of
mettle; without knowing his exact character,
and thinking he must assimilate himself to the
false standard of an outlaw set up in his own
mind, he threw into his manner a recklessness,
lawlessness, and ferocity, which was, however,
natural to him, disgusting to the chief, who took no
pains to conceal his contempt for him.
Subsequently
,
a knowledge of a threatened mutiny
among his men, suggested to the dark-minded
man a scheme, not only to gain wealth himself,
without suspicion, or rather, proof of illegal
acquisition
,
but to do the pirate, whose fellowship, like the
cur who is beaten, he coveted the more he was
spurned, a favour that should purchase his good
will.
Putting aside the thick clumps of the oleander,
concealing the secret opening into the vault of the
building, Velasquez and his companions entered the
low-arched room communicating with the
apartment
above, by the shattered stair-case he had
descended on quitting his cousin.
It is too dark to place a foot! Are you provided
with a lantern? he inquired, in a whisper,
carefully
and without noise, closing the door, as the
last man entered.
Here is one, said the seaman nearest him,
opening, at the same time, one side of the night
lantern, with which nearly every man was
provided
.
The guide took it from him, and passing round
the stairs, opened a door he had purposely left
unlocked, and entered a long damp passage,
the extremity of which lay in total darkness. The
outlaw placed his hand upon his stiletto, and
glanced
,
with habitual watchfulness, around him, as he
approached its obscure and suspicious termination.
At the end of the passage, which they crossed with
light footsteps, they passed through another door,
the key of which was in the lock, and entered a
low-vaulted room, directly under the inhabited
wing of the mansion.
The floor was paved with large flat stones, and
7*
besides the door, through which they entered, there
was no perceptible outlet.
Here is the room adjoining the money, said
Velasquez, in a low, husky voice, with his face
averted from the gaze of him whom he addressed.
Be silent; the least noise will betray us:
Hark! did you not hear the report of a gun? No,
it was a movement overhead. The momentary
suspicion and apprehension of detection, which
are the attendants of guilt, passed off, and he
continued,
Look at this wall, sir! you see it is perfectly
smooth; yet through it we pass to my uncle's
gold bags, said he, with a forced smile, as he shook
off his fears, and those qualms of conscience which
tortured even his hardened spirit. Then, pressing
against one of the sides of a large square stone, it
turned half way round, on a concealed pivot, and
displayed a narrow opening on either side.
This is too small; we cannot pass through it,
said the pirate, now speaking for the first time since
entering the vault.
Without replying, Velasquez pressed the sides of
the two lower stones in the same manner, and two
dark, narrow passages, nearly the height of a man,
and so wide, that one could pass sideways, were
opened in the wall.
Holding the lamp, so that it would illuminate
the interior, a narrow, spiral stair-case was
discovered
,
leading both into the upper room, where the
outlet was concealed by a private door, and from
the spot where they stood, into a subterranean vault
beneathconstituting a medium of communication
between the upper room and the vault, and from
the stair-case, by revolving the stones, to the exterior
of the building, by the way the party had entered.
You see, my uncle is a true Spaniard, seor
captain, in his taste for subterranean and secret
passages! said Velasquez. Pity 'tis, his
ingenuity
should not have had eyes to admire it
before
.
He should thank me, by our Lady's benison,
for making known to a man of judgment, like
yourself, his passing skill. See! how secretly he
can descend from his chamber to count his ingots!
though to do the old dotard justice, he possesses not
a miserly soul. This passage in the wall must,
however, be set down to his nephew's ingenuity.
It would astonish the old man, as much as if a
new Roman miracle were hatched, (the saints
pardon
my impiety!) if he should press too heavily
against the sides of his stair-way, and pitch, at
once, into this room. I would give half I expect
to possess this night, to see his aghast features,
when he made the discovery. But I see you are
impatient, seor captain,let us proceed, he
added
hastily, as his companion sprung into the
opening on the staircase; and following him, they
descended into the vault, over which the lamp cast
a dim and uncertain light.
The little room, or cell, in which they now were,
was arched over-headthe walls were constructed
of solid masonry, and there was visible neither
outlet
nor inlet, save, at the foot of the stairs, that
which admitted them.
Around the room, which was about eight feet
square, stood several antique marble urns,
blackened
by age and dampness, which had once
constituted
a part of the ornaments of the villa grounds
in the days of its pride. These urns were covered
with slabs, once capitals and pedestals.
A heavy cedar box, with a cover loosely thrown
over it, stood on one side, while, on a raised floor,
were candlesticks, urns, a tall crucifix, and many
vessels for the altar and festal board, all of massive
silver.
Mines of Peru! but here is a goodly display of
wealth! said the pirate, glancing his eye over the
glittering array before him. Let us see what
these urns contain. Coin of silver! coin of silver!
chains of gold! bracelets! glittering stones, and
gems of price! said he, as he removed one after
another of the slabs which covered them. And
here, in this strong box, he continued, removing
the lid, what have we here? Holy Saint Peter!
but here is a prince's ransom indeed; and the
rough corners of a heap of ingots sparkled with a
thousand points in the rays of the lamp.
Here, Seor Captain, is the prize you seek,
said Velasquez, exultingly, after waiting until he
had surveyed the costly heaps. Let your men
take the box of ingots, the vessels of silver, and the
urn of golden chains, gems, and bracelets; for
my portion, leave me the remaining urns of dollars
though something less than what you shareI
am content with them. But remember your oath
of secrecy.
That will I, Seor Velasquez, said the outlaw,
in a lively tone; and I consent to this division.
The sight of so much wealth, which he had to
lay his hands upon only to possess, and the prospect
of restoring discipline in his fleet, overcame for the
moment his contempt for the tool that served him,
and his regret at taking possession of the wealth of
a defenceless old man. But, he argued, as he
and others, under similar circumstances, had argued
before, if I do not take it, Velasquez will; but I
have sworn on bended knee that a sacred portion
should be reserved for the daughter! Innocence has
been too long the victim of guilt! The last shall
now be subservient to the first. Come, Seor
Velasquez, he said abruptly, aloud, let us to
work. Here, Gaspr, you and Nicols raise this
box; it is weighty, but you were not blessed with
the neck and shoulders of bulls for nothing. No!
not move it? Then lighten ittherethats' well.
Now bear it to the outside, and bid Thodore send
Mateo and Carlos back with yoube silent and
speedy.
The men, placing an open lantern upon the cover
of the box to light them through the dark passage
of the building, disappeared slowly up the stairs
with their heavy burden, while the two principals
who remained, the onewith folded arms leaning
against the side of the vault, and the other, with
his right hand thrust into his bosom, the left
resting
upon a slabstood silently and in darkness
awaiting their return.
CHAPTER III.
The wealth in gold, silver, and jewels, brought away from Mexico
by the Spanish exiles, exceeds belief. Their riches, ultimately, by
presenting
temptation to the lawless and vicious, became the instruments
of their destruction. In some of the West India islands, the military
were often called from their posts to defend remote dwellings, inhabited
by these Spanish Dons, against bands of freebooters.
HISTORY OF REVOLUTIONS IN MEXICO.
A strong proof of Divine oversight in relation to human affairs, is
the entrapping of the guilty in the gins they have set for others. This
retributive system is daily presented to our knowledge. The most
perfect consummation of Divine justice on earth, is, no doubt, when the
criminal receives his just punishment, accidentally, by the hand of his
intended victim.
A SURPRISEVELASQUEZ AND HIS UNCLEA BATTLE WITH
DRAGOONS
LOVE
AT FIRST SIGHTRETREATDEPARTURE OF THE
BUCCANEERS.
After
Velasquez left the apartment of the
insulted
and distressed maiden, her firmness and
womanly indignation forsook her with the object
that called it into existence, and burying her face
in the pillow of her father's couch, she wept bitterly.
Daughter! Constanza! why do you not speak
to me? called the old man in a tremulous voice,
his consciousness gradually returning. My child
weeping! do not weep for me, my dear Constanza.
Iambetterbettermuchquitequite well,
he feebly articulated in a broken voice, which
contradicted
his words. It grieves me to see your
eyes in tears; let me take your hand in mine, m
lma! Tell me why those tears? he inquired,
with parental kindness.
Nay, I weep not, father, replied the lovely girl,
brushing the fast falling tears from her eye-lashes;
now that you are well, I am happy, very happy,
and she laid affectionately her dimpled hand upon
her parent's fevered brow. Oh, I have dreamed
a fearful dream, m lma, suddenly spoke her
father, starting with the recollection. I dreamed
that Velasquez, with a guilty lip, sought to desecrate
your virgin cheek
Nay, nay, my dear father, it was but a dream,
interrupted the blushing girl, with a nervous rapidity
in the tones of her voice. Will you not sleep?
the hour wears late, and I would see you sleep. Oh,
my father, try and sleep for your Constanza's sake
live for your child, she said, as a sense of her
loneliness, if he should be taken from her, coming
vividly to her mind, alarmed her.
I will, I will, daughter. Do you not recollect,
sweet wife, when first I called you mine; you were
young, then, and beautiful; 'tis a great while ago,
and yet you are still as lovely as when crowned a
virgin bride. But methinks time has changed me
strangely! Why do you weep, Isabel? We are not
all alone. Our little daughter is with us. Shall
Constanza not be our earthly blessing? When I
am old and feeble will she not bless our pillow?
Father! father! oh, my dear, dear father! do
you not know your daughter? your own beloved
Constanza, who speaks to you? cried the distressed
girl, as from his wandering language, the
conviction
of her father's danger pressed upon her mind.
Yes, my child, said the aged parent, recovering
from his temporary alienation of mind, you are
indeed Constanza! and she kneeled by his pillow,
and was pressed affectionately to his bosom.
Whilst father and daughter, locked in each other's
arms, presented this lovely and touching picture of
filial and parental love, a low murmuring,
apparently
from the vault beneath, aroused them from
their endearing interchange of affection.
Hist, child! what sounds are those? She
raised her head and listened; and the ringing of
metal, and whispered words came up from below.
Blessed Virgin! there is mischief near, she
cried, in alarm.
Jesu, Jesu Maria! my ingots! my gold!
exclaimed
the old man, clinging with the penurious
characteristic of opulent old age, to that wealth he
could no longer use. There are robbers below!
my child, oh, my child, you are a beggar!
With suddenly bestowed strength he sprang from
his couch, and seizing a pistol hanging near him,
he pressed with his thumb the knob from which he
took it, and a narrow door, hitherto concealed by
the peculiar architecture of the room, flew open,
displaying
the winding stairway leading to the vault,
and at the same instant a light flashed full in his
haggard face from the aperture.
We are discovered! shouted a voice from
below
.
It is the old man! exclaimed Velasquez;
finish himdead men tell no tales; and a click
of a pistol followed the words of the speaker.
What mean you, sir Spaniard, interposed the
deep, manly voice of the pirate; would you do
murder? What fear you from a childish old man?
For shame! put up your pistol. Be lively, men,
he added, with a quicker tone, and convey this
last load to the men without.Stand back, Seor
Velasquez, he cried in a loud voice; attempt to
pass this stair, and, by St. Barabbas! little service shall
this night's treachery do you. Cielos! what is this!
he exclaimed, as the blood spouted from the temples
of the Spaniard, whilst the report of a pistol, levelled
by the old man at the scarcely seen marauders,
thundered in the close vault like the explosion of a
mine. The Spaniard sprung backward, and fell
dead upon the urns of silver, for which he had sold
both honour and life, with a fearful execration upon
his livid lip.
Thus perish treachery by the hand of its
victim
,
exclaimed the pirate. This is likely to be
no small night's work; stand where you are
Senor
,
he added, addressing Don Velasquez, who was
descending the stair-case, there shall no harm
come nigh you; the man you had most to fear has
received the reward of his deeds. Stay your hand,
old man! do you dare me with steel? he
demanded
,
as he struck up from his hands a glittering
rapier
,
he had seized to defend the stairway after
discharging the pistol.
Mother of God! what noise is that without?
onetwothree, pistols! my signal! Ho, Carlos,
Mato, what? he emphatically demanded, as his
two assistants rushed past the old man and leaped
into the vault. What, villains, what? and his
voice rung through the passages.
We are surprised, sir! The report of the pistol,
and the shrieks of some old slaves, were answered
by a shout from a distance. Immediately a blue
light illuminated the barracks, and a musket was
discharged to give the alarm. Just as I came in,
I could already hear the tramp of horses, and the
clanging of armour along the highway. There must
have been mounted troops abroad to be on horse so
soon. This information was given with rapidity
and energy by the seaman.
It is as I feared, said the chief, calmly, the
dragoons
are upon us! and drawing his cutlass,
follow
!
he cried to his men. And as the speediest
way of gaining the outside of the building, he sprang
VOL I.8
up the stairs into the room above, gently putting
the old man aside, as he emerged into the
chamber
.
Save, oh save my father! shrieked his
daughter
,
who had clung to his neck during the scene we
have described, striving to prevent him from
rushing
below, and, who now threw herself upon his
breast, intervening her person as a shield between
the pirate's cutlass and her parent's bosom. Save,
oh spare his life! and she extended her arms
imploringly. Take, take all, but let my father
live.
Fear not, fair maiden, replied the chief in a
tone of deep respect, that fell like the voice of hope
upon her heart, struck with her extraordinary
loveliness
;
do not be alarmed, your lives and honour
are sacred in the hands of Lafitte!
Lafitte
! oh God! shrieked the maiden;
and raised her eyes to heaven, clasped her snowy
fingers and would have fallen, had not the outlaw
caught her in his arms.
Oh my daughter, my daughter! cried the
helpless old man, weakened and nervous from
excitement
,
what will become of you? and
falling
upon his knees before the pirate, he
supplicated
his mercy.
Oh, take all, take allgold, jewels, all, but
leave me my Constanzamy only child! the blest
image of her mother! and the furrowed cheeks
of the old father, as he pleaded for his child, were
running with tears. For the sake of thy
mother
,
he continued, with energy, for the sake of
the blessed Virgin, take not away my only child!
and the old man clasped the knees of the
buccaneer
,
and fell upon his face and wept.
Venerable Seor, rise up, your daughter shall
not be taken from you, replied Lafitte, raising
tenderly the prostrate old man from the ground.
Constanza, when she felt that the pirate
supported
her form, at once, by a strong mental effort, rose
superior to her weakness, and was preparing to
bound from him; but when she saw that he did
not detain her, and that he spoke kindly and
soothingly
to her father, she thought a voice of so much
tenderness, could not belong to so bad a man as the
pirate had been represented to her. And when he
placed her father's form in her arms, she looked up
into the outlaw's face with greater confidence.
Seor, I will believe you, we will trust in you,
for, oh! what else can we do? but go, do go from
us! take the gold you came for, and depart! Leave
me and my father; we can be happy without
wealth; he is too old to use it, and, II care not
for ittake it; it is yours, freely bestowed.
Maiden, he replied, with an embarrassed air,
and a flush like shame suffusing his brow, whilst
the shouts of the dragoons approaching the villa,
rung unheeded in his ears. Maiden, I thank
you, and feel grateful for your confidence; it is not
ill placed. The treasure it is out of my power to
command, or I would return it; it is in the hands
of my men, and at their disposal, not mine. But
here, he added, after an instant's hesitation,
kneeling
,
and taking her hand, which she instantly
withdrew
,
here is a treasure dearer to me than all else
beside! and he gazed with impassioned, yet
respectful
tenderness, upon the pale features of the
surprised girl.
Pardon me, he added with earnestness, as he
observed the maidenly embarrassment, his abrupt
address produced, pardon me, that I make use of
such untimely language, at this moment, but there
is a tumult abroadI hear the ringing of steel, the
shouts of fighting men, and the firing of musketry.
I must speak to you now! Listen to me, lady, I
beseech! See, I am a suppliant at your feet!
Oh Seor, I implore you, think not of me! go!
your men call their chief! Go, you will be taken,
and your life will be sacrificed.
As she spoke, a rich colour played over her cheek,
and mantled her brow, and her dark, up-raised
eye, betrayed deep and strange interest, in the
safety of the piratethe fruit of a struggle between
resentment, and kindness, in her bosom; and her
dishevelled hair, fell, a dark cloud of ringlets, over
her neck and bosom, which heaved like a gently
agitated billow.
Maiden, unless your lips pronounce forgiveness,
without one ray of hope I cannot go. Speak,
Seora, but one word!
I do forgive you, seor, but leave me. Hark,
that shout! delay another moment, and you are
lost.
I will obey you, lady, and leave my cause to
you and heaven! he said, seizing, and pressing
her hand to his lips; then, as the noise without
increased, he drew a pistol from his belt, and
casting
back a lingering look, expressive of mingled
hope and fear, while a smile mantled his handsome
features, he rushed from the apartment on to the
terrace. The next moment, she heard his
footsteps
dying away, in the direction of the sounds of
contest, which from the firing and cries of the
combatants
,
seemed to be already fierce and bloody.
Constanza, as the pirate disappeared, laid her
father's
head upon a pillow, and leaving him to the
troubled sleep, into which he had sunk from
exhaustion
,
leaned from the window, and looked
forth upon the lovely moon, which, in its nightly
watch, never shone upon a sweeter face.
The sounds of conflict had receded till they
were lost in the distance; and all was still and
motionless, save a few white clouds sailing along
the blue heavens, a slight waving of the foliage
about the window; and the irregular heaving of
her bosom.
She stood, and communed with her own
thoughts. Strange! stange, said she, mentally,
but that voice, so rich, and full of tenderness!
how my heart bounded, when I heard him address
my poor father! where can I have heard it? How
singularly it affected me! and can he be Lafitte?
that dreadful man! proscribed among mena
price set upon his head! hated, shunned, and
feared by all! Yet, how very noble looking he is,
and so humane! And his eyes, how dark and
piercing. He is certainly, very handsome! But,
and her cheek paled, as she gave utterance to her
thoughts, oh, holy Virgin, I fear him, the
language
he used! oh, lost, lost Constanza! If
beloved
by this outlaw, better have been the bride of
Velasquez, than thetheoh, dear Madonna,
help now, for I know not what to do! and she
covered her face with her hands, and the tears
forced their way through her taper fingers.
Oh that Alphonse were here, she at length
continued; my own Alphonse! Dreary weeks
he has been absent, and yet he comes not. How
have I watched day after day, for the glimmer of
his white sails, upon the horizon. Oh, that he
were here to-night! when, when, will he come?
and she rung her hands, and leaned despondingly
upon the window.
Suddenly, the report of a pistol, followed by the
sound of running feet, and now and then, a cry,
as of men pursuing and pursued, startled her from
her reverie; and instantly, the scenes she had gone
through, passed vividly before her mind, and she
awoke, at once, to a full consciousness of the
loneliness
,
and utter helplessness of her situation.
Hastening, instantly, as the noise increased, to
the side of her father, as though protection could
8*
be found in his feeble arm, she awaited, like the
panting fawn, with throbbing heart, and alarmed
eye, the coming danger. The sounds came
nearer
and nearer, and the hasty tread of armed men
was heard upon the terrace, followed by a heavy
sound, as if one had leaped, at a bound, from
the ground on to the piazza. Hardly had
Constanza
time to move from the surprised attitude
in which those appalling sounds arrested her, or
conjecture their nature, when, springing in through
the window, which she had just left to cling to
her father, Lafitte once more stood before her.
His eye was illuminative with a fierce light, his
lip was compressed, and blood was upon his brow
and hand, which grasped a dripping cutlass.
Oh God! oh God! shrieked the terrified girl,
as this sudden apparition appeared before her, and
fell senseless upon the floor. The outlaw though
closely pursued, paused for an instant, with
indecision
,
and then, hastily raised her with the air
of one, who had, at the moment, decided upon a
certain mode of conduct. Scarcely had he lifted
her drooping form upon his muscular arm, when
the window was filled with soldiers, thirsty for the
blood of the daring outlaw.
Back, sirs; or, by the holy God, I will bury
this weapon in this maiden's bosom! he cried in a
resolute tone; and he grasped his cutlass near the
point, shortening it, like a stiletto, and elevated
his arm.
The soldiers hesitated to enter.
What, cowards! do you value a girl's life, when
Lafitte is the prize? said the fierce voice of their
leader; follow me! and he sprung in at the
windowto fall back upon his men, a stiffened
corpse; while the report of a pistol, discharged behind
Lafitte, rung through the room.
Ha Carlos! is that you? said Lafitte, as he
looked round to see from whence the shot was
fired.
Yes, Seor, he hastily replied, escape through
the old man's doordown the stairsand out
through the passage. I have just passed through,
and the coast is clear. I will keep the red devils at
bay, said he quickly.
Good, my Carlosbut the old man! we cannot
leave him, and he pointed to the couch.
Little will he know whether he be taken or left.
The old man's commission has run out, said he,
laying his rough hand upon the cold temples of
the old SpaniardDead, dead enough, seor!
Poor, poor child, how will she bear it! said
Lafitte with interestHow now, he added quickly,
here they come like so many blood-hounds.
The soldiers without, who were engaged in loud
and noisy altercation among themselves, as to who
should first enter and seize the outlaw, now
hailed with a shout the sound of hoofs, and the
ringing of sabres and spurs, announcing a
reinforcement
.
This fair girl must be my breast-platedash
out that light, and follow me! cried the pirate;
and springing through the secret door, he
disappeared
with his lovely burden. Carlos darted after
him and hastily closed the door, which received a
shower of bullets from half a dozen horse pistols,
levelled at his retreating form.
Well done, Carlos, said Lafitte, approvingly;
now open your lantern and lead the way.
Rapidly traversing the dark passages, they soon
left behind them the sounds of rage and
disappointment
,
vented by their pursuers on entering the
room, and finding their victims had escaped in
some mysterious manner.
That torch here, William! said the dragoon
officer, how in the devil could he have escaped!
There is no sign of an outlet herehe must be in
league with Beelzebub to have slipped away thus.
Ha! who is this?old Don Velasquez!and dead
too!Poor old soldiermoney, daughter, life,
all in one hour! But mount men, mount! to
horse!this outlaw has escaped by some
subterranean
passage in this old Spanish houseand will
double upon us like an old hareHo! surround the
houseto horse! Leaping from the window
he bounded across the gallery, and mounted,
followed
by half a score of his followers; and putting
spurs to his horse, he made a rapid sweep around
the dwelling.
But before his pursuers had taken horse, Lafitte
threaded the subterranean passages of the
building
,
and emerged from the secret door into the
bright moonlight, and with the speed of the hunted
stag, crossed the open lawn and entered the
avenue which led towards the sea-shore. This path
was exposed for some distance, to the eye of an
observer, from the piazza of the villa, and as the
dragoons completed their survey of the grounds
immediately surrounding the house, and met at the
end of the wing, near the tamarind tree,the white
robes of the maiden glared upon the eyes of the
leader.
As I thoughton! there is our game, he cried,
burying his spurs deep into the horses flanks, and
dashing down the avenue, like the wind, followed
at speed by his troop.
Carlos, cried Lafitte, as he heard the shout,
announcing to him that they were on his track.
Now we must put forth all our energies, my brave
man. You know the pathgo before and we
will yet distance themfly!and on they went
with the rapidity of deer, with the hounds but a
bound behind them,passing under treescrossing
from avenue to avenue, and endeavouring, by a
straight line, to gain the cliff instead of following
the windings of the paths which were open to the
cavalry. Breathless they flew, and at every turn,
and opening in the shrubbery, the feet and voices of
their pursuers were heard nearer and nearer.
Now, captain, we are at the end of the grounds,
and here is the gatestoop, sir, said Carlos, darting
under the hedge, from which their ebony guide had
crawled early in the evening, to conduct them on
their expedition.
Thank God! we are safe at lastthey cannot
pass that barrier, exclaimed Lafitte, as he paused
a moment, to breathe on the outer side of the hedge,
and this fair maiden! he added with sympathy,
she is yet unconscious!
Now, Carlos, once through this wood, without
being intercepted, and we are safeforward! he
said, in an assured tone; and raising his lifeless
burden, he moved swiftly through the forest, while
the shouts and execrations of their pursuers, as they
found their prey had eluded their pursuit, rung in
their ears.
The fugitives had nearly gained the cliff, when
a sudden galloping on their left, told them that their
pursuers had found a way to clear the hedge.
Looking back, they discovered their arms gleaming
through the trees, and the whole troop dashing
forward
in full cry.
Drawing his belt tighter around him, bringing
his cutlass hilt to his grasp, and changing his still
lifeless burden to the other arm, with renewed speed,
the outlaw bounded through the dark glades of the
forest. Every moment lessened his distance from
his pursuersand just as he was ascending a slight
eminence, commanding a view of the sea, and
near the verge of the cliff, beneath which their
vessel laythe foremost horseman was within pistol
shot of them.
Surrender, sir pirate! surrender! he shouted
as he levelled his long pistol, and deeper plunged his
spurs into the sides of his foaming steed; the next
instant horse and rider would have been upon the
buccaneer, when drawing a pistol from his girdle,
and half turning in his flight, he fired upon the
dragoon. The ball sunk into the forehead of his
horse, which, with one plunge forward, fell lifeless
upon his riderand the ball of his pistol, which he
discharged while falling, passed through the cap of
the pirate. The remainder of the troop were close
upon him, but the fate of their comrade, for a
moment
checked their speed.
Hold there, for your lives, men! shouted
their commanding officer who had been outridden
by his troopand now came uphold, do not fire,
but surround and take him. It were better
that he should escape, than that fair girl should be
injured.
A hundred guineas to him, he added who
captures him, dead or alivebut if the lady suffer
harm, let him who gives the blow, beware!
The soldiers sullenly returned their pistols to their
holsters and drew their swords. But there were now
other objects on which to exercise them; for at the
same moment appeared a party of the pirate's crew,
armed with cutlasses and fire-arms, who, leaving the
schooner, and marching inland, on hearing the signal
for succour made by their comrades, were returning,
without meeting with themthey having, with the
exception of Lafitte, gained the shore by another
route, with the loss of two of their number, shot
down by the dragoons, and a portion of their booty.
Striking their cutlasses against their pistols, with a
loud noiseand cheering each other with shouts,
they came on at a rapid pace, and before the
dragoons
could draw and cock their fire-arms to meet
this new enemy, they were fired upon with fatal
effect, by the advancing buccaneers. Here and
there, a rider fell from his steed at the discharge,
while the wounded animals fled with wild cries
through the forest.
On, on! revenge for our comrades! cried the
pirates, pressing forward to close with them; creeping
under the horses, and passing their cutlasses up
through their bodiesdragging the riders, by main
force from their seats, or springing behind them,
and hurling them bodily to the ground. For a few
moments men and horse, were mingled in a
sanguinary
and dreadful mele.
The leader of the buccaneers did not, however,
derive any personal advantage from this
reinforcement
;
for the captain of dragoons, dismounting,
as the pirates made their desperate charge, cried,
Have at you, sir pirate, for my own pleasure,
and rescue of that lady; advancing, as he spoke,
with his drawn sword upon his antagonist, who,
from the time he had killed the horse and
dismounted
the dragoonfor a moment checking the
pursuit
had
stood at bay, and facing his foes,
determined
to fight his way, step by step, to his vessel.
His eye lighted up with pleasure, as he heard the
challenge of the leader of the dragoonsa tall,
gentlemanly-looking
Englishman, with an herculean
frame, and a strikingly military air.
Anxious to get safe to his schooner his lovely
shield, whom he internally resolved should be
forever
his, although he had first taken her up to favour
his own escape, when, closely pursued, he retreated
to the villahe still moved slowly backward, facing
his advancing foe. In his left arm he supported
Constanza, her unconscious head laid upon his
shoulder, while he wielded his formidable cutlass in
his right hand, upon which he received the ringing
steel of the officer.
In vain the Englishman used every device of art,
and each favourite ruse, and as uselessly did he
follow blow on blow, with tremendous force. The
pirate coolly received his descending weapon upon
his cutlass at every stroke, and acting only on the
defensive, still retreated steadily to the verge of the
cliff.
Now have at you, sir Englishman! he cried,
as he reached the head of the defile leading to his
vessel. Now have at you, in my turn. If you
love Lafitte so well, he will give you a lasting mark
of his friendship. So, there! he added, suddenly
and emphatically, as the officer, at first making a
feint, aimed a heavy blow at his head, which he
intended
should be his
coup de grace
. So,
there!
and while he received his antagonist's sword upon
his own guard, by a peculiar motion of his cutlass,
with the same movement of his arm, he whirled it
from his grasp high into the air, and making a
sweep over his head, his rapid cutlass whistling
through the air, descended and nearly severed the
left arm of the Englishman from his body. The
officer groaned, and fell heavily upon the ground,
while Lafitte descended with rapidity the narrow
defile to his schooner.
Ho! Thodore! are you there, my boy? he
said, as he saw the slight form of the youth upon
the deck; receive this lady, and convey her to the
starboard state-room, and try to restore her. Jacques,
be out of this place as soon as possible.
The anchor is apeak, sir, replied his lieutenant;
and the boat is ahead with a tow-line: shall we
move, sir?
No, no! hold on, here come the men! Spring
aboard, every one of you! The seamen came
hastily down the gorge, leaving two-thirds of their
number behind them, while the voices of the
soldiers
were heard in full cry in pursuit, some bearing
wounded comrades, and others portions of the booty,
the most of which, was already safely got on board.
As soon as the last man touched the deck, the
commander
uttered his orders for making sail with
rapidity.
Hoist away the jib and mainsail; set the
top-gallant-sails
and royals; we must make every thing
tell! Give way, men! he shouted to the manned
boat ahead; steadily! there she moves! bear off
from that crag! bend to those spars, men! now she
moves! Pull heartily and cheerily, men, or we shall
be intercepted by a guarda costa!
A curse upon this night's work, he said to
himself
,
turning and walking aft as the schooner yielded
to the efforts of the crew. This is well called the
Devil's Punch Bowl, and he is likely to have us all
for ingredients, for his next bumper.
In a few moments the dark-hulled schooner, under
the sweeps, the slightly drawing royals, and by the
aid of the tow-boat, glided swiftly over the black,
glassy flood, and in a few minutes, moved through
the narrow entrance of the basin into the open bay.
Rapidly passing, with a strengthening breeze, the
needles or pinnacles of rock which girted the little
harbour, her tall masts covered with clouds of
canvass
,
and bounding with a lively motion before the
night-breeze, she left behind her the land, and the
scenes of death and desolation her presence had
created
,
and swiftly and steadily stood for the open sea.
VOL. I.9
CHAPTER IV.
No reflecting man can gaze upon a field of carnage, with its
disfigured
and gory corses, without feeling ashamed of his species! If a
proud man, his pride will be humbled.
To find desolation and death, where we anticipate the calm bliss
of domestic peace and happiness, is a trial few minds are prepared to
encounter.
Spectator
.
Theirs was no hasty love, to bear for its bitter fruit a long
repentance
.
Maria of Meissen
.
AN ARRIVALSCENE AFTER A CONFLICTA MELANCHOLY
SPECTACLEREVENGE PURPOSED.
The
round, white moon was just fading into the
western skies, and the well-defined outline of the
peak of St. Catharine was delicately gilded by the
yet unrisen sun, while a roseate tint mantled half
the eastern heavens, the morning subsequent to the
scenes and adventures related in the preceding
chapters, when a little white spot on the horizon
attracted the attention of the wounded officer of
dragoons, as, under the refreshing influence of the
morning breeze, he recovered from the swoon into
which he had fallen from loss of blood, after being
struck down by the buccaneer.
Casting his eyes over the distant sea, he
appeared
to watch the speck with much interest; and
surprise
was manifest on his features, when, instead of
receding, he perceived that it enlarged, and evidently
approached the island.
Can the buccaneer be returning! he
exclaimed
;
but he might as well finish me, as leave me
so! and as he spoke, he raised, with a melancholy
smile, his mutilated arm. Well, Captain Adair,
he continued, you may hang your sword upon the
willow nowthis Lafitte has done for you! But
that cannot be the pirate neither, he said, in a
changed
and eager tone; his was a schooner, although
she carried royals, like a sloop of war. Ha! there
is another sail in her wakea smaller craftwhat
can they be? There! the larger veers a littletwo,
three mastsshe's a ship under topsails, and the
other's a schooner, a tender perhaps. But yet he's
not a John Bull! and after a few minutes silence,
during which the anguish of his wound overcame
every other feeling, he continued
It is either a Frenchman or an American; but
what can she want here? Ha, there fly Monsieur's
colours!
The vessels, which attracted the notice of the
officer, were now plainly visible, about two leagues
from the land. She was a large frigate, displaying
the ensign of France at her peak, and the same
national distinction also fluttered at the mast head
of the schooner. Standing into the bay before a free
breeze, with royals and sky-sails towering aloft, and
lower studding-sails set on both sides, in less than an
hour from the time she appeared a mere speck, like
the flash of a sea-gull's wing on the horizon, she had
passed the capes of the bay. Running close into
the land, and furling one sail after another, she
gracefully rounded to, and, accompanied by the
tender
,
came to an anchor opposite the entrance of the
recess, denominated the Devil's Punch Bowl,
and within the shadow of a gigantic rock, to which
nature had given the outline of a huge granite
fortress.
This vast mass rose abruptly over her tall masts,
in enormous beetling heads, crags, and precipices,
leaving a narrow belt of white sand at its base,
upon
which the waves of the bay peacefully unrolled
themselves, when the winds were low, but over
which they leaped in a storm, thundering against
the cliff, and roaring in the caverns, with terrific
sublimity. As the last sail was furled closely to its
yard, the dragoon saw a small boat put off from the
frigate, manned by four men and a steersman.
An officer in a naval undress, with the insignia of
the rank of a French captain upon his breast and
collar, leaned back in the stern sheets, as the boat
moved swiftly over the water, gazing upwards upon
the giant rock, rearing its dark mass against the
sky,admiring its castellated outline, and its
dizzy crags, springing several hundred feet into the
air.
The oarsmen pulled rapidly in to the beach at
the base of the cliff, whose projecting verge, as they
passed into its dark shadow, suddenly hid them
from the eyes of the wounded officer.
Lay to your oars briskly, menone strong pull
morethere, we strike! said the French officer,
as the boat, with a grating sound, grounded upon
the beach, running half her length out of the water,
on to the hard white sand.
The men shipped their oars and sprung out,
respectfully raising their caps, as their officer passed
by them in stepping ashore, and then turned to
secure
the boat from the action of the tide.
Delaying a moment to arm themselves with
sabres and pistols, which they took from the stern,
they hastily buckled them around their waists, and
stood ready to follow their officer.
While his men were thus engaged, under the
command of the cockswain---a mere boy in the
uniform
of a midshipman-- the officer stood a moment,
awaiting their movements, gazing, with folded arms
and thoughtful eye, upon the fine appearance his
motionless frigate exhibited, as, towering above the
dark hull, her lofty masts and slender spars
appeared
drawn with the accuracy of pencilling, against
the sky.
He was a slightly-formed man, rather below
than above the medium height of men, with a
strikingly-elegant figure, finely displayed and
relieved
,
by his blue frock and dark green cloak,
falling
negligently back from his shoulders in graceful
folds. His forehead was high and expansive, over
which, as, for a moment, he raised his velvet cap to
meet the cool breezes from the sea, flowed, with
almost
feminine luxuriance, thick clusters of dark
auburn hair. That softness of character, which this
peculiarity anticipated, was, however, contradicted by
the intellectual fulness of his brow, and the firm
expression
of his blue eye, which, although it might
droop before a maiden's gaze, could flash proudly
back the glance of a foe.
One lock of his hair seemed trained to lie over
his forehead, and relieved the otherwise too perfect
oval contour of his face. His complexion, naturally
fair, was a little sun-browned, by exposure to the
sun and seas of many climes; yet a healthy hue
glowed upon his cheeks, while his upper lip was
graced with a mustacho of the same rich colour of
his hair. His lips were full, and rather voluptuous
in their finely-curved outline, but, without any
approach
to sensuality. The general expression of
his features, when in repose, as they now were,
was intellectual, and, perhaps, melancholy. He
might be above thirty years of age, though the
juvenile and extreme beauty of his noble forehead,
the suddenly-mantling cheek, and the curve of his
mouth and chin, which a Heb might have envied,
would indicate, that he had seen even fewer
summers
.
He would, in the eyes of a romantic maiden,
have been the Raleigh of the days of Elizabeth
the Ivanhoe of chivalry.
9*
We are ready, monsieur, said the youthful
cockswain, as he drew closer the belt that confined
his weapons.
Follow me, then, Montville; the men may all
remain; and seehe said, turning to them, that
you make no brawl with these Englishmen, as
before
!
Those soldiers who felt your Gallic knocks,
may take occasion to follow up their quarrel. If
they approach, shove off at once, and lay on your
oars beyond musket-shot.
Ay, ay, sir, replied the men, putting their
shoulders to the boat, and floating her; while their
commanding officer, followed by his favourite
midshipman
,
crossed the smooth belt of sand, and
winding rapidly around the base of the overhanging
crags, came to a part where the descent was less
precipitous. By the aid of branches, and jutting
irregularities of the rock, they ascended the cliff,
and, without pausing to glance at the magnificent
panorama of woodland, sea, and mountain, spread
out around them, entered a grove of pimento,
whose deep green hue, presented a fine contrast to
the unrivalled beauty of the lighter-tinged verdure
underneath.
Their way lay by natural and artificial paths,
through clumps of foliage of every variety and
brilliancy of colours, now brightly tinted, as the
sun-light shone through an occasional opening
above, now black, in the impenetrable shadows cast
by the loftier forest trees. After issuing from the
grove, they wound through luxuriant bowers of
West Indian vines, past a palm-tree, standing in
lonely and towering pride, and spreading cocoas,
and brazilettos, mingled with the vivid dyes of the
plumage of the bamboo, orange, and tamarind,
the whole presenting, in the brightness of the
morning
,
a gorgeousness of colouring, unknown to less
genial climes.
They had now reached the hedge of aloes and
palmetto, forming the boundary of the grounds
surrounding
the villa of Velasquez.
Winding around it in a direction contrary to that
taken by the depredators of the preceding night,
they soon came to a small, latticed gateway, partly hid
in the hedge, and close to the unoccupied wing of the
mansion. The gate, which his young companion
was hastening forward to unlock with a small key
handed him by the officer, was battered in pieces,
and the dead body of a seaman lay in the
threshhold
,
with a fragment of a dragoon's sword, half
buried in his head.
Mon Dieu!what mischief has been here?
exclaimed the officer, stooping to examine the
features
of the dead man. He is a Spaniard, and
by his garb and arms, no doubt, a pirate. Cold,
and stiff! he added, touching his temples, he
has been long dead.---Allons! allons! he cried to
his companion, bounding through the broken
gateway
God
preserve dear Constanza!and both
drawing their swords, they rushed up the avenue,
every few rods of which exhibited traces of a recent
and severe fight.
By the body of a horse lay a dead dragoon,
with the blood oozing from a pistol-wound in his
head, grasping, convulsively, the body of a Spanish
sailor. Although a deep gash cleft his cheek, he
still lived, while a consciousness of the
death-grapple
in which he was held, overcoming the pain of
his wound, he writhed his features into a terrible
expression of horrorhis black, lustrous eyes, rolled
wildly in their sockets, and his feeble fingers vainly
worked to release the vice-like grasp of the dead
man.
Oh, Seores, for the love of God, help me! Ay
de miAy de mi!Ave Maria! and he extended
his arms, imploringly.
The officer arrested his rapid progress to the
house; his humane feelings overcoming his desire
to proceed; and, perhaps, he was at the same time
anxious to learn the nature and full extent of the
bloody signs surrounding him.
Hold, Montville! let us aid this wretch, he
said, arrested by the imploring language of the
sufferer. What a fearful embrace! With their
united efforts, but not without the exercise of great
muscular exertion, they disengaged the arms of the
dead man from around the living body of his foe
who, during the slow-moving hours of the long
night, had borne such unspeakable tortures. How
fearfully was the dead avenged! clasping in his
close embrace the breathing body of his slayer!
What, monsieur? inquired his deliverer, as
the buccaneer grasped his cloak, and gave way to
a shower of tears, unable to express, in language,
his gratitude. What means all this bloody work?
You, it seems, should know something of it! and
his cheek and eye betrayed the intensest
excitement
as he spoke. Speak, speak! he reiterated, as
the man held up his clasped hands in silence:
Answer, man! or, by Heaven! I will give you to
a worse fate, than the arms of this dead soldier.
The man shuddered at the allusion, and his eyes
glared with terror.
Mercy! Seor, mercy! he cried, clinging to
his cloak, without looking up.
The impatient officer drew a pistol from his
bosom, with a threatening air, when the Spaniard,
with difficulty and hesitation, articulated,
Lafitte!
He has been
here?
rapidly interrogated the
officer. Where is Don Velasquez, and his
daughter
?
I know not, Seor; yo no s, yo no s
The officer, without hearing more, freed his
cloak from his grasp, and darted forward, passing
by pistols, cutlasses, and a portion of the pirate's
booty, thrown away, in their flight. The sward
was cut up, with the feet of horses, and blood
reddened
the green surface of the avenue, in many
places. In a few moments, after leaving the
Spanish
sailor, they ascended the terrace, and came, at
once, upon the scene of the severest conflict. With
a sword in one hand, and a pistol in the other, the
officer leaped over the dead bodies of two soldiers,
and a headless seaman, and rushing to the front of
the house, flew along the piazza, to an open window
in the farthest wing. The sight that here met his
eyes appalled him!
Upon a couch, in the extremity of the
apartment
,
lay the corpse of the old man, cold and rigid.
The floor was covered with pools of blood, and the
dead body of a dragoon, with a pistol-wound in the
forehead, lay under the window.
A deadly sickness came over his soul, as he
gazed upon the horrid spectaclehis hand fell
powerless, at his side, and he leaned against the
window for support.
His more youthful companion, sprung into the
room, and laid his hand upon the heart of the old
man; but pulsation had ceased!
He has been a long while dead, he said.
Dead! mournfully repeated the officer, half
unconsciously, dead, is heand poor Constanza!
is she living? or worse? he added, in a hollow
voice. Oh, merciful heaven, blast me not, at one
stroke, and so cruel a one!
To the rescue, to the rescue! after a
moment's
silence, he suddenly shouted, in a voice like
a trumpet, ho! my men, all!Alas, alas,
Constanza
!
he added, in a changed voice, vain, vain,
all in vainbutthereis
revenge!
he slowly,
and with strange distinctness, articulated. I will
revenge you, terribly revenge you, and his eye
lighted up with a fierce light, his form dilated, and
his glowing features wore a fearful sublimity as he
spoke.
Approaching the couch, he placed his hand
upon the marble brow of the corpse.
Seor Velasquez, your death, your grievous
wrongs, shall be avenged. I make this cause of
mine and yours, a sacred one! and he kissed, as
he spoke, the cold forehead, and the crucifix, which,
grasped in the old man's hand, lay upon his breast,
You have not died, by ball or steeldeep griefs
have killed you. Terribly! most terribly, you shall
be avenged!
Ha! what more? he exclaimed, as distant
voices, and the tramp of horses' feet fell upon his
ear. Springing to the window he saw, wheeling
rapidly around the ruined wing of the building, a
troop of horsemen, who drew up on the terrace,
while their leader dismounting, and followed by
two or three of his men, hastily approached the
gallery.
The Frenchman immediately stepped forth to
meet them.
What, who have we here? he exclaimed,
cocking a pistol, which he had drawn from his
holsters, as he alighted; but, observing the
gentlemanly
air of the stranger, and detecting his naval
attire, he modulated his tone, to one of more
courtesy
.
Your pardon, Monsieur! you are the Count
D'Oyley, commander of the French frigate, in the
bay, if I mistake not?
The stranger bowed.
This has been an unpleasant business, he
continued; a party of buccaneers, with Lafitte at
their head, came last night, in strong force, robbed
the old man, who, also, I am told, is dead, shot his
nephew, and carried off his daughter. We have
been out, part of the night, in pursuit of them.
Since our return, we find that, after a hard fight
with another detachment, he escaped to his vessel,
with the old Don's child, and immediately put out
to sea.
Are you ill, sir? he inquired, observing the
face of the officer grow pale at his recital.
No, Monsieur, no! replied the Count,
recovering
himself; I thank you, for the interest you
have taken in this affair. The old Castillian and
his daughter, were not unknown to me. He once
saved me from a conspiracy, aimed against my life.
It was in Mexico. He now lies in that room,
dead; and his daughterOh, Alphonse, Alphonse,
where were you, in that evil hour?But there is
vengeance, said he, looking upward, there is
just vengeance of Heaven, and I will be its
instrument
!
Adieu, Monsieur; I leave the burial of Se
or Velasquez to your kindness. I must away!
the business, which brought me here, is ended
alas, how ended! Adieu, Monsieur, he said,
warmly pressing the hand of the sympathizing
Englishman. Then hastily descending to the
terrace
,
Messieurs, adieu! he added, raising his
cap, as he passed the mounted dragoons; and then
silently, and rapidly, accompanied by his young
friend, he hastened to the shore.
After walking steadily onward, for many
minutes
,
they emerged from the forest, on to the bluff,
and on turning an angle in their path, encountered
the officer whom Lafitte had wounded. He was
slowly moving towards the villa, faint and weary.
Gentlemen, for the love of God,! a little water!
I am dying of thirst! he said, addressing them as
they appeared.
Again the humanity of the stranger, was called
into exercise; and for the moment, forgetting his
own sorrow, in sympathy for the distressed soldier,
he stopped, kindly supported him to the shade of a
large tree, and despatched his companion back,
to communicate his situation to the party at the
villa.
Can you tell me aught of Lafitte? he
inquired
of the wounded man, as they awaited his
return.
Much, much, he replied, he has left his
mark, as he calls it, here! and pointing, as he
spoke, to his mutilated arm, he attempted to smile.
You saw him, then! did he gain his vessel, as
they tell me, with, with, and he hesitated, while
his chest beat with emotion.
Yes, I both saw and felt him! He fought like
a tiger at bay, a better swordsman never handled
steel. Had he been less than Lafitte, or the devil,
he would not have escaped mebut he did
escape
me.
Andand, with him? The Frenchman
could say no more; his tongue cleaved to the roof of
his mouth; but he was understood.
The lady, whom we, at the post, call the
Castillian
nun, the Seorita Constanza! but she had
fainted, and was unconscious of her situation,
replied
the dragoon.
Oh, my God, my God! ejaculated his
listener
,
and groaning, he struck his temples fiercely and
bitterly; and, deeply agitated, he paced the ground
under the tree, in silence, until the arrival of
Montville
and a party of the wounded man's troop.
Describe his craft, if you please! he asked, of
the dragoon, as he turned to go.
A schooner with a fore royallong, black, and
very low in the water, with the masts much
raking.
Bowing his thanks, he pursued his way, along
the cliff, with increased rapidity, and recklessly
descending to his boat, he was, in a few moments,
on the deck of his frigate.
His orders were given, to get under weigh, with
a startling energy that surprised the crew, and
infused into them additional activity. In a
few seconds, the heavy anchor hung from the
bows, the broad top-sails were unloosed, and
extended
to the breeze, and the tall masts, covered
with folds of canvass. The commander, then
accompanied
by Montville, left the ship, for the
schooner, which also, immediately got under weight.
At first, the frigate moved slowly and heavily,
but gradually gathering power, as sail after sail
was displayed to the wind, she increased her speed,
the waves dashed from her foaming path, and with
a velocity that seconded the impatience of their
commander, the two vessels sailed out of the bay,
and stood westward.
The schooner, which now contained the
commander
of the frigate, immediately after gaining
the offing, sailed in the direction of Carthagena,
while the frigate hauled her wind, and bore up for
the island of St. Domingo.
VOL. I.10.
CHAPTER V.
What tidings from the camp?
Heavy and full of wo, my lady.
Speak! does my father live? was he unharmed amid the dread
encounter of opposing hosts?
Lady, I grieve to tell the fatal news I bearyour noble sire
Is ?
Alasno more!
AT SEAA PIRATE'S CABINREMORSE
SOLILOQUY--STATE-ROOM
CAPTOR
AND CAPTIVE.
The
pirate's schooner, which had now become
the prison of the hapless Constanza, had long
passed the capes of the bay, into which it had
so gallantly sailed a few hours previousand the
outline of the mountains of Jamaica, were rapidly
fading in the distance, before the outlaw, assured
that there was no danger of being immediately
pursued, prepared to leave the deck of his vessel.
Keep her away Ricardo, with every thing she
can bear, for Barritaria, he said, addressing the
helmsmanand call me if you see any thing
suspicious; and before descending the
companion-way
,
he cast one piercing glance around the
horizon
.
Ha! a sail, and dead ahead! he exclaimed,
as his practised eye rested upon a scarcely visible
gray speck upon the horizon, in the direction of his
vessel's course. Anothertwo! Keep her away a
point, and let us reconnoitre them, he added, taking
his spy-glass, and closely surveying the distant
objects.
The schooner kept steadily on her way,
close-hauled
to the wind, while the strangers came down
upon them, with the wind nearly aft.
As they approached nearer, the foremost one
showed the square rig of a large vessel, with royals
and studding-sails set. In less than an hour from
the time they caught the pirate's eye, they were
within half a mile to leeward of the schoonerfor
at such a disadvantage had the pirate cautiously
thrown her, by altering his course,and distinctly
displayed the tall and majestic apparel of a ship
of war.
A tiger, sir! said Thodore, his young
proteg
,
after gazing at the ship for a moment, from
the top of a gun-carriage, through a focus, formed
by his diminutive fistsher teeth glisten like
Cudjoe's, here; and he looked toward the ungainly
figure of the slave, who, with one long arm clinging
to a stay, his head and body bent forward, and his
lips drawn back with an admiring grin, was
inspecting
with much curiosity, the noble, and
warlike
spectacle which the strange sail exhibited.
Do you know her, Seor? inquired the
helmsman
,
with deference in his manner.
I think not, Jean, he replied musinglybut
she and her little tender seem to walk past us, as if
disdaining to wet their cut-water with the same salt
spray, which our pretty craft throws about her so
merrily. Do you recognize her, Ricardo?
She is, I believe, seor, the French frigate
Le
Sultan
, that we saw going into Carthagena, as we
were getting under weigh off Las Naranjas.
Indeed! said the buccaneer, looking for a
moment
steadily at the passing ship. I suspect you
are rightshe was accompanied by a schooner
her yards are not square enough for an American:
an Englishman she is not; she is too light rigged,
and carries whiter canvass than John Bull. I
suspect
you are right, Ricardo.
I know her, captain, by the length between her
mizen and mainmast, and the rake of her
main-royal-mast
,
as if it had been sprung, said the
helmsman.
You have a seaman's eye, Jean, and you are
right too, he quickly added, as the stranger showed
two or three lightsthat reads `France!' But we
have no time to dally in returning compliments.
Hold to your course again, sir, he said, turning to the
helmsman.
The schooner came closer to the wind, and rapidly
held on in the direction from which she had
diverged
to avoid the strange ship, which, lowering
her lights, silently and majestically with her
companion
,
moved onward, apparently standing into the
bay from which the schooner had just taken her
departure.
Thodore, how is our fair prisoner? he
inquired
,
as he descended into his cabin,
accompanied
by his young officer.
She sleeps, sir, replied he, in a low voice.
Poor girl, I almost wish she might not wake
again to know her wretchedness, he said,
feelingly
.
It is my fate to bring ruin upon all around
me. Has she spoken, or been conscious of her
situation
?
he abruptly inquired of the youth.
I think not, sir, he answered. By the aid
of old Juana, who sympathizes with the
misfortunes
of the maiden, she was soon recovered from
her death-like swoon, but directly passed out of it
into a deep sleep. She is very lovely, Seor! he
added, with sudden animation.
Poor lady; said the outlaw, sadly, I did not
mean to take you from your father's bosom. But
he was already dead!And who slew him? My
act, if not my hand! But I will seek to atone for
the father's wrongs, by treating the daughter with
all honour. Leave me, Thodore, I would be
alone, he added aloud.
The iron swinging lamp, suspended above, cast
a bright light over the cabin, and its furniture.
The sides were pannelled with a dark-coloured,
West Indian wood; the floor was of the same
material
,
and hard and polished, like marble. The
ceiling was low, and crossed at intervals by beams.
Pistols and cutlasses, arranged in fanciful figures,
were hung around the walls, and stands of muskets
and boarding-pikes lined two sides of the room.
On a case, which stood in one corner, lay two or
three steel caps, for boardersa blunderbuss with
a muzzle like the mouth of a bugle, stilettoes, and
the various paraphernalia appertaining to a vessel,
whose trade is war. On the side opposite to the
companion-way
,
a door opened into a state-room situated
farther astern, and now occupied by Constanza.
On a pin near the companion-way, hung the full
dress of a Spanish naval officer. Various dresses
of citizens, soldiers, and seamen, were suspended
near it, constituting a wardrobe well adapted to one,
whose mode of life compelled him, not unfrequently,
to adopt disguises, adapted to his purposes. Rolls
of charts, elegant rapiers, iron-handled broad-swords,
canes, and a rifle, stood in a corner, and several
articles
of the ordinary apparel of seamen, lay about
on camp stools; several of which, with an oval table
in the centre, a tall pedestal sustaining a handsome
compass, constituted the only furniture of the
apartment
.
At the table, in the midst of the cabin, and within
the dark circle cast beneath by the bottom of
the lamp, sat Lafitte, his features so far thrown
into shadow, that their expression was in a great
degree concealed.
10*
With his forehead resting upon his hand he
leaned upon the table, in an attitude of dejection;
nor had he opened his lips, or moved from that
position which he occupied on entering the cabin
and dismissing Thodore, for more than an hour.
No sound but the gurgling of the water, as the
vessel glided over the moonlit sea, the occasional
song of the labouring seamen, or the hoarse cry of
the helmsman, as he told the watches of the night,
and the monotonous tramp of the officer of the
deck over his head, broke the stillness reigning
around him.
There are times when conscience will wield
her fiery sceptre over the soul, compelling the
guilty to hide their faces in horror! In that short
hour, the whole of his past life passed before his
memory, like some fearful pageant, before the vision
of the fevered sleeper. He thought of his first
crimeagainst a brother's life! of the blood-stained
marble statue! of his love for his cousin, and the
dark sea of passions into which he plunged in
consequence
of that love, and his subsequent jealousy!
He called to mind, while a cold tremour passed
over his frame, and a deep groan escaped him, his
last meeting with that brother---the descending
knife, and fatal blow---then his rapid flight, and his
artful tale to the captain who saved him that night,
as his frail boat was sinking in a storm! His voyage
to the Mediterranean sea---his capture by the
Algerines---his
imprisonment and escape, by the aid of a
Moorish maiden, whom he dishonoured and left---
his fatal rencontre in landing---his imprisonment
and escape in an open boat for Ceuti, and second
capture by the rovers---his union with, and
subsequent
command of, their vessel---all in their turn,
became the subject of his thoughts. His features
changed, as he thought of the dark sea of crimes,
through which he waded to that command.
Then came his capture by the Turkshis
freedom
,
and rapidly rising distinction in their navy
and he pressed his temples violently, when he
remembered
that he had changed the cross of his
religion, for the turban of the Mussulman. He was
now chief of an armed horde, and now a combatant
in the ranks of the Egyptians, against his invading
countrymen. Once more he was on the sea, and an
Algerine rover called him its commander! Then
he was the captive of the Spaniard, and the Moro of
Havanna became his prison. Liberated, again the
quarter-deck of a pirate became his home, and the
flag of Carthagena waved to the breeze above his
head!
What matters it, he suddenly exclaimed, that
I have gained the wealth of princesthat I have
waded through crime and blood to the acquisition of
the guilty fame that makes my name terrible!
that my hand has been against every man!I am
at last but a miserable beingpenitent, without the
power to repentremorseful, without hope a lover
of virtue, without daring to seek itbanned of God
outlawed of my racefratricide, murderer!
hundred-fold
murderer! with the mark of Cain
branded
upon my brow, and burned deepdeep into my
soul. Oh, God! oh, God!if there be a God
he cried, clasping his hands and lifting his eyes to
heavenbe merciful unto my iniquities, for they
are very great! And he fervently pressed to his
lips the hilt of his rapier, shaped like a cross, and
then dropped his head upon his arm, and wept, under
the influence of feelings, which, at some seasons,
will be experienced by the most hardened.
After a few moments silence, he continued, Oh,
for the days of childhood and innocence! I was
then happy; then wemy brother!my little
brother and Ikneeled nightly in prayer by our
bedside! How beautiful! We were taught by our
venerable parent to put up our prayers, first to the
Virgin, and then to our sainted mother. Oh, would
to God I had died then! Mother, you would have
then embraced your son in heaven!But no!
no! as a ray of hope glanced over his mind, he
exclaimed aloud, while his brow grew dark, No!
tootoo deeply dyed in crime. With a brother's
blood I beganand should a brother's murderer
shrink from lesser crimes! Oh, how fatally
consistent
has been my life with its outset! Witness!
and he laughed, but his laugh was hollow and
unearthly, as he spoke; witness! I call ye to
witness! he cried, almost fiercely, ye exulting
demons, who madden me with your hellish
triumphs
Ha!
ha! ha! I will yet be your leader! If
I cannot be the last in heaven, I will be the first in
hell! and he sprung from his seat, and wildly
walked the cabin, under the influence of temporary
insanity, while such tortures as only a fratricide can
feel, harrowed his soul.
His massive forehead, lurid with the glare of the
lamp, and contorted and writhing, as if the mind
within conflicted with the agonies of the doomed,
was lowered darkly over his burning eyes, which
glowed with a fierce, lambent light, as Lucifer's
might have glowed when hurled from heaven.
His finely-curved lip curled with a satanic
expression
of hatred and malignity: and his form
expanded
,
as though under the influence of some
strong passion, uncontrollable by human power.
Suddenly he stopped, and stood with his arm
outstretched
in a meancing manner, while his dilated
figure exhibited the attitude a painter would have
seized, to represent Cain standing over the prostrate
body of his murdered brother.
A low exclamation, in the adjoining state-room, of
mingled terror and surprise, recalled him instantly
to his accustomed self-possession, for the moment
controlled
by the intense passions, which, from time to
time, aroused by his guilty conscience, enslaved his
spirit. The dark, scowling brow, resumed its serenity
and beautythe wild fire of his eye mellowed into
a milder lustrethe impassioned and excited form
became subdued and passive, under a calmer and
happier influence; and approaching the door of the
state-room, with a smile, that might have won a
maiden's love, mantling his lip, and in a voice
modulated
to the gentlest tones, he inquired after the
welfare
of his lovely captive.
We must now return to the period when
Constanza
was first restored to consciousness. The
youthful officer had, with delicate address, given her
up, after his chief had resigned her to his charge
on gaining his vessel, to the care of an old negress,
wife of the steward of the schooner, who, with that
instinctive sympathy which is the characteristic of
womaneven of the old and ugly, for the young
and lovely of their sexreceived her charge with
many exclamations of sympathy and regret.
Sweety ladyol' Juana hab pity much, said
she, receiving her lovely charge, and laying her
upon a sofa in the interior state-room of the vessel,
which was fitted up with great taste and elegance.
How white an' sof' dis pretty han', wid de gol' ring
but ol' Juana wont steal it off de little slender
finger, she added, as an habitual disposition to do
so was evident, by the sudden motion of her hand
and eye.
I wis' de lady would open de eyes, she
continued
,
applying strong stimulants, and resorting
to the usual means for restoring suspended
animation
.
Hi, massa Thodore, you rub dat lily han',
while I rub dis, an' bave de temple, she said, with
an air of importance, fully conscious of the
responsibility
with which she was so unexpectedly
invested
.
The youth, who, at the command of Lafitte, had
remained to assist in the recovery of the maiden,
respectfully bent on one knee by the sofa, and with
tenderness took the unconscious hand, brilliant with
gems; and with the embarrassed manner of one
who felt guilty of sacrilege, endeavoured to restore
warmth and circulation to the lifeless member.
By degrees, the blood returned to fill the blue
veins, her bosom heaved like the snowy breast of a
wearied dove, and opening her dark eyes, she gazed
vacantly about; but there was no soul in their
expression
no
intelligence or consciousness of
surrounding
objects.
She look, but she no see, said the nurse.
Marie
!
what big black eyes! dere she clos um' 'gen!
but she get life nowno matterpoor lily 'ooman
go sleep; and the maiden, again closing her eyes
with a deep sigh, placed her hand under her head,
and on that soft and lovely pillow, rocked by the
gentle motion of the vessel, fell into a sweet and
refreshing slumber.
The kind old nurse watched by her couch with
the anxiety and tenderness of a mother over the
cradle of her infant, occasionally replying in a
whisper
to the interrogations of Thodore, as from time
to time he came from the deck to inquire if she still
reposed.
It was long past midnight, and still the lady
slept, while the old negress waved mechanically
over her a plume of the gorgeous feathers of some
tropical bird, the light wind, which the motion
created, gently lifting the raven curls from her
blue-veined
temples.
O, hi! dere massa captain, she said, lifting her
finger in the attitude of listening, as she heard
Lafitte
,
after giving his orders to the helmsman,
descend
to the cabin; ol' Juana hope he no harm
de ladyhe good man, sometime--and sometime
he bad! but he hab good heart at de bottomol'
Juana know he do mos' much good as bad since
she sail in de schooner; and the old negress
continued
habitually waving her plume over the
sleeper
,
and musing upon the character of the
buccaneer
chief, when a deep groan from the adjoining
cabin, where he leaned upon the table, disturbed
her reflections.
Ah, dere Massa Lafitte in one ob his glooms,
she said to herself; de lady no fear noting now.
Tank de saint, she continued, as she observed the
maiden turn upon her side; she stirshe wake
up; poor ting, how sorry she be when she hear her
fader dead, and know where she be. If ol' Juana
be bad 'ooman, she no bad to dis pretty chil', she
hab no body to be kin' to her now but ol' Juana!
and the hideousness of the dark features of the old
negress were redeemed for the moment, by the
expression
of kindness and pity which passed over them, as
she thought of her helpless and lonely state. Besides
her natural kindness of heart, retained in spite of her
mode of life, there might have been some emotions
of gratification, in having one of her own sex to
relieve the dreary character of her rude existence.
The lady slightly moved, murmured indistinctly
some name, while a sweet smile came for an instant to
her lips; and before its scarce perceptible reflection
faded from her cheek, she raised her richly-fringed
lids, and like one awaking from a pleasant dream,
looked peacefully around. Surprised, she surveyed
a scene of taste and elegance unfamiliar to her eyes.
The state-room was fitted up in a style of
gorgeousness
,
to which the wealth of many rich argosies had
contributed. The maiden herself reclined on an
ottoman of crimson velvet, ornamenting one end
of the cabin. An alcove on her right, contained
a marble laver, supported by the tips of the pinions
of three bronze cupids, each holding in his extended
hands silver vessels, containing various articles for
the toilet. Over this stand was a mirror, set with a
richly-chased frame of ebony, inlaid with pearl. The
front of this recess was draped by curtains of blue
and orange damask, which materials, entwined in
festoons, encircled the state-room. Opposite to the
alcove, under a costly swinging lamp, which cast a
brilliant light through the room, stood an escritoire
with a black marble top, supported by two leopards,
also of marble, but so variegated as to imitate both
in form and colour the spotted skin of those animals,
nearly to the semblance of life. Upon it were strewn,
of the costliest materials and most delicate
workmanship
,
apparatus for writing; a superb guitar; a
jewelled dagger, sheathed in a gold case; and a few
Spanish and Italian poets, with one or two French
and English authors of celebrity. An Alpine scene,
done by a celebrated Florentine painter, set in an
elaborately-carved frame, hung above it, while
paintings
of North American scenery adorned the other
sides of the cabin.
Opposite to the sofa, occupied by the fair Castillian,
stood, in a larger and deeper recess than the one
containing the lavera couch raised high from the
floor, and fancifully shaped like a sea-shell, covered
with the richest material of intermingled purple and
white. A thick curtain of green velvet, now partly
drawn aside, was made to fall before the recess and
entirely covered it from the eye. Against this couch
leaned an antique German harp, of uncommon size
and beauty, curiously constructed of the blackest
ebony, and adorned with carved ivory-work. The
floor of this luxurious abode was covered with one
of those thick Turkish carpets, whose yielding
surface
betrays no footstep.
The maiden gazed upon the splendour surrounding
her; at first with a wondering eyepressed her
fingers
upon her eyelids, and looked again, and again.
I must dream!said she in a low silvery voice,
AgataO, Agata! and she looked up into the
face of her attendantwhat?no!I still dream,
she cried, placing her hand over her eyes, as
though endeavouring to collect her thoughtsOh,
Maria!what a dream! what a fearful dream I
have had! and again she removed her hands, and
gazed wildly round the room. She now heard
distinctly the sound of rushing waters, and was
conscious
of motion.
Father,father! where am I?she shrieked
wildlythis vesselthe dashing waves! Hah!
who is it that calls? Oh God! Oh God!I know
it allall!she shrieked, as the deepmellow voice
of Lafitte, addressing her from the inner cabin, fell
upon her ear;and the wretched girl buried her
face in her hands, and shed burning tears.
Seora, I would speak with you!
Ha! that voice againmiserable Constanza!
utterly lostlost!she exclaimed. Suddenly her
eye rested upon the gemmed stiletto lying upon the
escritoire.
Holy Virgin, forgive me!but thus I can save
my honour! and she sprung for the weapon.
Bon Giu! Help, massa, help, she kill herself!
cried the terrified Juana.
The pirate threw open the door, but before he
could enter, the unsheathed weapon was grasped in
the elevated hand of the maiden; her eyes were
uplifted, full of a sublime and holy devotion.
Forgive me, blessed Virgin! she uttered with
wild and affecting energy, and the glittering dagger
was descending into her breathing bosom, when
her captor sprang forward, and the weapon was
sheathed in his intervening arm.
My life, lady, rather than thine! he said, as he
drew it forth.
VOL. I.11
Oh, that it had been thy life!she exclaimed,
while her beautiful and excited features expressed
the intensest mortification at her disappointment;
her dark eye kindled with anger, while her
colourless
lip showed maidenly apprehension. For a
moment she stood in the attitude in which she had
been arrested, with these several passions agitating
her bosom; but the last overcame all other feelings,
and with clasped fingers, and the uplifted eye of a
Madonna, she said, imploringly and with touching
eloquence.
O, Seor, I am your captive--but ransom, a
king's ransom shall be yours, only let me go in
peace and honour. I implore you by your mother!
by the blessed virgin! by your hope of heaven! by
your fear of hell! See! I kneel to you! Oh, Seor,
I know I am in your hands, but, as you hope for
mercy, show mercy now!
Rise, ladyI swear!and Lafitte bared his
brow, and kissed the cross-hilted dagger--I swear
by my hope of heaven, my fear of hell, by my sainted
mother, and by the Holy Virgin, that you shall
remain
in all safety and honour! The sincere
voice in which he repeated her adjurationthe
solemn eye, and devotional manner, re-assured the
agitated girl.
Oh, I would believe you, Seor, yet, she
suddenly
exclaimed, my father! where, oh, where is he?
And, although the moment before, she had shrunk
from the touch of her captor, as he extended his hand
to raise her from her suppliant posture, while she
kneeled before him, she now clasped him by the arm,
and with a trembling voice, scarcely articulated
Mymyfather!Oh tell me--where?
Be calm, Seora.You shall know all, but
You have murdered him! she shrieked.
Nay, lady, he has not been murdered--he--
He lives not! she cried, with terrible energy
in her voice, fixing her eyes upon his face, as
if she would read in its changing expression
what she sought, yet trembled to learn.
Without violence, he died upon his bed.
Died! she shrieked; but the next moment,
with altered voice and manner, she murmured,
Died?died!he then is deaddead!
Mournfully she spoke, and her fixed eye betrayed
the temporary alienation of her reason.---On his
bed---too---and where was Constanza, to close his
eyes? Dead! dead?---They tell me so---that my
father is dead! and Constanza---living? Oh that
she were dead also! How blessed it must be to
die!---The good old man is happy now; he cannot
see his daughter's shame and misery. They tell
me he died on his bed!But they tell me false!
she cried, suddenly changing her abstracted
manner
,
and low melancholy voice---Oh, you have
murdered him--- she wildly shrieked, while she
pointed at the wounded arm of Lafitte---there is
blood upon your hand---my father's
blood---Murderer
!
murderer! Nay---
Lafitte!
Lafitte
! I can
call you by no other name, that will so express my
detestation, and your crime'and the look which
accompanied her words, was the more withering,
from the extreme beauty of the features upon which
it dwelt.
Seora, I beseech you be appeased, he said,
with a tone indicative of wounded feeling. Don
Velasquez was not slain; he died naturally:
there was no hand laid upon his person. Calm
your feelings. You think me guilty---I am, but
not so guilty as you believe. If you will hear me
a few moments---he proceeded, as he saw she
listened with some attention, and less excitement,
to his words. I will tell you all.
The maiden remained silent---but slightly
inclined
her head, with the air of one who would
listen.
Hebrto Velasquez--- he continued, you
start!guided my party to the vault containing
your father's treasure, on condition, that he should
share half the bootywhile the whole weight of
the act should fall upon me. You were alarmed,
and, during the removal of the gold, your father,
seizing a pistol, shot Velasquez, who was below
with us, dead.
Velasquez dead!and by my father's hand?
Even so, seora.
Then, Heaven is just! she exclaimed.
The alarm was given, he continued, we
were surrounded. I entered the room above
here he bowed low, while a deep flush mantled his
dark cheek, which was slightly reflected from the
maiden's, who, with conflicting emotions, listened to
the pirate's relationThere, I first saw, you,
never
,
lady, to forget you! I left your presence, and
headed my men; but, pressed on every side, I was
forced to retreat to the villa. I sprung into the room,
and you fainted. The thought flashed upon me,
that I could save my life, and gain my vessel, by
protectingpardon me, lady,by protecting my
body with your sacred person. I caught up your
lifeless form, and, holding you before me, retreated,
step by step, till I gained my vessel:and, to this
protection, lady, I owe my life!he added, with
feeling.
But, my father?
Worn out and feeble, during the tumult around
him, he expired.
Alas! he was ready to die! she said, calmly,
I have long schooled my heart to part with him
but not thusoh! not thus! and, leaning her head
upon the table, the lovely orphan gave way to her
filial grief.
Lafitte left her to the indulgence of her sorrows,
and after delaying, in his own cabin, to attend to
his slightly-wounded arm, ascended to the deck.
A faint titnge along the eastern horizon,
announced
the coming dawnthe night breeze had
lulledand the sails, at every lift of the vessel,
upon some larger sea, flapped heavily against the
masts. The watch were sitting, or standing, with
their hands thrust into their bosoms, around the
windlassthe officer of the deck paced his lonely
roundthe helmsman stood at the helmand, like
its master-spirit, directed the course of the yielding
vessel, steadily towards the invisible point of her
destination
.
The land had disappeared, save an
irregular
waving blue line along the horizon, which
might be mistaken by the unpractised eye for
the edges of a distant cloud, but in which, Lafitte
recognized the fast disappearing mountains of
Jamaica
.
All else was the broad heaving ocean, and
the bending blue sky, in which, here and there,
twinkled a solitary star, and the pale western moon,
like a timid novice, modestly veiling her face, at the
approach of the morning sun.
11*
CHAPTER VI.
There are few lovers who can bear, with philosophy, the rejection
of their suit. But when, in spite of this rejection, the lover makes his
unrequited love his guiding star in the path to honour and distinction,
and, without hope, lives that he may be still worthy of his mistress, he
is more than a philosopherhe has gained a victory over himself, and
deserves, above the conqueror of armies, the admiration of mankind.
More
.
INTERVIEW BETWEEN LAFITTE AND CONSTANZAITS RESULT
A CHANGE IN HER DESTINY.
Morning
had advanced nearly into noon, when
the commander of the schooner, who, wrapped in
a cloak, had thrown himself upon the deck to
refresh
his weary frame, was aroused by a slight touch
on his shoulder.
The lady, sir! said Thodore.
What of her, Thodore? he exclaimed, with
a foreboding air, springing to his feet.
She desires to speak with you, sir.
Has she slept till now, Thodore?
No, sir, she has been all the morning weeping.
She is now calmer, and desires an interview.
Say to her, that her slightest wish shall be
obeyed. I will attend her, he replied. And,
turning
to ascertain the position of his vessel, and the
rate she had been running while he slept, he
descended
into the cabin, and delaying, for a few
moments
,
to change his dress, marked with traces of
the late battle, for one more beseeming the presence
of a lady, the tapped lightly at the door of her
state-room
,
and was admitted by Juana into the presence
of his fair captive.
Constanza had recovered her usual
self-possession
,
and maidenly dignity of manner, though her
cheek was pale, her lip tremulous, and her eye
brilliant through tears. As he entered, she rose
from the ottoman, struck with his fine figure,
displayed
to advantage by the rich dress he wore, and
motioned him to a seat.
Seora, I have obeyed your summons,he
said, with deep respect.
Nay, Seor, it becomes not the captive to issue
commands; it is for her to obey! Seor, she
added, with dignity, and yet with timidity, I have
solicited this interview with you, from my
knowledge
of your native generosity of character
however
it may have been clouded and perverted by
circumstances, which, I am willing to do you the
justice to think, may have been beyond your
control
.
Now that I have seen you, and know how
nobly you can act, if you will be guided by the more
generous impulses of your own bosomI feel that
I am not casting too much upon the success of this
interview.
Seora, you have only to speak to be obeyed,
he replied, with much respect in his voice and
manner
.
All that I can do, shall be done, to atone for
your injuries, and mitigate your grief.
Most sincerely do I thank you, SeorI have
not, indeed, hoped too much! Here she hesitated
to proceed, and her manner betrayed
embarrassment
.
Speak, lady! what can I do for you?
Give me my liberty, Seor! she replied, firmly
fixing her full dark eyes upon him, while her heart
palpitated, and her cheek paled, as she watched the
effect of this demand upon her captor.
He had anticipated her request, and replied,
unmoved
Where, lady, will you go?Your father!
forgive me, that I inadvertently touched so
sensitive
a chord! But, lady, have you where to go?
Oh! no, no! but any where but here! and
she buried her face in the folds of the drapery.
Seora, said he, mournfully, and in a
melancholy
voice, this is the bitterest moment of my
life. That I am despised and proscribed of men,
I care not! I can fling back their taunts: but,
when so lovely a being turns from me with fear and
detestation, then do I feel the galling of the
outlaw's
chain! Lady! he continued, suddenly
changing his tone to one of deep earnestness, it is
said, there is pardon of the Holy Virgin for the
greatest crimes: and will not one, who must so
nearly resemble her in person and spirit, also
forgive?
Oh, Seor, speak not blasphemously! You
have all the forgiveness I can bestow. Would it
could avail you hereafter! But oh, let me go
hence, if, then, you hope to be forgiven.
Where will you go, Seora?
Why
will you
go? he said, with impassioned energy. Here,
you shall be sacred from intrusion. No footstep
shall approach you unbidden. It shall be my
whole duty to render you happybut oh, desert me
not!You feel an interest in my welfarethen do
not leave me. You are the angel that would guide
me back to honour and virtue. I already feel the
holy influence of her presence upon my heart.
Leave me, lady; and with you, will depart, forever,
these better aspirations. Again the dark spirit of my
destiny, whose seat a purer spirit has assumed, will
usurp once more his empire! Oh, leave me not to
my own dark fateextinguish not, forever, the
only star of hope that has ever beamed upon my
ill-fated bark! Ladystay! behold me at your
feet! and the impassioned outlaw, who had spoken
his feelings with that intenseness peculiar to his
impulsive character, kneeled before the maiden.
Seor captain, kneel not to me, she said,
stepping
back with dignitySpeak not to me, thus!
I cannot listen to language like this. I am your
captive,but she continued more earnestly, oh,
talk not to me thus. I would speak of my
deliverance
.
If one so weak and simple as I am, can
aught avail your return to society, cheerfully will I
do all, that a free maiden, may do. Seor, my
prayers, my influence, if I can command any, shall
be yoursbutOh! use not to me such language!
I would go, Seor! she added, quickly.
You, then, despise me, he said, in a
deeply-agitated
voice; You, then, despise me! Just
Heaven
,
strike homeI am thy victim! Listen to me,
lady, he added, in a calmer voice. In youth, I
loved a maiden much like you; but my love met
no return; and for that passion I became an exile
from my father's halls. Love made me what I am
may it not open for me a bright and virtuous
future? Speak, lady! and bid me live to virtue
to heaven, and to you! and he gazed earnestly,
his features beaming with the farvour of his
passion
,
up into the face of the troubled girl as he
kneeled before her. The maiden was deeply
affected
by his impassioned appeal.
Rise, SeorI do not despise youI deeply
feel for youbut I cannot, must not listen to your
language! Yet you have strong claims to my
regard
,
knowing you as I do. You have shown me
a character, which, while the exhibition of it has
surprised me, will ever command my esteem. I
must always honour the native nobility and
generosity
of your character! fallen indeed, yet aspiring
to the height from which you have fallen. Oh,
sir, forget this hasty passion for a lonely maiden
who cannot return it, and be the being, proud in
conscious virtue, you seek to be! Let your desire
to return to the paths of honour, depend upon no
contingency in which I am involved. Go forward,
Seor, independently of extraneous circumstances,
and make your own just perception of duty your
guide, and you may yet be what you wish to be
what the world would desire to have youwhat I
sincerely pray you may become! But thinkthink
not of memy affectionsand brow, cheek, and
bosom were mantled with rich blood, as she added
my heartmy loveisanothers!
The chief still kneeled at the feet of the fair
Castillian
.
The tones of her voice had long ceased, and
yet he moved not. His features became deathly
pale, his eye grew darker, and his lips were
painfully
compressed, while his chest heaved with strong
emotion. For a moment he continued to kneel in
a silence that appalled the heart of Constanza.
Then slowly elevating his form, he stood up to the
full height of his commanding figure, folded his
arms upon his breast, and gazed upon her for an
instant with a bitter and sad expression upon his
features. But when, at last, with a great effort, he
spoke, there was a calmness in the deep tones of
his voice, which fell forebodingly upon her heart.
Lady, it is well! Ever thus has been my
wayward
and ill-directed destiny! Forgive me, Seora,
I will urge no more my fatal suit. I have loved
you, Seora (nay, listen, lady, I may tell you now)
I have loved you---how fervently, heaven and my
own heart alone can tell! But it has been a beautiful
and happy dream. No more may I look upon you
but as a distant worshipper upon the shrine of his
idolatry. A few short hours have changed me,
lady!---For your sake, I will seek a name of
honour
among men; and when hereafter you shall
learn that Lafitte, the outlaw, earned laurels, and a
name, and perchance a death, in honourable war
remember it was your love that guided his bark out
of the gulf of crimeyour love that wafted it on to
honour. Then, lady, do justice to his memory!
The rejected suitor, then, turning with much
emotion
in his manner, hastily quitted the state-room.
Sail, ho! rung in his ears, as he entered his
own cabin. Hastily concealing his gay apparel
under a garment more befitting the deck of a
piratical
vessel, and the presence of his men, he ascended
to the deck, and sought, in its bustle and activity,
to forget the causes which agitated his bosom.
What do you make her out? he shouted to
the man aloft, in a stern tone, that startled even
his men, with whom his trumpet-like voice was
well familiar.
A brig, sirstanding to the south-east, with
her courses hauled up, and under top-gallant sails.
Can you see her hull?
Not yet, sir; but she rises rapidly.
Lay down out of that, sir, said Lafitte,
impatiently
;
and immediately he sprung forward with
his glass, ascended the foremast, and standing on
the cross-trees, closely surveyed the stranger. In a
few minutes he descended, and ordered the
helmsman
to steer so as to gain the wind of her.
What do you make her out, sir? inquired his
second in command, Ricardo, a swarthy Spaniard,
with an unpleasing eye, but otherwise a
good-humoured
countenance, half shaded by a forest of
black whiskers, who was smoking a segar, as he
paced the leeward side of the deck.
A merchantman, bound probably into
Kingston
.
Ho, theremen! shouted the lieutenant; to
your guns, and see that they are all prepared; and
be ready, boarders.
Aye, aye, cheerfully responded the crew; and
there was at once a bustle of warlike preparation on
board. The crew, which numbered the day
previous
about sixty, now cut down to forty, by the
severe losses of the preceding night, engaged with
alacrity in preparation for the expected fight.
This preparation is useless, Ricardo, said
Lafitte
;
she will not resist us; and if she is bound
for Kingston, I shall not injure herand the lady
below must be sent back in her.
Cielos! without ransom, seor?
NoI give my share of last night's booty as
her ransom. Does that serve your purpose?
Seor Captain, it does. I would give more for
the glitter of a good Mexican dollar, than the
sweetest
smile that ever dwelt on pretty maiden's lip.
Miraculo
!
Captain, you soon weary of this lady's
favours
.
Silence, sirthe lady goes to Jamaica in yonder
vessel, if it be bound there, replied Lafitte, sternly;
and descending into the cabin, he once more sought
the presence of his captive.
Lady, he said, without entering her state-room,
there is a vessel now approaching, and if, as I
think, it is bound for the island, you are free to
depart
in her. Where would you prefer making a
landing?
At Kingston, SeorI have an uncle there.
I would land at Kingston! Oh, sir, she continued
earnestly, and advancing towards him, jest not
with my hopesam I indeed at liberty?
Lady, the uncaged bird is not freer than you
shall be within the hour.
May God bless you, generous sir!
Nay, I
dare
not keep you here, he replied;
I have not confidence in my own strength of
purpose
I
fear for you, remainingabsent, you are
only safe; whilst I, who would wish to forget, must
live only in dwelling on your image. AdieuI will
again wait on you when I ascertain the character
and destination of the vessel.
When he gained the deck, she was plainly
visible
about a league to leeward, under press of sail,
evidently endeavouring to escape. She had hauled
from her course several points since she first hove
in sight, and now stood south before the wind, about
a league distant.
Shall we give chase, sir? inquired the
lieutenant
.
Aye, we must come up with her! put her
away; and the schooner falling off a little, with a
freer wind, darted rapidly after the stranger, who
was using every exertion to escape. But the
buccaneer
rapidly gained on her, and in about half an
hour the chase was within the range and command
of her guns.
Ten cannonades frowned along the pirate's deck,
and a gang of fierce and reckless men, some stripped
to their waists, and armed with pistols, knives, and
cutlasses, stood around each gun.
Clear away that starboard gun amidships,
shouted the lieutenant
All clear, sir.
Pitch a shot then across her fore foot.
The seaman stooped to the gun, and with his
eye on a level with the piece, gave it the proper
direction.
All ready, sir.
Fire!
The little vessel trembled and recoiled under the
loud report of the gun, which had scarcely ceased
ringing in the ears of the crew, who watched the
ball as it ricochetted over the water, marking a line
VOL. I.12
of foam as it passed just across the bows of the
vessel
,
when the brig threw her main-top-sail to the
mast, hoisted American colours, and awaited the
pleasure of the pirate.
Lower and man the boatgo on board,
Theodore
,
and ascertain what she is, and where bound,
said the pirate, as the schooner approached nearly
within hail of the stranger. The pirate lay to until
the return of the boatLafitte the while leaning
over the quarter, gazing in silence upon the vessel.
Well Thodore? he inquired, as his
messenger
returned.
She is an American brig from New Orleans,
bound to Porto Rico, but will touch at Kingston,
if there be gold to be made by it.
Aye, gold---gold! well, they shall have it.
In a few minutes Constanza had changed the
warlike vessel, and gorgeous cabin of the pirate,
for the homelier accommodations of the peaceful and
plain merchantman.
Lady, adieu, he said, taking his leave on the
deck of the brig; you may soon forget me, but
while my heart throbs with life, never can I forget
Constanza Velasquez. That name shall be the
talisman of a more honourable destiny---for I
cannot
be linked with guilt, bearing your image in my
heart. Lady, farewell---Thodore will accompany
you to your friends, and you will also have Juana,
to wait upon you.
God bless you, Seor---how deeply I feel my debt
of gratitude to you---I shall ever remember you with
friendship---may God and your country receive
henceforth the duties you owe to each. Farewell,
and the blessed Maria be your protector! and she
extended her hand to the chief as she spoke, who
tenderly and ardently pressing it to his lips, sprang
over the side into his boat. He waved his hand to
her distant figure, as he stood once more on the deck
of his schooner, which immediately resumed her
former course, while the merchant vessel, again
making sail, stood steadily towards the port of her
destination.
CHAPTER VII.
No phenomenon of nature is invested with the sublimity of a
tempest upon the ocean at midnight. The incessant thunderthe
fierce lightningsthe continuous roar of the agitated watersthe
driving cloudsthe flashing seaand the loud sound of the rushing
windswhat sublime accompaniments! How little, then, in
comparison
,
is man! And yet how great, as guided by his genius and intellect,
he fearfully commits himself to the deep, and on a few planks skilfully
bound together, rides careering on the storm.
A STORMITS EFFECTSA BUCCANEERCHANGE OF DESTINATION.
The
sun went down that evening with an angry
aspect---lurid clouds were piled around him, and the
western skies wore that brassy hue, reflected upon
the leaden waters, which, in those seas, is the
precursor
of a storm. The commander of the
brigantine
,
which had now become the temporary abode
of Constanza, was standing upon the quarter-deck,
watching the huge masses of piled-up clouds, and
threatening appearance of the heavens, with an
anxious eye.
Make all snug, he said, turning to his second
in command, after a long survey of the brewing
tempest. We are likely to have a hard night of
ityou had better send down the royal and
top-gallant
sails, and single reef the top-sails.
The necessary orders were given by the mate,
and speedily executed by the active seamen; and
the brig held on her course, steadily, under her
lessened sail. The clouds rapidly rose in the west,
and extended along the heavens, gradually
unrolling
like a scroll, till the massive edge of the huge
embankment hung, like a beetling crag above the
vessel, casting a black shadow, over half the sea.
Strike the top-gallant-masts, and close-reef the
top-sails and stay-sail, shouted the captain, quickly,
as the clouds came careering on, driving before the
invisible, and yet unfelt tempest.
The night was fast setting in, though the red
twilight, still lingered in the east---while along
the western horizon, both sky and sea, were
enveloped
in terrific gloom. Suddenly the light
breeze which had wafted them along, died away---
and a fearful stillness dwelt in the warm air, while
respiration became painful. The sailors stood at
the several posts, where the coming danger might
most require their presence---conversing in low tones
with each other---now watching anxiously the
gathering
storm, which momently threatened to burst
upon their helpless bark---or now, with an inquiring
gaze, marking the face of their captain---a veteran
seaman, with his head silvered by the storms of
sixty winters.
He stood near the helmsman wrapped in a long
drab pea-jacket, buttoned closely at his throat---a
glazed hat, with a broad brim, upon his head, and
a trumpet in his hand. His eye was full of care,
but wore no expression betraying doubt, but rather
a consciousness of being able to contend
successfully
,
with whatever might occur---a consciousness
originating in long and successful experience. His
features were calm, and his voice full and natural,
when, occasionally, he addressed his officers, or the
helmsman.
Suddenly a flash of lightning shot along the face
of the black bosom of the cloud, like a glittering
serpent---and the air was rent with a report so loud,
that every startled seaman placed his hands
suddenly
,
and intensely to his temples. A tomb-like
12*
silence succeeded, and the dark cloud unrolled, till it
covered all the heavens, encircling the horizon in a
fearful embrace.
What, my lovely passenger! said the captain,
with gallantry, as the slight form of Constanza met
his eye. The thunder has alarmed you! shall I
attend you to your state room?
No, oh no, Seor, the cabin is too close---It is
but thunder, then! I thought it the firing of
cannon
!
We are not pursued! Bless thee, Santa
Maria, she continued mentally I feared that
dangerous
man had changed his mind---I did him
injustice
.
But oh, that I were safe beneath my
uncle's roof! Is it far to Kingston, Seor? she
inquired.
Twelve leagues, lady---if we safely weather
this gale, we shall be there by morning.
Thank you, sir, for such cheering words; but
is there, as your words imply, danger? See! that
light upon the sea! what is it? she inquired
eagerly, pointing to the west.
Now we have it---stand ready, all! he shouted,
as a line of white foam, stretching along the
horizon
,
caught his eye, as he looked up at her
exclamation
.
The vessel lay broadside to the path of the
coming tempest, and so great was the calm, that
the helmsman had no control over her. The
captain
,
gave his several orders with professional
rapidity
,
and energy.
Hard-a-weatherhard-up, hard-up, for your
life! and he sprung to the helm, but the head of
the brig remained immoveable in the same direction.
Good God! Head her off, or we shall be
capsized
!
ladybelow, belowyoungster, he cried,
to Thodore, see to her!
Every precaution was taken for the safety of the
brig, that experienced seamanship could suggest: the
old man stood grasping the helm with a firm hand,
while, with a calm, and unblenching eye, he
watched the advancing hurricane. Onward it
cameploughing up the sea, which boiled, roaring
and foaming before ita moving wall of surge.
Constanza, with one hand grasping the
companion-way
,
within which she stood, and the other
resting upon the arm of her young attendant, gazed
fearfully upon the visible presence of the tempest.
Her bosom heaved irregularlyher cheek was pale,
and her lips shut with expectationbut there was
a sublimity in the scene which she loved, and
which, chained her to the spot.
The lightnings flashed fast and fierce out from
the black clouds, which seemed suspended close
above their heads, and run like veins of gold along
the heavens. The thunder came peal upon peal,
like reports of artillery, rattling along the skies, and
reverberating around the horizon, died away in the
distance in low, indistinct mutterings. The glassy
waves between the vessel and the rapidly careering
tempest, began to heave, and while every man held
in his breath with expectation, the brig rolled
heavily
,
and within a few moments of the time when
the distant moan of the tempest was first heard, with
a loud roar, the storm of wind and wave burst upon
the devoted vessel.
Now---look to yourselves! shouted the captain;
and the wild waters leaped over the brig with the
noise and body of a cataract---the furious winds
twisted the light masts like withes---and the brig
was borne bodily down by the irresistible force of
the tempest, and lay prostrate upon her beam-ends.
The weather main-chains were wrenched like
threads, with all their rigging, from the sides of the
vessel; and the main-mast, bending like whalebone,
broke off with a loud crack close to the deck. A
wild cry mingled with the roar of the tempest, while
the live thunder leaped, and the lightnings glared
about their vessel, as if in mockery of human
suffering
.
Cut away the foremast---lively, men, lively!
cried the captain, clinging to the quarter-rail half
emerged in the sea; and the mate, who was
prepared
for this emergency, run along the elevated
side of the ship, and with an axe severed, one after
another, the distended stays, which flew wildly into
the air, lashing the sea as they fell. The
remaining
one parted with a sharp report before the axe
descended, and the unsustained mast, which lay
level with the water, after a few vigorous blows by
the same daring hand, snapped off a few feet from
the deck, and a large wave, lifting it up like a straw,
bore it, with all its rigging, far away to leeward.
Immediately the relieved vessel righted and
floated
amid the tumultuous ocean, an unmanageable
wreck.
The moment the hurricane struck the side of the
vessel, Thodore, holding firmly the arm of
Constanza
,
drew hastily the slide of the companion-way,
the doors of which were closed, over the place where
she stood, and the waters swept harmlessly over her.
But the violence of the shock would have thrown
her down, had not the young buccaneer, with great
presence of mind, rapidly adapted their position to
the sudden inclination of the vessel. Alarmed, she
stood with her crucifix clasped to her lips till the
vessel righted, when, at her repeated request,
Theodore
drew back the slide to allow her to look forth
upon the tempest.
What a scene of wild sublimity met her gaze!
The heavens were pitchy black, over which the
lightnings played in streams of fire---the thunder
rolled continually in one prolonged and incessant
reverberation---the sea was illuminated with
phosphorescent
light and raging with a loud roar, while
vast masses of water, rising from its bosom on every
side, would swell into gigantic billows, and burst into
a head of glittering foam.
The vessel, with her upper deck flooded, plunged
heavily into the deep gulfs which yawned on every
side, threatening to entomb her. The whole scene
that met her eye was one of sublime, but fearful
desolation. The old man, with his saturated grey
locks streaming in the gale, stood at the helm, which
he had seized when the brig righted---for the
helmsman
had been borne off into the sea, and his far-off
wail for help had long before died in the more
melancholy
howlings of the storm.
This is indeed fearful! she exclaimed. Poor,
old man---he has lost perhaps his all---but his life is
safe. Safe? she repeated, despairingly; Oh, who
can say that one life is safe in this appalling scene!
Nay, lady, the bite of the storm is over---we
only hear his growl, said the boy; at any rate,
it can harm this old hulk no more. We are not far
from land, if it were but day we could see it. Cheer
up, lady---there is no more to fear.
I fear not, seor, for myself, she replied, calmly;
but that venerable man! he is perhaps a parent---
it is for him, and for you, I feel---you have, perhaps,
a mother and a fair sister, whose lives are wrapped
up in you!
No, lady, he replied, sadly; I am a
parentless
boy. There is none to call me brother. I can
remember once loving, both a mother and sister, but
they now sleep in the sea. Captain Lafitte found
me a lonely and dying boy on such a wreck as
this---he is all I have to care for me.
And does he care for you?
Lady, he does. His is a stern nature, and wild
deeds are familiar to him. Yet he has deep
affections
.
Lady, he cares much for me! He imagines
I resemble one---his brother, I believe, though he
seldom speaks of it---who met with some mischance
in boyhood---for that resemblance also am I dear to
him.
Do you love him, boy?
Do you love your father, lady?
Oh, speak not of my father---alas, he too is
dead!
Pardon me, Seora---but thus I love my
benefactor
.
The lady mused a moment upon the thoughts
which her companion's answer had called up---the
expiring gale sporting with her dark locks and
mantilla, which floated like a white cloud around
her head.
The lightning now became less frequent and
intense---the thunder rumbled only along the
distant
horizon---the dark clouds, from whose bosom
burst the storm, broke in huge masses, the thin
edges of which grew lighter, while a spot of the
deep, blue sky, in which sparkled a solitary star,
could be seen at intervals between the driving
masses. The waves grew less and less in size---
breaking no longer like volcanoes bursting into
flame, but regularly in snowy caps, or rolling
onward
,
smooth, unbroken billows.
All at once, beneath an opening in a cloud in the
east, the sea shone with a silvery light, and
Constanza
,
who had watched the various phases of the
storm, and the rapid changes of the scene, with a
pleased and wondering eye, had scarcely exclaimed,
Look seor---how beautiful! what can pour
that light down upon the sea? when the breaking
clouds, sailing before the receding gale, displayed
the moon shining in unclouded brilliancy upon the
heaving sea---glancing her welcome beams over
the waves in a path of tremulous light, and falling
like a smile from heaven upon the lonely wreck.
Ha! what! a sail! God be thanked!
exclaimed
the captain, as, after lashing the helm, he
made one of the group at the companion-way.
Look, young sir, with your keener eye---just in
the moon's wake---no---it is the cap of a wave!
It is a sail, sir! exclaimed the youth
joyfully---
I
saw distinctly the outline of a main-sail,
and then it disappeared as though by the rolling of
the vessel There! the sails look black against the
moonlight!
I see it, boy---you are right, answered the
captain, in a lively tone; she is within half a mile
of us.
The blessed Maria forbid that she should pass
us by! ejaculated Constanza.
We will remedy that, said the old commander,
cheerfully; and descending into the cabin, he
returned
with a large blunderbuss.
This will make more noise than a trumpet,
he said, cocking it; but we will first wait and see
if she does not come toward us.
I saw her distinctly, sir, said Thodore, while
you were below, and she appears to be a large
schooner lying to.
We will hail her then, said the captain; and
holding the blunderbuss high above his head, he
pointed it in the direction of the vessel and fired.
The report of the piece, to their ears, yet familiar
with the roar of the tempest, sounded very faintly.
I fear they will not hear it, he said, it
hardly seemed to go twice the length of the brig
towards
her.
The heart of the maiden sunk, and she
involuntarily
grasped the arm of the youthful sailor.--
There was a moment of anxious suspense, when a
light flashed upon their eyes from the stranger, and
the heavy report of a large gun came booming
across the water.
Thank God! we are safe! exclaimed the
captain.She must be an armed vessel, from the
free way she burns powder.
She is making sail, sir, said Thodore, after
gazing a minute intently at the vessel---she is a
schooner---her masts and main-sail are now plainly
visible; she has a main-top-mast stay-sail set, and
carries top-sails---with jib and flying jib---She is now
standing. No! do I see rightly? She is standing
from us, sir!
She is, indeed--- hastily exclaimed the
captain
,
in a disappointed tone.---She must have
mistaken
our situation. We are so low in the water,
she could not see us till close aboard of us. Show
a light upon the stump of the mainmast! he
shouted.
Before the seaman he addressed reached the
forecastle
,
Thodore had sprung below, and returned
to the deck with the swinging lamp, which hung in
the cabin, and, raising it on the end of the
blunderbuss
,
held it above his head.
In silence, and with heart-rending anxiety, they
watched the success of their beacon, and, in a few
minutes, an answering light from the stranger,
filled their bosoms with delight. The vessel now
tacked, and stood towards them, often appearing
and disappearing from their eyes, as the dismasted
brig rose upon some larger billow, or descended into
some profounder cavern of the waves.
Their deliverer came towards them, with tall and
stately motionhis sails rounded with the lulling
breeze, and his prow flinging high the spray, as
she bounded forward.
I should know that vessel, said Thodore,
quickly, as she came nearer.Yes! it is sir!
he said, turning to the captainthat is a
buccaneer
!
Lady, dear lady! he said, as a slight
exclamation
escaped Constanza, be not alarmed!
I am surety for your safety. That is one of our
squadronI am known to the commanderhe
shall convey you in safety to Jamaica.
The maiden spoke not, but with clasped hands
and tearful eyes, silently looked up to heaven, as
if she looked for that protection there, which
seemed denied her on earth.
Wreck ahoy! shouted a stern voice from
the schooner, which was now under the stern of the
brig, showing four ports to a side, and from the
numerous dark heads peering over the
hammock-nettings
,
apparently full of men.
Captain, your trumpet! allow me to reply.
Your safety depends upon it! said the youth,
taking the instrument from his passive hands.
Ho! the Juli!
Who the devil are you? replied the first
hailer.
A prize of Lafitte's, bound into the
rendezvous
,
and dismasted in the squall.
Is that Thodore?
Even as you are Sebastiano! Send a boat for
the prisoners; and, afterwards, take out the
cargo
.
It is valuable.
Be not so ready, my good youth, to bestow
what belongs not to you said the old man,
eagerly interposing.
There is no alternative, sir; he must have all.
And what avails it to you now, whether it go to the
use of good Sebastiano, there, who is making such
commendable haste with his boator, as must
inevitably
have been the case, to the bottom of the
sea!You must ask of Sebastiano no more than
life. He will argue the point with you, and
demonstrate
to his, if not to your satisfaction, that he
pays well for the cargo, by saving you from the
dolphins.
VOL I.13
The boat, riding over the huge seas, now
balancing
upon their summit, now disappearing in their
hollow, at length reached the wreck, and a
heavily-built
man, who had passed into his third score
of allotted years, stepped on to the deck of the
brig.
Oh, ThodoreSeor Thodore! scarcely
articulated the trembling maiden, clinging, with
nervous apprehension, to his arm.
Do not be alarmed, Seora, he replied,
encouragingly
,
I can manage this lump of bone and
muscle, as I would a chained bear. Ha! my good
Sebastiano! he added, addressing him with much
freedom, I greet your jocund phiz with more of
welcome than I ever dreamed I should do.
By the twelve apostles! always including the
worthy Judas, growled the buccaneer, in reply,
casting his eyes over the wreck, but you have
made clean work of this. Sathan, himself, seemed
to lend his bellows, and a spare hand, to help blow
out the gale to night. The Juli once carried a
holy father, and the devil could'nt hurt her, so we
were safe. Santa Madre!---if it had been in
broad noon, it would have blown out the suns
eye--Cielos!---but who have we here? he
continued
,
raising his voice, on discovering the figure
of the maiden, half-concealed behind the
intervening
person of the young buccaneer. Instinctively,
the terrified Constanza withdrew herself from the
rude gaze of the rover, and closely veiled her
face.
It is a lady, he said in his ear, who
goes on large ransom to Kingston:---She must
be treated, he added, firmly, with respect.---It is
the express command of Lafitte.
Seor Lafitte's commands are gospel to me
he replied, with deference in his gruff tones. Se
ora. Yo espero que su alteza veo en perfecta
saludhe said, addressing the assured Constanza,
and bowing with blunt respect in his manner.
This vessel being in a sinking condition,
Seora, he continued, it has become necessary
to remove you. In all things, captain Lafitte
should be obeyed; but circumstances, as I can
readily prove to you, often render obedience
impossible
,
as for instance
Come, Sebastiano, the lady will hear your
conclusion on board the Juli. Is your boat
ready?
All ready, Seorito Thodore.
Ho! he cried, make room for the captain's
lady to pass. He is to take to himself a wife,
according
to the command. Now it is good to marry
hombres, first, because if this generation should not
be given in marriage, the next---
Good Seor captain Sebastiano! exclaimed
Thodore, with some impatience.
Well, well, Seorito Thodore, the boat is
ready---in proof of which---
Hold hard, there, men! cried Thodore---
jump in, sir, said he to the captain of the brig,
who reluctantly obeyed. Now allow me to fold
this cloak about your form, Seora,---hold firmly to
my arm---Juana, step into the boat, or you will be
overboard---Now wait till the boat rises again---
There! step firmly! Done like a seaman! Se
ora! said Sebastiano, as he aided Thodore in
handing her into the boat. What a light foot for
a royal boy! he added aside to him.
Shove off! Now give way! he said aloud,
with a professional brevity unnatural to him; and,
in a few minutes, the party were safely landed on
the deck of the schooner.
Constanza assured, from the respect shown her
by the buccaneer, and the manifold influence of
Thodore over him and his crew, that she had
nothing
,
at present, to apprehend, retired to a little
state-room, to which he conducted her, and, wearied
by the trying scenes through which she had passed,
threw herself into one of the berths of the rude, but
comfortable, cabin, and was soon buried in profound
and peaceful sleep.
Thodore now took the pirate aside, and
explained
to him those facts which he did not choose to
disclose before the crew, ever ready to mutiny on
the slightest occasion.
Now, Sebastiano, he said, after the most
valuable
freight had been removed to the schooner from
the brig, which soon, with a plunge, disappeared
beneath the surface, and the seamen, placed under
the hatches, with some attention to their comfort,
as released prisoners of a former capture by their
captain, and sail once more made on the schooner,
Now, good Sebastiano, we must put into Kingston
to-morrow. This lady must be landed, according
to the terms of the ransom,---
Now, look you, my very worthy youth, whom,
next to captain Lafitte, I hold in all respect---and
for three reasons---
I will hear your reasons another time,
Sebastiano---
replied the youth, quickly---You must
to Kingston to-morrow.
Here a discussion of some length took place, in
which Sebastiano convinced his young friend, that,
on account of certain recent notorious captures, in
that vicinity, he would risk both his own, and the
necks of his men, and his vessel, if he approached
that port, as several armed cutters were already out
in search of him. Such was the cogency of his
arguments, that Thodore acquiesced; and
immediately
explained to the ill-fated maiden the
necessity
of adopting another course than that they
originally intended to pursue.
The schooner, therefore, under the orders of
captain
Sebastiano, steered for one of the rendezvous of
Lafitte's squadron, before alluded to, situated at
the head of the bay of Gonzares, in the Island of
St. Domingo.
13*
CHAPTER VIII.
Prince
. Said you the noble duke was taken prisoner?
Messenger
. Yes your highness, and most strangely--Sword
in hand, like a brave knight, he entered the breach at the head of his
soldiers, and before ten of them could follow him, the wall above fell
down and choked up the gap a score of feet in height--making a
second wall.
Prince
. And so he was caught with a mere handful of men
within the beleagured city!
Messenger
. It is too true your highness.
A PIRATE'S DECKA DUTCH BUCCANEERCHASESTORM
ENCOUNTERA PRISONER.
The
French golette, or tender, which bore the
fanciful name of EULIONE, having on board the
commander of the French frigate Le Sultan,
after separating from the larger vessel on gaining
the offing, sailed, as we have before mentioned,
southward, in the direction of Carthagenawhile
the former steered easterly for St. Domingo.
The object of Count D'Oyley, in taking an
opposite
course to that of his frigate, was to make surer
the chance of intercepting or overtaking the pirate
whom he sought, and who, he supposed, had sailed
for one of his two rendezvous in the West Indian
seasan uninhabited island near Carthagena, or
the secluded bay on the west coast of St. Domingo.
With the speed of the wind the little vessel flew
over the water, promising, by her unequalled velocity,
soon to gain the advantage which the buccaneer
had obtained by many hours precedence. The
bosom of the young Frenchman swelled, as,
glancing
over the side, he observed the rapid motion of
his vessel flinging the spray to her tops, and leaving
a long track of boiling foam astern. And his eye
passing over the decks lighted with pride and
pleasure
,
as it met the dark tiers of guns on either side,---
the circles of muskets and boarding pikes around
the masts---racks of cutlasses and pistols lining the
quarter-railand upon the gallant band of seamen
whom he had picked from his frigate for this
expedition
,
on account of their experience, fearlessness,
and fidelity.
Leaving the impatient lover on his pursuit of
retributive justice, we will precede him to the shores
of the Spanish main, toward which his vessel was
rapidly borne.
Noon held her burning sceptre over the southern
Carribbean sea, where our scene now opens, veiling
the tremulous outline of the distant hills of St.
Martha
in a gauze-like haze, while the sun, in his high
tropical altitude, was reflected with dazzling
brilliancy
in the glassy bosom of the waters.
There was not breath enough to toss a curl on
a maiden's brow. The surface of the ocean was
undimpled, and sleepily rolled its polished waves
towards a coral reef, dotted here and there with
clumps of low mangroves, upon which they broke
with a sudden roarsometimes leaping quite over
them, and mingling with the calm waters of the
lagoons
,
which stretched between them and the beach
of the main land.
Beyond this reef, and nearly opposite to the St.
Domingo gate, rising and falling upon the swells
with a swan-like motion, a xebec, or three-masted
schooner rode at anchor. Every spar and line of
rigging was painted upon the water with the
accuracy
of reality. Each mast consisted of a single
black stick, crossed obliquely by a long pliant yard,
upon which was brailed closely up a lateen sail
suspended about half the altitude of the mast from
the deck. The hull, which was about ninety feet
long, was constructed with great breadth of beam,
and flush from stem to stern. Like her spars it
was painted black, with the exception of a narrow
ribbon of red paint drawn around it just below the
gunwale. From her unusual breadth amidships,
the eye would be deceived in estimating her
tonnage
too large, but the extreme sharpness of her
bows more than qualified this unusual width, and
while it contradicted her apparent burden
promised
unusual speed.
Two large boats were lashed in the centre, and a
smaller one hung on each quarter. Directly
amidships
,
and just before the mainmast, on a revolving
carriage, was mounted a long gun, while in sockets
sunk in the frame-work around it were several
thirty-eight pound shota size proportioned to the
vast calibre of the piece. Besides this frowning
emblem
of war---on either side of the vessel, and half
run out of the ports, which were thrown open for
free circulation of the air, were three cannon of
different
calibre and metal---two of them being cast
out of brass and originally intended for heavy field
artillery, the others of iron, carrying eighteen and
twenty-four pound shot. The arms of Spain were
impressed on one, while the crown of Great Britian
and the eagle of the United States, were stamped in
bold relief upon the remainder.
The gun carriages were constructed of heavy
live oak, stained red, and rigged with chains and
cordage to keep them in their places. Bags and
hammocks were stowed away in the nettings in the
bulwarks, which were the height of a man's head
and impervious to musket balls. A forecastle,
main-hatchway
and companion-way were the only
passages
of communication between the main-deck and
lower. Around the first were congregated, under a
canvass awning, spread from side to side of the
vessel
,
about a score of men, in whose harsh and varied
countenances a physiognomist might recognize
individuals
of many nations. Although the dark
hair, gleaming eye, and full red lip of the Spaniard,
the swarthy cheek and inferior face of the
Portuguese
showed what countries they most numerously
represented.
Some of these were enjoying a
siesta
after their
rude meal, which they had just shared together
others were reclining in various easy and indolent
postures upon the deck, with segars between their
lips, laughing and jesting or playing tricks upon
their sleeping fellows. One was kneeling near the
windlass, muttering in a low tone, and lazily
fingering
a string of black glass beads, held in his hands,
while one or two, with folded arms, paced moodily
and silently the little clean space under the awning
not occupied by their shipmates.
These men were dressed nearly alike, in blue,
checked, cotton, or canvass trowsers, bound round
their waists by a red, blue, or white sashand
without
shoes or stockings. Conical caps, of various
colours, in which red and blue predominated, were
worn upon their headslying beside them on the
deck, or thrust into their bosoms. Some of them
wore woollen shirts of the same colour of their caps,
with the sleeves rolled up, and fastened at the neck
with gold and silver buttons, or else thrown back
over their shoulders exposing broad shoulders and
Herculean chests. Every man was armed with a
long double-edged knife with a broad blade, stuck
without a sheath in his girdle, upon the haft of
which, as they slept, walked or conversed, their
hands mechanically rested. For, in a community
like theirs, where a hasty word is spoken at the
price of the blood of the speaker, it became
necessary
that each one should bear upon his person, at
all times the means of defence and offence.
Heavier weapons, in the shape of cutlasses and
pikes, stood around the masts, and in other
convenient
places, ready for their grasp in the moment
of battle.
Under another awning, spread over the larboard
gang-way, and shading the space occupied by two
of the guns, was assembled another and larger
group, whose dress and mode of passing the sultry
hours of mid-day were similar.
On the opposite side of the deck, without the
shade, and in the sun, lay a negro upon his back,
with a grotesque expression upon his ungainly
features
,
playing with a monkey, which he held
struggling
in the air, and who had been curtailed of his
natural and most ornamental appendage, whilst,
undoubtedly for the preservation of symmetry, his
ears had been shorn after the same fashion.
Half a dozen boys, white, black and yellow,
whose heads displayed all the varieties of carroty,
woolly, and strait black hair, were gathered about
him, their coal black eyes sparkling with glee.
Each of these neophytes to the trade of
buccaneering
,
was naked to the waist, from which depended
an apron, or a pair of loose trowsers, (abridged,) from
dimensions adapted to men of much larger growth.
Small, sheathed knives, which were stuck in the
belt, or string confining their lower and only
teguments
,
were oftener in use for malice or mischief,
than the broader blades of the men.
One of these youths, whose robes would have
required much enlargement to rival the primitive
fig leafwas occupied in pricking, by way of
practice
in his profession, the hams of the suspended
monkey; and delighting himself, and his
particoloured
companions, in the contortions and yells of
the animal.
Farther aft, was spread an awning, whose
scolloped
edges, bound with some bright-red material,
indicated due consciousness of that superiority
which appertains either to the quarter-deck of a
ship of the line, or a pirate-schooner. Beneath this
gay awning reclined various individuals, whose
rank on board the schooner entitled them to
protection
from the sun farther astern, than the other
less-favoured
occupants of the vessel.
From the stays, which on either side supported
the after or mizen-mast, was stretched, about three
feet from the deck, a hammock of net-work, in
which lay a heavily-framed man, whose breadth
of shoulders indicated great physical power, while
the rotundity of his short person betrayed the
bon-vivant
.
His head was large, and covered with red,
bushy hair; his complexion, naturally fair, was now
changed to a jocund red; his eyes, small, deep set,
and grayhis forehead fleshy, and his cheeks full,
and hanging; while the lower portion of his face,
drooped into that second, and pleasing fulness,
which bears the appellation of double-chin. A
pair of white jean trowsers, enveloped his rotund,
lower limbs---while a loose gingham coat, was
wrapped partially around his body. His height,
or rather length, as he lay in the open hammock,
appeared less than five feet, and judging from the
lines of years which graced his visage, and an
occasional tuft of gray hair, interspersed in the
burning bush, which covered his phrenological
organs, his age might have been a little above
forty-five
or six.
At the time we introduce him to the reader, he
was lying with his face upwards, and one leg
hanging
out of the hammock, smoking a long fantastic
German pipe, and idly watching the little blue
clouds, as they circled above his head, rolled along
beneath the awning, and floated astern, into the
outward air. A half-naked African waved over
him a large fan, made of the variegated feathers of
some gorgeous Mexican birdwhom he would
occasionally take his pipe from his mouth to curse,
for roughly blowing some more beautiful wreath,
which had won his eye---breaking into a host of
flickering clouds. The slave's skill, seemed to
consist
in cooling the atmosphere around the head of
the smoker, without agitating the spiral wreaths
which were satisfactorily, and at regular intervals,
emitted from his large, vermillion lips.
On the deck, nearly under the hammock, reposed
two other figures, whose dress, and arms, which
they constantly wore, in connection with their
presence on the quarter-deck, indicated them to be
officers. A fourth figure, with dark and handsome
features, rendered unpleasing by an habitual,
sinister
expression, with a form slender and athletic,
calling
to mind one of the athlet of ancient Greece---
with flowing white trowsers and loose gingham
frock, confined to his waist by a yellow silk sash---
which also secured pistols and a cutlass---leaned in
an easy attitude against the binnacle, his muscular
arms bared to the shoulder, and folded over his
breast, while the smoke of a segar curled unheeded
over his head. His eyes were habitually fixed
upon the northern horizon, visible between the
awning and the quarter rail, but without that
consciousness
which indicated attention to any
particular
object. All at once, they lighted up, and dilated,
while his brow was lowered over them, as though to
shade, and strengthen his vision---and with his head
and body advanced, he looked long and steadily,
towards one point of the horizon.
Vat dat you shee, maat, slowly interrogated the
corpulent personage in the hammock, as his eye, by
chance, detected the change in the attitude, and
manner of his officer. No saail, mine Got---
heh!
A sail, I believe it is, captain---my glass here,
you black imps---jump! he cried, and the troop of
urchins, leaving the monkey in the midst of his
martyrdom, sprung for the campanion-way, but
were distanced by the
sans-culotte
, who the next
moment placed the spy-glass in the hands of the
officer.
A schooner, with a gaft top-sail, and top-gallant
mast---I can just see the peak of her main-sail!
he said, after looking a moment through the
instrument
.
Heh! dat shall pe Mynheer, captain Lafitte---
to pe shure! shee if dere pe royals?
She has none set---I can't well make out her
spars at this distance---but she brings a breeze with
her, whoever she be! her upper sails belly out
like , and looked round at the corporeal
curvature
of his captain for an illustration, with a sly
smile of Castillian humour.
None of dat, Mynheer Martinez, you are put a
strait spar---vereas I'sh am always under full
top-shails
,---to
pe shure. Tam dish hot climate---if haal
don't lay under dish tam Carribbean shee---den I'sh
neber ecshpect to shee it---it melts a maan down, like
trying out fat in de cook's kettlesh. Hugh, hugh,
hugh! it takes mine breat from out de body when
I'sh open mine mout, dis so tamn hotPuff, puff!---
Dere! dat wash a purty curl, wid de ring in de
middle
like de shmoke from de mout of de cannonsh,
he exclaimed. Turning growlingly to the slave,
Curse you, plack nigger, vat sall mak' you plow
in dis deble sortish styleI'll toss you ofer-poard to
mak' de breesh be comingto pe shure.
I make her out now, distinctly, said the first
officer---she is a schooner of about seventy tons,
with fore-top-sail, and top-gallant-sail set. Caramba!
she is walking down this way with a bone in her
teeth.
VOL I.14
Ho! there forward---stand by to get under weigh,
the breeze we have so long been wishing for is
coming upon us now, with a light heel---and
moreover
,
we are likly to have a breeze of long shot, by
the saucy looks of this stranger, he added, as
before one of those sudden and strong winds,
peculiar
to that climate, after a lengthened calm, the
vessel
rapidly approached, showing a tier of ports on
her starboard side, which was next to them, out of
which the heads of five or six guns bristled, with a
very warlike air.
Hah! vat ish dat you shays, maat, exclaimed
the captain, with some quickness; hol' dish
hammock
tort, you Congee nigger, vilst I gets out---
Dere! vas dere ever such tamn hot vedersh---dish
teck is like de oven vat baked Shadrach, and his
brod'ren. Hugh! and the portly commander of the
schooner standing upon his legs, after many
ponderous
sighs, and irrelevant ejaculations, took the
glass from his mate, and looked steadily at the
advancing vessel.
Mine Got, it ish true---he vill be carry ten kuns
in hish teck---to pe shure, and full of mansh,---he
said, with energy, as the schooner now within two
miles of them, hauled her wind and stood towards
Carthagena, seen indistinctly in the distance
through the heated atmosphere, which danced with
a tremulous, wavy motion over every object. With
its silvery beach---battlements groaning with
cannon
,
its heavy towers, convents, and monasteries,
and surrounding eminences, strongly fortified, with
their sides dotted with picturesque villas, the city
with its surburbs, slept beneath the glowing noon,
in the silence of midnight.
The breeze now ruffled the surface of the water
around their vessel, breaking it into myriads of little
waves, which emulously leaped into the air, as
though to welcome its approach.
Man the capstan; heave up the anchor!
shouted the mate, sternly---and every sleeper sprung
to his feet, and every idler and jester became at once
active and serious.
The capstan soon flew merrily round, and at the
brails and halyards of the lateen sails, ready to obey
the orders of their officer, stood various parties of
the crew.
Show the trading lugger,---he added, and the
guns were hastily drawn in, and the ports closed, so
as to present a plain broad side to the stranger.
The anchor was soon hanging from the bows---
the triangular sails of each mast spread to the
breeze---the jib, which extended along the short
bowsprit, was hoisted, and the vessel bending low
before the wind, moved through the water with
increasing velocity.
Shall we try him captain? said the mate,
coolly, retiring to the quarter deck, after getting sail
on the schooner.
Dry--vivty tyfils! Tamn! noting else sall be got
peside, from dish chap, put iron piscuit in te pread
pasketto be shure, said he sympathizingly, laying
a hand upon that important portion of his body---
tyfil a pit sall ve dry him, Martinez.
Then, now we are under weigh, shall we steer
for Gonares? he inquired.
Yes, Mynheer Martinezde hatches are as full
as an English-mansh
Or a Dutchman's Captain! interrupted
Martinez
,
with a wink to his junior in command.
Letsh me shpeak Martinez, grumbled the
captain
good-humouredly. or a Tutchmansh after
Chrishmash tinnerdere is no more room for de
more cargoeshif we take more prishesPut de
helm up for Gonaresh!
Obedient to the braces the sails swung round until
they lay nearly parallel with the length of the
vessel
and close-hauled on the wind, lying down to
leeward, so that her gunwales dipped deep in the
water the vessel left the shores of Carthagena
behind her, and stood for St. Domingo.
She had sailed on this course but a short time,
when the stranger, who was standing in the
opposite
direction, also changed his course hauling close
on the wind and running so as to intercept the
buccaneer
.
Martinez, dish looksh shqually---one, two, drie,
vive guns on hish shide. said the captain as he
observed
this measure, he ish a cruiser---ve musht
fight or show him our heelsh, and vy sall ve fight,
ven dere ish no purpose---ve can take no more
coods---put he vill, may pe, take ush---to pe shure!
It petter not pe fightings---Heh! Martinez---
As you say sir---I suspect he is in chase of our
vessel---we can hardly cope with him. Set the gaft
topsails, and hoist away the spencer, he shouted;---
and this last sail, with three small triangular sails
stretched from the topmasts, which were of one piece
with the lower masts, now spread to the wind, gave
additional speed to the vessel. Groaning and
straining
through every joint, she parted the green
waves before her, flinging them around her bows,
and promising to distance the other vessel, which
having the wind on the pirate, now rapidly neared
him.
It now became the object of the pirate to escape
from the armed vessel, which was evidently trying
to cut him off---to this end all his energies were now
directed. The vessels were rapidly approaching
the same point, which, once passed, the pirate felt
there was a chance of his escape.
As he was giving various orders to increase the
speed of the vessel by securing the guns, or
changing
their position; and tightening the braces, the
stranger suddenly run up the French flag, and a
puff of smoke from the side of his vessel was
immediately
followd by the report of a cannon, and the
skipping of a round shot across their wake, within a
few fathoms of the stern---
Heh! vivty tyfils! he shpeaks mit de iron
trumpet---Martinez
,
continued the captain with an
energy
unlooked for in a man of his corporature---ve
musht lame him---or dis nicht de tolphins vill eat a
goot supper, from the potty of Mynheer Jacob
Getzendauner---to
pe shure!
Clear the starboard guns and double shot them
---stand ready to give him a broadside---Here Jacobo,
Andrea, Manuel! where are your ears? level that
long gun and let him have it from stem to stern as
we cross his bows, make a clean sweep through
him!---now stand ready all!---shouted the young
Spaniard to whom his captain seemed to have
resigned
the more active duties of command; and
springing
upon the hammock nettings he watched with
a deliberate eye the motions of the approaching
vessel.
The pirate was standing nearly due north, close
hauled upon the wind, which was from the
north-west
,
and running at the rate of about eight knots,
while the French schooner was standing nearly in a
south-western course, also close-hauled with every
thing drawing endeavouring to keep to the
windward
of the pirate, who was using every effort
to prevent the success of this nautical manuvre.
They were within less than half a mile of each
other when the mate sprung upon the quarter-rail to
watch the favourable moment to disable his
opponent
.---The
faces of the men and officers in uniform
upon the decks of the strange schooner were easily
discernable by him---and he observed that on board
of her every preparation was made for action.
Can we cross her fore-foot,---sir? said he, turning
14*
to his captain, who stood by with a face expressive
of some anxiety but more resolution---
No---no Martinez---tish an impossible---if ve
letsh him go acrosh our cutvater he vill sink ush,
to pe shure---
Shall we give it to him? inquired the
Spaniard
,
it is our only chance!
Aye---hoisht avay de crosh and het, and tunder
mit de kuns.
At his command a black flag, upon which was
painted a red cross, surmounted by a Death's head,
fluttered at the mast-head.
Now fling open the ports---well aim each gun,
let go sheets and braces all! he shouted, as the
Frenchman began to show his weather ports
now she rights, give it to him---fire! One after
another, in rapid succession, the guns of the
starboard
broadside were fired at the schooner, and the
pirate had the satisfaction of witnessing her
fore-topmast
fall over the side, cut in two by a shot. The
wounded vessel yawned and fell off from the wind,
whilst the pirate crew shouted like demons at their
success.
Well done my men!---braces
all-hard-a-weather
!
cried the mate, cheerfully.
Once more under steerage-way, the buccaneer
shot ahead and to windward of the chase, who,
wearing round, gave her a broadside which tore up
her forecastle deck, killing two men, breaking an
arm of one of the young apprentices before
introduced
to the reader---and slightly injuring the
bow-sprit
.
The pirate now moved over the water with
rapidity
,
leaving his wounded pursuer far astern,
though still slowly in chase. With his glass he
could detect the men aloft repairing the rigging,
and setting the topmast while every other spar and
sail that could be made available was brought into
use.
Night found the vessels more than a league apart,
their repairs, completed, steering the same course,
and still the pursuing and pursued. The wind,
after the sun went down, gradually increased, and
at midnight a storm lashed the waters into foam.
The vessels were separated from each other in the
darkness, and their crews were engaged until
day-break
in a battle with elements, instead of each
other. As the morning broke the gale abated,
and by the increased light the pirate saw his
opponent
lying to within a third of a mile of him to
windward.
All hands to make sail, he shouted, but the
stranger had already discovered him, and was
spreading his canvass, and bearing down upon
him.
Now we must fight captain! he said to his
superior officer, who had just come to the deck--we
have no chance of using our guns in this sea.---
Dios y St. Jago, he hastily exclaimed, they are
preparing to board us---Ho! there boarders, all!---
repel boarders!---he shouted.
Cutlasses and boarding pikes were rapidly
passed
from hand to hand along the decks---the men
stripped to their trowsers, placed their pistols in
their belts---and in three divisions at the bows, stern
and midships, headed by the captain; Martinez
and an inferior officer, they stood sullenly and
resolutely to receive their foe.---The sea was rolling
in large waves, over which the armed stranger
rode lightly, as he advanced to engage with the
pirate. The vessels were now within hail of each
other.
Ho, the schooner, ahoy! was borne across the
water upon the wind, and distinctly heard above the
surging of the sea---Strike your flag or no
quarter
!
A Carthagenian cruiser! replied Martinez, as
the flag of that state was displayed at the peak.
What is that he says, inquired Count D'Oyley,
who had hailed, to his young companion Montville,
who stood by his side---a cruiser! a pirate, as his
well-shotted guns told us but last night.---Boarders
be ready---I may find here what I wish, he added
to himself, or a guide to the present rendezvous of
their chief---Lay her alongside! he cried, as the
vessel came close to the pirate---now grapple!---
he shouted, in a loud energetic voice---and the
vessels
came together with a dangerous shock.
Drawing his sword he waved it over his head,
shouting Allons mes braves! and bounding over
the bulwarks, he leaped with one bound upon
the deck of the pirate, followed by Montville.
---Before
his men could equal his rapid movements, the
pirate's crew had discharged their guns on the side
next to the schooner, the recoil from which, and the
simultaneous shock of a huge wave, breaking upon
her stern, parted the two vessels with violence, and
a succeeding wave swelling to a vast height bore
them at a great distance apart.---The count was
engaged immediately hand to hand with the
Spaniard---while
young Montville, was saved from
being run through the body in a dozen places, by
the interference of the captain, who disarmed him
by a blow of his cutlass, and grasping him, thrust
him down the companion-way into the cabin.
Vasht dere, mine mensh! he cried to the crew,
who were rushing upon the French officer; vasht
dere---let Martinez here have dis pretty pit o' fight
to himself. A good poy is Martinez---let him fight
to pe shure! and while he spoke, the sword and
cutlass of the combatants rung as they interchanged
fierce and rapid blows.
Hold!---are you Lafitte? cried Count D'Oyley,
parrying the weapon of his antagonist.
Yes, seor, I am Lafitte---if it please you!
replied Martinez, eagerly, after an instant's
hesitancy
.
Have at you, then---to the death! cried the
count, raining the blows upon him with a skill and
energy which it required all his activity and
presence
of mind to parry. The fight was long and
desperate---the eyes of the Spaniard flashed with a
snake-like brightness, while the countenance of the
Frenchman glowed with fierce and determined
energy
.
Three times had his sword passed through
the arm of the Spaniard, who, with a chivalry
worthy of a nobler cause, was willing to lose his life
as the personater of Lafitte, rather than confess
himself a less notable antagonist. Once had his
weapon gashed the breast of the Frenchman, when
the captain, who had with difficulty restrained the
buccaneers from rushing aft and cutting down the
stranger, knocked up their weapons.
Dis vill pe petter stopped, Martinez---dish ish
mine prishoner---he vill mak de ranshom monish. I
vill tak your sword, Mynheer.
The count, wounded, and weak from loss of
blood, surrendered it, and at the command of the
captain, was conducted by two of the crew into the
cabin.
The mate, hastily staunching the blood from his
slight wounds, looked over the side and saw the
enemy at a distance, with her rudder shot away,
tossed about at the mercy of the waves, and wholly
incapable of renewing the contest. He then gave
orders to make all sail for the rendezvous---and in a
few minutes the schooner stood on her former course,
under pressure of all her canvass.
CHAPTER IX.
Our plans are often thwarted by the means we make use of to
insure
success. This is frequently independent of all our manuvering,
and befriends us when circumstances seem most adverse.
Edwards
.
PIRATE'S RENDEZVOUSCAPTIVESSTANZASSCENE IN A GROTTO.
The
scenery of the north-eastern portion of the
Gulf is varied by immense gorges, flanked by
precipitous
cliffs, indented with caverns, many of which are
of great extent, sometimes penetrating into the bosom
of the rocky ridges several hundred feet. The
Cibao mountains, an elevated range, commencing
near Cape Espada, terminate at Cape St. Nicolas,
on the extremity of the most northern of the two
western tongues of the island. At this point the
main spine of the mountain separates into several
precipitous promontories, one or two of which end
abruptly at the sea-shore, over which they form
precipices
many hundred feet in height.
These cliffs share the peculiar features of the wild
scenery of this region, and caverns, and rocky ravines,
nearly enclosed above, are excavated by the hand
of nature, or some convulsion of her empire, in great
numbers along their bases. The loftiest of these
Alpine branches, after running out an isolated mural
precipice into the sea, for more than half a league,
ends in a bluff about three hundred feet in height,
the edge of which, covered with rich woods, juts
several yards out over the perpendicular face, like a
stupendous roof. Beneath, the water was very deep
and clear, displaying, to one looking down from the
cave, thousands of many-coloured sea shells.
About twenty feet above the surface of the water,
the face of the rock receded, leaving a terrace, against
which a vessel might lie so closely, that one could
step from it on to her yards. This terrace was about
thirty feet broad, and upon it frowned a heavy gun
placed on a carriage. Beyond it opened the mouth
of a vast cavern, which, with many sinuosities,
penetrated far into the base of the cliff. The
entrance
was irregularly formed, in shape somewhat
resembling a gothic gateway, though of gigantic
dimensions. In front of this entrance spread the
broad gulf of Gonares, which flowed unbroken
to within about half a mile of the cavern, where
it met, with a loud roar, two nearly parallel
ridges of high rocks, extending from the base of the
cliff, leaving a narrow, deep passage from the sea
for small vessels, quite to the foot of the rock, or
vestibule
of the grotto beneath, in front of which,
widening
into a small basin, it formed a safe and
convenient
shelter.
This cavern had long been used by the
buccaneers
as a general rendezvous---a repository for their
treasures, and a prison for those captives whom they
detained for the purpose of drawing ransom for their
liberation. Here also they resorted to repair their
vessels, and to receive the instructions of Lafitte,
who made this rendezvous of his fleet only second
to that of Barritaria. To this scene we now
transport
our readers---about a week after the expedition
against the villa of Seor Velasquez.
The principal apartment of this grotto consisted
of an interior chamber, illuminated by a solitary
lamp, burning in a projecting shelf of the cave. It
was about forty feet in diameter, and nearly
circular
,
rising into a lofty dome, from the nave of which
hung a stalactic mass of open work, resembling a
huge chandelier---as it reflected in numerous brilliant
points the rays of the little lamp beneath.
Crystalized icicles, and innumerable fanciful
stalactic creations, hung around the
chamber---pilasters
of the same beautiful material, terminating in
half-formed arches, stood out in fine relief from the
dark sides, united by delicate lattice-tracery. The
dome itself was carved, with the accuracy of
architecture
into the richest fret-work. Shaded niches
were half concealed by exquisitely arranged folds
of thin plates of stalactite. The roof was open to
the blue sky, through which one or two trembling
stars could be seen glancing among the waving
foliage. Vast rocks lay upon the floor of the room,
fallen, apparently, from deep niches in the sides and
ceiling, while regular forms, like statues, pedestals,
and columns, either stood, or were strewed about the
chamber. At the extremity of the cave, a small,
glittering cascade of water gushed from a crevice
in the side, and with a monotonous sound, rung upon
the rocky pavement beneath, and after flowing over
it, like running glass, for a few feet, disappeared in
a deep pit opened in a recess of the cave, and could
be heard, after long intervals, reverberating in the
vast depths, as it leaped from shelf to shelf, till the
sound was lost in the bowels of the earth.
One side of the cave was covered by fantastic
stalactic drapery, which fell in a broad sheet to the
floor.
The only entrance to the cavern, before which
paced a sailor-sentinel, was narrow, and lighted near
the outside by a lamp, which had once hung in a
ship's cabin, suspended from the low ceiling. From
this passage branched others, for a short distance,
terminating sometimes in small rooms, at others in
deep pits and mere crevices in the rock. Many of
these branches, or lesser caverns, contained chests,
tables,chairs, arms, and garments, strewn about---
hammocks, cooking utensils, and other indications
of being occasionally occupied. Naval and military
weapons, with a few articles of ship furniture, were
scattered about the room, and bales of goods were
piled in recesses around the cavern.
In one of these recesses, terminated by a stalactic
sheet, almost transparent, dropped from the low
roof to the rocky pavement, and forming one side
of the niche, was spread a strip of rich carpet, strewn
with bamboo leaves, upon which reclined a figure,
half obscured in the gloom of the deeply-shaded
vault, buried in sound, but feverish sleep. His head
was uncovered, displaying a profusion of chesnut
hair; his brow was pale, and his eyelids and
temples
were transparent from illness. His form was
partly wrapped in a dark blue cloak, upon the folds
of which rested his left arm, bandaged as though
to protect a wound. The rays of the lamp in the
larger chamber, half interrupted by the projecting
sides of the niche, fell obliquely across the upper
part of his face, leaving the lower portion in deep
shadow. A broken sabre and a shattered pistol lay
near him, the relics of a recent fierce conflict
between
the prisoner, for such he was, and the young
Spaniard Martinez, his captor, in attempting to
escape from the cave.
There was a deep silence in the cave,
uninterrupted
save by the breathing of the sleeper, which was
irregular, and occasionally the low rumbling of the
distant surf, reverberating along the passages, and
nearly lost before it came moaningly into the inner
chamber of the grotto.
Suddenly the silence was broken by a low voice,
apparently from some concealed recess, singing a
VOL. I.15
plaintive air. The words were Castillian, and
flowed from the lips of the invisible singer with
melancholy cadence.
I.
The virgin moon, with timid hand,
Unmoors her silver boat;
And inexperienc'd to command,
Loves near the earth to float.
II.
Each night, she tries the gentle gale,
And plies her silvery oar;
Each night she spreads a broader sail,
And further leaves the shore.
III.
How boldly through the azure sea
Her little bark she guides!
Before the gentle breeze, how free
And gallantly she rides!
IV.
Now half her heavenly journey through,
Each sail is flung amain!
The prize she seeks through heaven blue,
Is foundto lose again.
V.
And steering gently for the shore,
Where first she sought the gale,
With hand as timid as before,
She furls her snowy sail.
VI.
Thus Hope unmoors her fragile boat,
And boldly tempts the main;
Winning the daring height she sought,
To fall to earth again.
VII.
So Love, yet bolder, leaves the shore,
And fearless sails the sea;
With flowing sheet and plying oar,
He courses gallantly.
VIII.
Bravely he bears him for the prize,
Nor sooner is it won,
Than, as the moon wanes in the skies,
Love, love, alas, is gone!
The voice was soft and silvery in its tones, yet
the sleeper, like one on whom a finger is lightly
laid, started and opened his eyes as the first notes
fell upon his ear, and gazed wonderingly around
him, as if spell-bound, until the last tremulous notes
ceased, and silence reigned again throughout the
solemn vault.
Do I dreamthat voice!it is hushed!I
must be dreaming! he exclaimed, starting with
energy and strength from his couch, and gazing
wildly around him Ah! it was but a sweet
dream---this cave! this wounded arm---alas! I am
a prisoner! Kind heaven, I thank thee for this
happy dream! he exclaimed, fervently. And is
it indeed a dream?---may not her released spirit
have been hovering over me in my sleep, and
soothing
my burning slumbers with that air I loved to
hear her sing on earth. Oh, blessed spirit! he
fervently cried, under the influence of his fevered
imagination, dropping upon his knee, if thou art
indeed near me, bless me with that angelic melody.
Sweet Constanza! if I may not see thee, let me
hear thy voice once more!
Who calls upon the name of Constanza? fell
upon his ear, in the liquid and melancholy accents
of the song.
Mon Dieu! it is---it is she! he exclaimed;
identity of circumstances, and places, and
recollection
of the causes which brought him there,
suddenly
returning. It is---it is she---Constanza!
Constanza! speak! are you there? he cried,
turning
to the side of the niche from which the voice
proceeded, and placing his lips to the thin stalactic
wall. It is D'Oyley that addresses you!
Alphonse!---my own Alphonse! she
exclaimed
,
her voice trembling between hope and fear;
can it be you?---no! no! Alphonse is far, far
away, and knows not the fate of his poor
Constanza
!
God of heaven! it is indeed Constanza!
exclaimed
the count, assured. Dear Constanza, I
have come to release you---it is your own Alphonse!
and no other! Is there no way of getting to you?
he cried, suddenly endowed with almost
supernatural
strength, at the same time eagerly seeking
some mode of ingress to that part of the cavern
where she was evidently imprisoned. There was
no reply from within to his anxious inquiry.
Tell me, Constanza, he continued, raising his
voice; Do you know the passage that leads from
without to your apartment? Direct me, and I will
pass out---master my guard---enter, and rescue you!
Speak---dear Constanza! he earnestly added; but
the echoes of his own voice through the hollow
cavern, only replied to his eager words.
`She must have fainted, or---Heaven be blessed!
here is a passage! he added, with delight, as his
eye glanced from the stalactic drapery separating
the vaults, to a heavy iron pike which lay upon the
pavement; this shall do my purpose! and seizing
the weapon, he struck with violence upon the
transparent
and brittle surface of the wall, and repeating
the blow, with additional force, the stalactic sheet
gave way, broken and shattered like ice. In a few
moments, under his heavy strokes, a breech was
made through the partition, and a stream of light
passed through the aperture into his part of the
cave. Inspired to greater exertions by this success,
he redoubled his efforts. But finding his strength
failing before he could effect an opening sufficient
to admit his body, he cast his eyes round for some
more powerful agent and they rested upon a broken
spar leaning against the side of the outer cavern.
This he grasped, and with all his remaining strength,
bore it heavily against the breech, when, after
repeating
his efforts, a large mass fell inward and
left a broad opening. With an exclamation of
joyful
surprise, he sprung through the passage into the
apartment.
It was an immense chamber, dimly lighted by a
lamp, suspended, in chains, from the low ceiling.
The walls, where they were not stuccoed with grey
stalactic incrustations, were black. He paused a
moment at the entrance, to give his vision power to
perceive, through the mysterious half-illumined
darkness, the dimensions and details of the vault.
Through a large crevice above, he saw, faintly
shining into the aperture, the moon, which,
probably
associated with the thoughts of her lover,
suggested the song he heard. There appeared one
inlet to the apartment, on the opposite side, which
was now closed by a heavily barred door. In the
centre of the chamber, under a kind of canopy
made of canvass, was spread a rug, dyed of many
brilliant colours. An old negress sat upon her
heels, at the side of it, fast asleep, yet waving over
the unoccupied carpet, a tuft of feathers. A basket
of fruits, and a silver basin of spring water, stood
near her, and various costly articles for the toilet,
and a clasped missal and a guitar, lay upon a
velvet
cushion, placed at the head of the mat.
There was no other furniture in the vast cavern,
which was silent and desolateits distant
extremities
scarcely perceptible in the perpetual darkness
which reigned there.
Where has she disappeared? exclaimed the
lover, as his eye surveyed these details, without
meeting the object he sought. Springing into the
chamber, he started! as, lying by the side of a
fallen stalactic pillar, he saw the lifeless form of the
Castillian maiden.
He kneeled by her side, and placed his lips upon
her own. They were scarcely warm with life, and
the throbbing of her breast was faint, and her pulse,
15*
as he pressed his finger upon her wrist, was like
the dying vibration of a harp-string. Raising her,
he bore her to the canopy, and placed her upon the
humble couch, which, by the kindness of
Theodore
,
had been placed in the chamber, awakened
the old negress, and, with her aid, after a long time,
restored her to consciousness.
Blessed Maria! where am I? faintly inquired
the maiden, as she gazed around her.And
did I hear his voicecan it be real!oh! it was
too much!too much joy!and she looked
eagerly up into the face of the negress.
Juana, is it only you? she added, in a
disappointed
tone. Of what was I thinking? And
again she closed her eyes, as if endeavouring to
recal some pleasing vision. Did you not hear a
voice, Juana? It was his,yes! it must have
been his! I thought it Lafitte'she can speak
like him, when he will, but it was his. D'Oyley's!
my own Alphonse's!
Alphonse is near you, dear Constanza! look
up, said the count, and she felt her hand pressed
ardently, while a warm kiss was imprinted upon
her lips.
Opening her eyes, and fixing them full upon her
lover, who had retired a little, when animation first
returned, lest his sudden presence, like the sound
of his voice, should again throw her into
insensibility
.
Is it, indeed, Alphonse? she joyfully
exclaimed
,
and, for a few moments, the lovers remained
locked in each other's arms.
What, she at length said, have I not
suffered
!
I know it. I know all, Constanza! but, let us
think of escape, he added---Can you sit up?
and raising her from the mat, sat beside her upon
the cushion.
Oh, what have I not suffered! she repeated,
leaning her head upon his shoulder, and bursting
into tears. I know not how, amidst all the dreary
scenes I have passed through, I have retained my
reason. And yet I live! and bless thee! dear
Maria! all I love on earth, is by my sidemy own
Alphonse! And she pressed him to her bosom,
as if she feared he would again be separated from
her.
And still, my Constanza! in all these wild
and fearful scenessurrounded by such beings---in
the power of such men---still,
my
Constanza?
Forgive
me, sweet one! but if you have suffered
wrong, dearly shall you be revenged!
Constanza is still the Constanza you left her!
she cried, with emotion, while the rich blood
mounted
to her cheek, as she hid her face in his bosom;
although a prisoner, I have been treated with
honour, and, as she spoke, truth and innocence
were written upon her pure brow, too plainly to be
misconstrued---and, clasping her in his arms, he
exclaimed, Too much happiness! Protector of
the innocent! he added, looking upward, I
thank thee!
We will briefly pass over the story Constanza
related to her lover, in which she detailed the
incidents
connected with her first capture from her
father's
roof---her liberation by the pirate---her second
capture by one of his vessels, and her landing, the
day before, at the cave. She also informed him
of the departure of the vessel, which captured her,
on another expedition---spoke of her lonely and
desolate
situation in the cavern, whither she was
conveyed
on leaving the vessel, and, in grateful terms,
mentioned the kindness of young Thodore, who
visited her occasionally, and had shown those
attentions to her comfort, with which she was
surrounded
,
and alsosecured to her, not withstanding the
objections of the pirate, Sebastiano, the attendance of
old black Juana; who, with a fidelity, peculiar to
the negro, had never left her from the time of her
capture.
CHAPTER X.
Some of the severest naval battles in which we have recently
been engaged, in the West Indian seas, were between our cruisers
and the pirates who infest them
These daring men, had fortified themselves in the natural caverns,
abounding in those regions, in some cases rendering them almost
impregnable
,
from which, in large armed vessels, they issued and spread
devastation among our commerce.
Residence in the West Indies
.
PLAN OF ESCAPEA SURPRISEFIGHT WITH AN AMERICAN
CRUISERLAFITTE.
The
night had far advanced before the Castillian
maiden completed her relation.
Dearest Constanza, how much you have passed
through! and this Lafitte---he has magnanimity of
soul, which, in a man of his lawless character,
surprises
me. But men, however lost to virtue, are
never wholly depraved. The heavenly spark will
yet linger in the heart, though hid from the eyes of
men, and now and then will break suddenly out
into flame.
I must meet this man---there is a nobleness about
him that captivates me, and the more so, that it
was unlooked for. Now that you are safe, dearest
Constanza, my revenge is gone---I would know
and redeem this extraordinary man. But, he
added quickly, let us escape from this fearful
spot. He is not here to control the wild beings that
surround us. There are several boats lying in the
basin. Once outside---we can seize one of them,
and a few hours sail, will take us to the Mole, near
Cape St. Nicholas, where we shall be safe from
pursuit
.
This Thodore, of whom you speak so
warmly, will he not favour our escape?
Ask him not, Alphonse---he would not refuse.
Ask him not---although his benefactor be an outlaw,
let us not tempt him to betray him. I would
rather wait the return of Lafitte, than implicate
this youth in our escape.
You are right, noble girl! There is, he
continued
in a low, eager tone but a single sentinel,
at the mouth of the grotto, and here are weapons;
he exclaimed, with joyful surprise, as his eye rested
upon a pair of pistols left by Thodore, and
loaded
too! with these, and this pike, I can overcome
all opposition. Come Constanza, my brave one!
this shall be the last trial of your fortitude. Lean
upon my armheavier! the occasion has given
me back my full strength. Juana, will you go
with usor stay with the pirates?
Ol' Juana go wid young buckra lady. If she
be nigger she lub de lily 'ooman. Ol' Juana neber
leab her if massa say.
Take up that basket of fruit, and this carpet and
cushion, to place in the boat and follow then, good
Juana, he said to her, placing the pistols in his
belt.
Then conducting Constanza, through the breach
he had made in the wall, he led her into the
chamber
he had occupied.
And here was your prison! She said with
feeling---how lonely you must have been here, and
wounded too! But blessed be the kind Maria for
this meeting! If we escape not---I can die
cheerfully
in your arms. Happy thought! If we fail
in our purpose, we can die together. Oh let us
hasten, Alphonse!
The count, lingered a moment to remove the
lamp from the wall. Here Juana, he said,
giving
it to the slave, go before with this light, we
will follow some distance behind you in the
darkness
.
The sentinel will perhaps let you pass to
the outside, or if he stops you, to ask any
questions
,
draw him aside and so glare the light upon
his eyes, that we may pass him unseen. Have you
tact enough for it.
Hi! yes massa, Juana un'stand ebery ting---she
know how mak fool ob Gaspr.
The faithful slave, her singleness of heart
singularly
preserved in the rude life she had passed---
whom the gentleness of Constanza had devoted to
her interest---moved silently in advance, through the
narrow passage, which after many windings, opened
upon the terrace. The count, followed at a short
distance, so as to be invisible in the shadow cast by
the intervening person of the slave---the
trembling
Constanza leaning upon his arm, which
passed around her waist, supported her drooping
form. Solitude reigned in silence around them.
Solitary cells branched out on either side, whose
gloom, the rays of the lamp could not penetrate.
The walls were encrusted with gray stalactite or
black, and covered with deep mould. As they
advanced, the passage became narrower, and the
roof descended within reach of their hands. All
at once they entered a large dome, open to the
skya hundred feet above them, waved heavily in
the night winds, the branches of trees, overhanging
the vergethin white clouds drifted along the sky,
and burning afar off, here and there appeared a
star.
Oh that we were as free as those clouds!
exclaimed
Constanza, gazing upward at the lovely
scene. How happy I shall be to behold the blue
heavens once more, and feel that I am free. Oh!
that dismal cavern! To-night I awoke and the
moon was shining down upon me, through a small
crevice in the ceiling. It fell full upon my face,
and I felt it was the augury of happiness. The
song you taught me, and say you love to hear me
sing, came involuntary to my lips---and I had
hardly ceased when I heard your voice, and sprung
at the sound---and when I reflected a moment, I
feared it was not yours; but, when assured of it,
the tide of joy was too great! Oh the joy with
which my heart bounded when I saw you bending
over me!
Dearest Constanza! he exclaimed, pressing
her to his heart.
During this brief conversation, they had
traversed
the pavement of the dome and entered a
dark narrow passage, which, after a few steps, grew
broarder and higher, and the cool wind came
circling
past them, from without.
Hold Juana! he called in a suppressed voice,
we are now near the mouthdo you reccollect my
instructions? he inquired, as the negress obeyed
him. Hark! what is thata gun---another---a
cannonading! Heaven avert danger! Constanza
my dearest one! be not alarmed! he said, feeling
the form of the maiden shrink and tremble, as the
loud reports fell upon her ear---exert all your
firmness
for now we need it, he added, cheerfully and
encouragingly, as he warmly pressed her hand,
and, parting the rich hair, he imprinted a kiss upon
her brow.
I willI will---Alphonse---it was but a
momentary
weakness---I will nerve myself for this hour of
trial, I will be worthy of you. Thank you,
dearest---now
remain here in this niche, with your
faithful
Juana, while I go and reconnoitre. Nay, do not
be alarmed, I shall not expose myself to danger. I
cannot forget that your life and happiness depend
upon my caution. I will be with you in a
moment
,
and rapidly as the darkness would permit,
feeling his way with his pike, he advanced towards
the entrance of the cave.
The firing still continued, and every succeeding
report appeared nearer. Suddenly a ray of light,
pencilled along the wall, caught his eye and
turning
an abrupt angle, a lamp suspended above him,
glared brightly upon his face. Starting back into
the shadow of the projecting rock, he looked
cautiously
forward and saw, although at some distance,
the mouth of the cave, beyond which, was a glimpse
of the moonlit bay---and the figure of a man,
relieved
against the silvery sheen of the sea, standing
upon a projecting rock, far from the entrance of the
grotto. This he concluded must be the guard, who
had left his post attracted by the cannonading, with
which, was now mingled the firing of musketry,
and the shouts of combatants.
The officer passed hastily under the lamp, and
approached the entrance with a noiseless footstep.
Within a few feet of the exterior, was a shelf
elevated the height of a man above the floor. This
he lightly ascended, fearing to emerge into the
moonlight, where the sentinel might observe him.
From this point, thrown into shade by the
overhanging
arch of the cave, he obtained a view of
the strait which led from the base of the cliff,
between lines of rocks to the open sea.
About a mile from the shore, clouds of white
smoke rested upon the water, from which could be
seen the sails and spars of a large vessel, apparently
a brig, above which rolled dense volumes of smoke,
accompanied by the roar and flash of cannon.
Nearer the shore, and just entering the narrow
avenue which led from the sea into the basin, at the
foot of the cave, was a large schooner under press
of sail, occasionally discharging a gun at the other
vessel, which appeared in chase of her.
VOL. I.16
As the count climbed to the shelf, the
cannonading
ceased, the smoke rolled away over the
water to the leeward shore, and circling up the cliff
settled upon their summits, and the clear moonlight
shone quietly upon the scene, whitening the canvass
of the approaching vessel, which was now passing
up the strait. The large vessel was discovered
lying to, and three boats apparently filled with
armed
men---for the light glanced from many
musket
barrels and cutlasses, as the boats pulled silently
and rapidly into the shore.
A buccaneer chased by a cruiser! he exclaimed.
Heaven grant she may be captured. There is a
better chance of our escape than I looked for---if
victory
side with the right.
The schooner now approached so near the
termination
of the long rocky passage, that the voices on
board reached his ears, with the sound of hasty feet
upon her deck, the creaking of rigging, and the
rushing of the water, as she ploughed it up before
her. He watched her until she almost came under
the cliffs, so that the tops of her masts were level
with his eye, when she bore up into the basin at the
base of the rock, and was laid with great skill
alongside its perpendicular face. Loud voices of
men mingled with fierce oaths and execrations, and
groans of wounded men rose tumultuously from
below.---
Ho, there! Gaspr! The rock, ho! shouted
a stern voice---Are you asleep?---bring the gun to
bear upon the hindermost boat, and discharge it.
Gaspr who had deserted his post for a moment,
to witness the chase, sprung to the platform and
swinging the piece round, levelled it,---then
rushing
into the cave, and passing directly under the
count, he seized a match---lighted it at the distant
lamp, and returning, applied the flaming rope to the
loaded piece.A deafening report followed, and the
nearest boat became at once a scene of confusion,
while shrieks and loud voices filled the air.
Bravely done, my good Gaspr! said a man
who, ascending the rigging of the schooner, and
stepping along the fore-top-sail-yard, sprung upon
the terrace.
The count, as the figure of the stranger was
relieved
against the sky, thought he had never seen
so commanding a person, so much muscular power
united with such grace and activity.
This must be Lafitte! he exclaimed, mentally.
The individual who attracted his attention turning
at the moment, the moon shone full upon his face,
displaying his fine aquiline features---his dark eye,
and brown cheek.
It is indeed he! That face and form can belong
to no other, said he mentally, drawing himself
farther
within the shadow of the rock, that he might
observe, unseen, the movements of the buccaneers.
The pirate had hardly ascended to the platform
before he was followed by a dozen of his crew, who,
with astonishing rapidity, mounted the rigging after
him, each man heavily armed, and many of them
wild and fierce-looking men---nearly as brown and
as naked as savages.
Ho, there below! shouted their leader. Bring
the guns to bear on those boats, and rake them as
they come up the passage.
The boats, one of which had evidently been
struck by the shot from the gun fired by Gaspr,
rapidly advanced, although the one injured by the
ball and which had taken the lead, was now
laboriously
pulling on last of all.
They had yet some distance to row directly in
range of the gun on the platform, and exposed to the
fire of the pirate's schooner, which was drawn up
before it, presenting with her broadside facing the
enemy, a formidable battery.
Let them come within pistol shot! exclaimed
the leader, then wait the word---Aim every piece at
the stern of each boat---Powder and balls here, for
this gun,---charge her briskly, men! and with double
shot---Ho, the Gertrude! he shouted, looking down
upon the deck of his vessel---think you have men
enough on board, Ricardo, to hold her---if too hard
pressed retreat and join us---they are sending
another boat from the brig---we shall have enough
to dobe cool and firm,remember all of you, we
fight at an advantage, and no man will forget he
fights for his head.
Fire, Carlos! he cried in a loud voice after
giving his orders, and disposing his men on different
parts of the platform, and around the gun. Sink
that nearest boat, and you shall command the
schooner.
Half a dozen flashes gleamed above the rock,
and the whole broadside of the schooner, which
commanded
the whole breadth of the channel, was
discharged
at once. As soon as a cloud of thick
smoke which rolled up before the platform was
b'own along the cliffthe pirate bent an eager eye
upon the boats, which, still to his astonishment,
approached uninjured, and with renewed velocity.
Holy devils! who aimed those guns, he
shouted
in a voice of thunder.By the God that made
you, men! you shall rue such boy's play. Away
from this gun!he shouted, sweeping a circle
around him with his cutlassas he sprung to the
gun, and with a single hand, wheeled it to the
verge and depressed it upon the leading boat. Then,
snatching a match from the hand of one of his men,
he applied it to the powder.
Ha! blessed St. Antonio, he exclaimed, as a
loud crash, and shouts, and yells, followed the
report;and the smoke drifting away, he saw a
score of men struggling in the water, and clinging
to the oars and fragments of their shattered boat.
Fire upon them, men, he shouted, makey our
pistols ring merrilyone more broadside, Ricardo,
and I forgive the last, he cried, with exultation in
his voice and manner. But the other boats were
too near for the large guns to bear upon them, as
emerging from the straits, they rapidly
approached
,
one on the quarter, and the other on the bows
of the schooner. Those belonging to the last boat
who were not shot in the head as they swam, were
either picked up by the other boats, or gained the
rocks on one side of the basin, or with uncooled
daring, reached the schooner just as the remaining
two boats struck her side.
With the courage of lions, the, till now, passive
men, leaped from their boats, and poured over the
vessel's side, in spite of the desperate struggles of the
buccaneers, to hurl them over into the water. In a
few seconds the deck of the schooner exhibited a
scene of fearful carnage. The pirates were
overpowered
by the superior numbers of their opponents,
and began to give way. Their chief who had his
hand upon a stay, and was about descending to
endeavour
,
to turn the tide of battle, witnessing the
unequal contest, paused and shouted to them to
mount, and leave the vessel to the enemy.All at
once the rigging was alive with the pirates, who
ascended, before their astonished foes, with often
practised activity, and threw themselves from the
yards upon the terrace.
Up men, follow them! cried the leader of the
party who had boarded the vesselnever let
American
tars be outdone by those cowardly Spanish
cut-throats! and he sprung into the rigging as he
spoke, rapidly followed by his band; and ascending,
with reckless daring, he gained the topmast
cross-trees
,
16*
crossed the yard, cutlass in hand, and sprung
upon the terrace into the midst of his foes, before
his real character was discovered.
Over with him! cried a dozen voices. Heave
him into the sea! and a host of cutlasses were
brandished about his head. But he was so rapidly
seconded by his men, who leaped from the yards
upon the rock as fast as they could follow one
another, that the pirates had not time to deal him
a fatal blow, before each one found himself in
mortal
combat with an American sailor.
Long and bloody was the fight. Living men
were hurled upon the deck of the vessel below with
terrific violence, or into the deep flood beneath.
Blood flowed like water, and the cries, groans, and
shouts of the combatants rose wildly in the air,
multiplied
into a thousand echoes among the cliffs. The
pirates numbered about fifty, and the force of the
Americans was nearly equal. The deck of the vessel
was deserted, save by a solitary figure crawling
about; and wounded and slain men were locked in
the deadly embrace in which they had fallen from
the cliff, and limbs and bones were strewed in great
numbers through the vessel. The fight raged
fiercely directly in front of the cavern, and the
pirates at last, hotly pressed, retreated to its mouth.
Here their leader, whose form the count had seen
like the genius that directed the battle, whenever the
fight raged hottest, whose voice of command and
encouragement was heard above the din of the
conflict
,
and whose arm carried death wherever it fell.
Many of his men had fallen around him, yet he
remained
cool and undaunted; and collecting his
followers
about him, he slowly retreated down the
terrace
to the entrance of the cave.
Press him hard---drive him to his den, my
hearties! shouted the officer who had first
ascended
the rigging, and who, through the whole conflict
had fought with that daring and unabated energy
for which American sailors are distinguished.
The terrace was strewed with the dead and dying;
and Lafitte, with half the original number of his
men, stood near the mouth of the cavern, fighting
hand to hand with the officer, who had sought him
out, like a tiger at bay.
The count had remained in his concealment a
witness of the fight, until the retreat of the pirates
towards the mouth of the cavern, just within which
he stood. As they filled the entrance, full of alarm
for Constanza, whom he had left in the grotto, he
suddenly sprung from the elevated station upon
which he stood during the fight, on to the floor of
the cave, and flew towards its interior. But the
noise he made alarmed the buccaneers, who turned
and gazed upon his retreating figure with
astonishment
.
We are surprised! shouted several voices, and
two or three of the pirates darted after him, and
before
he could pass round the angle in the passage,
near which the lamp was suspended, he was
compelled
to turn upon his pursuers and defend his life.
Two of the pirates assailed him at once, and he had
only his pike to parry the blows of their cutlasses,
when a thrust of his weapon through the sword arm
of one of them caused him to drop his cutlass, which,
with an exclamation of joy, the count seized, and
rained blows upon his unwounded antagonist, whom
he soon disabled. But before he could avail himself
of this advantage, he was assailed by others of the
band, who, on hearing the cry that they were taken
in the rear, left the mouth of the cave, and turned
their blades upon their new enemy.
The passage was narrow, scarcely admitting the
wielding of their weapons with full effect. At this
point the fight now became desperate. Driven into
the cave by their opponents, and finding their way
obstructed in the rear, the buccaneers fought like
fiends. Five of them fell beneath the cutlass of the
count, who, fearing the fatal consequences of their
entrance to Constanza's safety, and aware that his
own life also was at stake, and perhaps actuated by
a desire to second the attack of the American sailors,
fought with the power and effect of an armed
phalanx
in his single arm.
The American officer had fallen severely
wounded
before the vigorous attacks of the outlaw, and
leaving the less distinguished of his antagonists to
his men, the victor turned upon the daring stranger,
who, single-handed, stood defending the narrow
passage
.
Santo Diablo! whom have we here? Give back,
mengive back! he has sent enough of you to the
devil; and treading over the dead bodies of his
men, who had fallen by the hand of the desperate
Frenchman, he shouted, Let me cross blades
with this stranger, aiming, as he spoke, a blow at
the head of the officer, which was parried and
returned
with the skill of a master of the weapon.
For several seconds their rapidly clashing
weapons
rung against each other, flashing fiercely in
the light of the lamp suspended above their heads.
The count, weak from his former wounds, and
bleeding from fresh ones, soon began to show signs
of exhaustion. His opponent discovered this, and
changing his mode of fighting, used all his skill to
disarm him and take him prisoner.
Surrender, sirit is madness to contend against
such odds, cried the pirate. The only reply he
received was a stroke from the count's cutlass, which
nearly cleft the thick cap he wore through to his
head. Enraged, the pirate raised his weapon,
throwing all his muscular power into his arm for a
decisive blow, when a wild shriek rang through
the vault, and Constanza suddenly appeared before
them with a terrified eye, her luxuriant tresses
dishevelled and floating over her shoulders, and her
mantle disarranged in her struggles to break away
from her faithful attendant, who would have held
her.
The pirate started at the shriek and figure of the
maiden, indistinctly seen in the obscurity of the
cavern, and suddenly arrested his weapon, but too
late to withhold the blow, which descended with
half its original force upon the defenceless head of the
count. He staggered and fell into the arms of
Constanza
,
who, with an eye in which timidity had
given place to resolution, caught his head upon her
bosom, over which sprinkled the warm blood of her
lover, and erecting her figure to its full height, with
her disengaged arm, she drew a pistol from his belt,
and levelled it at the heart of the buccaneer. The
motion brought her brow under the full light of the
lamp, and he, with an exclamation of surprise, as
he recognized, in those full features, stamped with
heroic energy and woman's self-devotion, the fair
Castillian, for whom, but a few days before, he had
made magnanimous sacrifice of his love.
Doa Constanza! can it be! he cried, in
amazement. Then instantly changing his tone,
he laid his hand upon his heart, and said, with a
voice of emotion and humility, Fire, lady! thus
shall be expiated my crime!
The pistol dropped from her hand---Lafitte!
she exclaimed, after an instant's silent surprise,
during which doubt and confidence struggled within
her bosom. Oh, what have you done? This is
your bloody deed. Help, help, or he will die in my
arms! and tearing her mantilla, she attempted to
staunch the blood which flowed freely from a slight
cut in his head.
Forgive! forgive! lady! cried the chief,
springing
to her assistance. Leave this wounded
stranger
to me---those shouts tell me the enemy are
retreating
.
Go, seora, I will attend you; such a scene
as this is not for your presence. Leave him to my
care---I see you feel an interest in him!---that is
enough for me-- he shall be cared for as if he were
a brother. Nay, nay, he added, suddenly
changing
countenance; as if he were Constanza
Velasquez
,
and he spoke the last words tenderly.
She resigned him to his arms, and cried earnestly,
Bear him into the inner cave. The light, Juana!
and with eager footsteps she preceded the outlaw,
who bore the wounded officer in his arms.
Entering
the cave originally occupied by the count, and
directing him to be laid on the bamboo rushes in the
niche, she kneeled beside him, and forgetful of the
presence of the chief, seemed wholly absorbed in her
wounded lover.
By the activity of Juana, the presence of mind
and experience of the outlaw, and the angelic
tenderness
of the maiden---all those attentions which
his state required, were completed, and the count,
who had not been wholly unconscious, although he
betrayed his sense of consciousness only by an
occasional
writhing of his features, fell into a broken
sleep. From the moment she kneeled by his couch,
she had remained silent; but when the eyes of her
lover were closed, she looked up into the face of
Lafitte, who, after his services were no longer
required
,
stood, with folded arms and a thoughtful
brow, gazing in silence upon the scene.
Seor Lafitte! said the lady, did you know
of his capture?
No, lady, nor your own! I am surrounded
with mystery. Why do I find you here? Why
this interest in this wounded man? he suddenly
exclaimed, striking his forehead,ah! can it be!
it is?
The Count D'Oyley of the French navy, Seor,
to whom I am betrothed, she said, with feeling
and dignity.
The face of the pirate changed, and a slight flush
passed across his brow. But this momentary
exhibition of feeling gave place to an expression
of interest.
Lady! he said, with a slight embarassment
in his manner, this officer shall be cared for. I
regard him as a sacred trust!moreover, he is
free from this moment! Tell me, lady, how you
came to be once more a captivevoluntarily to
share a prison with him? Resolve this mystery,
which I cannot fathom.
In a few words she related to him the incidents
of her re-capture, and her conveyance to the
cavern
the
expedition of her loverhis capturetheir
meeting in the cavernand their attempt to
escape, just as his vessel was chased in by the
American cruiser.
Would to God, lady, you had both escaped,
before
I had again met you! But, adieu! Seora, I
must leave you for the present, he exclaimed, as
the report of the gun at the mouth of the cavern
reverberated through the long passages of the
grotto. Where is Thodore, lady? I will send
him to you.
I know not, Seor, but perhaps he is near.
He was sleeping in the outer apartment, by the
door, when I left it. I thank you, Seor, she
added, struck with the outlaw's delicacy, in
proposing
Thodore to watch over the countJuana
will call himhappy youth!he has slept
amid all this storm of death!
A loud shout without, now called Lafitte away,
after assuring her that she should be sacred from
intrusion, and Constanza was left alone by the
couch of her lover. Clasping her hands, she raised
her full eyes to heaven, and remained several
minutes: the pale lamp painting, with light and
shade, her lovely face, lost in devotion. Thy
will, not mine, be done, she said aloud, with a
voice of resignation, as she rose from her devotional
attitude, and with a more cheerful brow and lighter
heart, she turned and addressed her young
attendant
,
who, with surprise pictured upon his
countenance
,
was listening to the strange recital of the
events of the night, which Juana, with
characteristic
volubility was detailing to him.
Shame upon my drowsy eyes, said Thodore,
with evident mortification in his manner,You
find me but a poor knight, lady. But who is this
pale stranger? he exclaimed, inquiringly, as his
eye fell upon the handsome features of the wounded
count.
He is an officer of the French navy, the count
D'Oyley. Thodore, you have heard me speak of
him, she added, with a faint and sweet smile, he
is severely wounded; I fear I need your aid to
nurse him.
The youth expressed his devotion to her slightest
wish, and, placing himself near the sleeper, passed
the succeeding hour in listening to the thrilling tale,
told by the maiden, with an absorbing interest, that
swallowed all time but the present moment.
CHAPTER XI.
When, from sentiments of honour, and desire to act justly towards
those over whom he may possess temporary power, a man renounces
the cherished idols of his bosom, preferring their happiness, with the
certain forfeiture of his own, he has achieved the greatest victory of
which he is capable.A victory over himself.
Sherwood
.
A COLLOQUIAL SCENEINTERIOR OF A BUCCANEER'S RENDEZVOUS
SOLILOQUY, OR STRUGGLE BETWEEN HONOUR AND PASSIONSAN
INTERRUPTION.
The
morning broke upon the watches, and
found them still by the bedside of the wounded
officer. His wound had been rather a severe
contusion
,
with the side of the pirate's cutlass, than a
deep cut.
After passing the remainder of the night in
feverish slumber, he awoke, as the hand of the
maiden was gently parting the hair from his
brow.
Is it you, sweet one? he said, with a faint
smile---the whole scene of the preceding night
coming
,
at once, to his recollection! Have you been
watching by me through the long hours of the
night! How kind, Constanza! But speak! he
added, suddenly rising, tell me---where is my
antagonist
,
the buccaneer, who wounded me? Did I
not see you near me, when I fell? I have a
half-consciousness
of being caught by you. Devoted
VOL. I.---17
Constanza! was it not so? and was I not borne,
by some one, back to this cave? Who was it?
was he wounded? or' looking with anxious
affection
into her face, you, my dearest! were you
hurt? he continued, with feverish rapidity, as
the various scenes he had passed through, came,
indistinctly, and unconnected, to his mind.
Nay, nay, dear Alphonse! I cannot reply to
all your rapid questions. You must not rise so
soonbe quiet. There is no danger to you,
or me!
But I am better, dearest! he said, playing
with a truant tress, which hung over her temples.
I am better! my sleep has been refreshing.
But your wound?
It is but slight, although it must have been
given with a good-will at the time; a little patch
will make all sound as ever. But, my sweet
Constanza
,
do not be alarmed! Who was the pirate
that fought so fiercely? Ah! he suddenly
exclaimed
,
as his eye rested upon the slight form of
young Thodore, who stood within the niche
whom have we here?
The youth, Thodore, of whom I spoke, she
replied.
Ah! I remember! Monsieur Thodore, pardon
me, young sir! I owe you better courtesy! You
have loaded me with a debt of gratitude.
Speak of that at another time, Monsieur, your
health requires silence and repose, replied the youth,
remarking the mixture of indecision and energy
in his manner and language, which he attributed
to the fever of his wound.
Not so, my good youth. I must thank you
now. Yet, I know not how! You are a sailor,
he continued, after a moment's thought; will you
take a midshipman's berth on board the Sultan?'
I thank you, but I need no reward for
performing
my duty, if I have deserved any. I have
sufficiently
received it, by knowing that I have been
instrumental in adding to this kind lady's
happiness
.
A kind word from her lips is more than I dare
hope to ask! he added, with a blushing brow.
You are modest, for a protg of Lafitte, fair
youth, he replied, smilingly, but this lady will not
only give you words of kindness, I think, but her
white hand to kiss! will you not, Constanza? and
this, as you hint, were honour enough, for belted
knight in days of Charlemagne.
Constanza, with a sweet smile, presented her
hand to the youth, who, bending over it with an
air of devout respect, pressed his lips lightly to the
taper fingers.
At this instant a foot-fall was heard, echoing
through the chamber Constanza had occupied, and
she had hardly said
It is Lafitte, when the outlaw appeared at the
breach in the stalactic drapery of the cave, and
before
passing into the apartment, gazed silently for
a few seconds upon the group.
When Lafitte left the lovers, after the count had
fallen asleep, he traversed the long passage with a
rapid tread and an aching heart. He found the
terrace strewed with dead and dying; several of
his men leaning with an air of fatigue against the
sides of the cliff, or upon the cannon, which had
just been fired at the retreating Americans, who,
driven over the verge, sprung into the water, or slid
down the stays to the deck, with the loss of more
than half their number, besides two wounded
officers, one of whom they bore from the deck into
the boat, severely hurt. Then with rapidity they
pulled rapidly down the passage to their vessel.
Ho, Carlos! below there! he shouted.
Carlos es muerte! said faintly a wounded
pirate
,
who rested on his cutlass.
Ha! dead! Ho, the deck therefire upon that
boat! Do you mean to let them man the brig again
and blockade us?---Fire!
No es possible, seor, cried one from the
schooner
.
Los Americans have spike all de gun.
Spiked the guns! Maldicho! how was that
done, Mato?
No se, seor! no es possible to tell. I hear de
click, click, five six time, when one sailor run over
de gun to de boat; and when I put de prime ob de
horn in de hole, dere was no hole dere, all fill up
with big rusty nail.
Spiked, ha! well, let them gothey will be
glad enough to get out of this and show the old
rock the stern of their brig, said he, quietly.
After Lafitte, with much humanity, had
attended
to the wounded, and given orders for the
disposal
of the dead, who numbered seventeen of the
Americans, and more than twenty of the buccaneers,
he placed the watch for the remainder of the night,
and then, last of all, attended to his own wounds,
which, though not severe, were numerous. He
entered
the cavern, and passing the spot which the
count had defended, and from which the bodies
had been removed, he traversed the passage for a
few yards, and then turned into one of those
recesses
which the fugitives had supported;niches,
which opened before him as he advanced,
increasing
in height and breadth. Although perfectly
dark, he traversed this new avenue with an
unfaltering
footstep, and like one familiar with its
details
.
About seventy paces from the main passage, he
came into a small vaulted apartment, lighted
fitfully
by the flickering flame of an expiring fire,
which had been kindled near the centre against a
fragment of rock which had fallen from the side of
the grotto, and rolled into the middle of the floor.
Several chests, such as seamen use to contain their
apparel, rude camp stools, a round polished table,
with a marble top, piles of cordage, rolls of canvass,
and heaps of old sails, with many other articles
necessary to the repair and preservation of vessels,
filled the sides of the apartment.
On a projecting shelf, at the extremity of the
cave, stood a costly pier-glass, the height of a man,
with radii diverging from a point near the centre,
as if a bullet had shattered it. One of the chests,
the lid of which was up, displayed a number of
cutlasses
and pistols, and a pyramid of shot, adapted
to the calibre of the piece of ordnance at the mouth
of the cave, was piled at one end of it, and laid
against the wall, tied up like faggots, were several
bundles of pikes. In a distant niche, placed one
upon another, were several kegs, half seen
indistinctly
in the obscurity, covered by a tarpaulin,
which had been hastily displaced, and branded
poudre  canon.
A long table, of that construction best adapted to
a ship's cabin, extended nearly across the cave,
about half way between the fire and the sides,
which were perfectly smooth and black, and no
where incrusted with stalactite.
An upturned bench lay near, and parallel with
the table, upon which stood, in bacchanalian
confusion
,
bottles of French wines, glasses, deep plates,
and tureens, with vessels for preparing coffee. It
was without a cloth, wet with spilled wine, and
strewed with fish bones, and fragments of bread
and meat.
Mattresses lay about the floor, and one or two
hammocks were swung across from side to side.
at the left hand of the shattered mirror was a
recess
,
terminating in a heavy door, apparently
constructed
17*
of the plank of a ship, as circular apertures
once filled with spikes, and the traces of other
adaptation
of the material than the present, sufficiently
indicated.
This part of the grotto was evidently appropriated
by the buccaneers as the armory, store-room, and
hall of feasting and carousing.
It was silent and deserted as the outlaw entered,
except by the ungainly figure of his slave, Cudjoe,
who lay with his naked feet to the fire, his head
closely wrapped in a soiled blanket, fast asleep,
preferring
the embraces of Somnus to those of Mars,
from which he had escaped at the commencement
of the conflict.
Lafitte gazed upon the scene around him with a
bitter smile.
And this, he said, with a cloudy brow, after
standing a while in silence, this is my abode! the
outlaw's home!this my domestic hearththis my
social boardfor the plaudits of such as I
command
for
the boast of a beast like this slave! Is
it for this I live! alas, I have lived in vain! all, all
in vain! and he paced the cave with an agitated
step, while hatred for his present life, aspirations for
an honourable career, and love for the Castillian
maiden, filled his mind with conflicting emotions.
She is in my power once more, he hoarsely
whispered; have I not made sufficient sacrifice in
letting her once depart! Is my passion again to be
immolated upon the altar of self-denial! Yet I may
not use the power I possess. I love herand only
to honourable love shall she be sued! But will she
listen!Listen!am I madlisten with her hand
upon the brow, and kneeling beside the couch of
her betrothed husband! Success is now doubly
walled up against me. But if he die!ah, if he
die!as he mayas he must! he added with a
ringing voice, and starting at the guilty thoughts
which stirred his bosom; but suddenly checking
himself, he continued, in a lower toneNo, no,
no!I am sick of crime!back, back, tempterI
will win her fairly. Am I indeed so base as to wish
this maiden illto think of destroying so much
happiness, when I can make it bliss! If he should
not livethen! then, perhaps!but nooh, God,
no!--have I not stricken the blow--and will she
place her hand in his, red with her lover's blood?
Will she give her heart to be healed by him who
broke it? But time, perhaps, might mitigate and
veil over the bitter memory of the past---and then,
and his step became more elastic, and his brow
clear as he spoke, but as suddenly changed again.
Alas! there is no hope for me!---she nevernever
can love me!----her spirit is too pure to mingle with
mine. It is in vain for me to hope---yet I must
love her---love her---for ever! But I will school
myself
to think of her without passion---worship her as
a lovely incarnation of the Virgin!
For an hour he paced the grotto, struggling with
his passion, which, one moment gaining the
ascendancy
,
filled his mind with dark and guilty purposes;
but immediately yielding to the dictates of honour,
and the native generosity of his character, he would
picture forth scenes of happiness for her and her
lover in the vista of the future. His step was
irregular, his features worked convulsively, his brow
was bent with the violence of the struggle.
I will---I will! he at length said, suddenly
stopping. She shall respect---if she cannot love
me---only with gratitude shall she remember
Lafitte
!
They shall both be free, and this very day
will I myself take them to Port-au-Prince. If I
cannot make my own happiness, I will not mar
theirs---nay, I will make it---I will teach my
passion
this step; and his voice became calmer as
he spoke. As I now feel, he continued, I think
I could place her hand within his, and bid Heaven
bless them. Yes, then I could seek an early death
on the battle-field, or in the seclusion of a
monastery
atone for my past life by penance and prayer.
Penance and prayer! he repeated, with an altered
voice, while a disdainful expression dwelt upon his
lip, as though he had given utterance to thoughts
of which he became at once ashamed. Yes---
beads and rosaries! genuflexions and ablutions,
fasts and confessions! cowl and gown! truly these
would well become me! Yet, for all that, it may yet
be to what my coward heart will drive me.
Nevertheless
,
this lady shall go free, whatever shall be my
future fate.
He then threw himself upon one of the rude
couches, and bringing the butt of his pistols round
to the ready grasp of his hand, he sought in the
oblivion of sleep, to forget himself.
Sleep! blessing both of the innocent and guilty!
With thy presence thou visitest like the rain, both
the just and the unjust. Angel of charity,
messenger
from on high, sent down to shorten half the
weary pilgrimage of life! Sister of mercy---the
curse of Eden would have been unmingled without
thee. Thou hast shared with us the heavy load,
and cooled the sweating brow, and for us borne half
the burden and heat of the long day of existence!
He awoke at dawn refreshed, and with a calmer
breast. Low voices struck his ear, from beyond the
door within the recess. He listened a moment in
surprise, and then rising quickly he unlocked the
door, and entered the apartment once occupied by
Constanza.
The canopy and other preparations made by the
order and attention of Thodore for her comfort,
caught his eyefor all parts of the cave was now
visible by the daylight, let in from the crevices and
apertures in the roof His rapid glance also
detected
the breach made by the count, and he at once
understood the object of it; and as he was
advancing
to examine it, the voices of the party in the
adjoining chamber became distinct.
Ha! my captive lover is better it seems, he
exclaimed as the words struck his ear. But, he
has made a soldier's breach through this wall.
Constanza then was placed here by that prosy fool
Sebastiano; and thick-skulled, Dutch
Getzendanner
must place his prisoner within ear-shot. It is
said there is no separating true lovers, and here is
most visible proof of it. What have we here,
Cielos
!
the maiden's sparkling crucifix, dropped in her
flight, he suddenly added, eagerly seizing the
jewel which caught his eye; This next my
heart forever! he fervently exclaimed, pressing
it to his lipsthis shall be twice worshippedI
devote it to heaven, and love, and he hung it
around his neck by its chain, concealing the cross
in his bosom.
Protg of Lafitte! he repeated with bitter
emphasis, as he overheard the words of D'Oyley.
Monsieur Le Compte thinks there can come
nothing
good out of Nazareth! Ha! how cavalierly
he gives away the lady's hand to the boy's lippity
that so fair a scene should be interrupted.
Seora, buenos dias tenga vm. Monsieur Compte,
I trust you are much better. Thodore, welcome
back again! and as he entered the chamber, he
grasped the hand of the boy with a smile of
pleasure
bowed
coldly to the count, who was sitting
on his couch of bamboo-rushes in the niche, and
with an air of profound respect, bent low to the
maiden.
Pardon this intrusion, Seora, I knew not of
this passage between the rooms, it being made since
my last visit to our rendezvous, probably for greater
facilities of intercourse, and he smiled meaningly,
and hearing voices, I came to learn from whence
they proceeded.
Monsieur, he continued I am happy to see
you so far recovered from your wounds. You are
at liberty to depart, when you are well enough to be
removed.
I thank you, Monsieur Lafitte, replied the count,
courteously, My wound was but trifling. I am
able to move; but, monsieur, permit me to say, how
profoundly I feel your kindness extended to this
lady!
Enough, count, I followed my own feelings. It
is not for you to thank me,said he sternly
speak of your departure.
If I am at liberty, as you say, I would leave at
once. Have you any news of my schooner? you
have I presume heard the particulars of my
capture
?
Yes, Monsieur, in a few words from Gaspr---
of your vessel, I have not heard. I will take you
to Port au Prince, in my schooner as soon as she
undergoes some repairs. She will be ready by the
morning.
Thank you, Monsieur; and this lady?
Shall accompany you, sir! he replied in a deep
voice, that drew the eye of the count upon his face,
which reflected the agitation of his mind,
produced
by the question, and the associations which it
called up.
Sacre! exclaimed the count, suspicious of the
cause of Lafitte's emotion, suddenly flashing across
his mind.
Are you in pain, Alphonse? inquired
Constanza
,
with a changing cheek, as she remarked
his exciting manner.
No! yes! great! and he laid his hand upon
his breast.
Lafitte smiled scornfully, and he glanced at the
officer with an expression of dislike. After a few
moments, vexed at the silence of Constanza, who
had not raised her eyes from her lover's face, since
he entered, he left the cave accompanied by
Theodore
,
whom he took with him, to ascertain more
particularly than he had learned from Gaspr,
the details of their capture, and the events
succeeding
it.
While the pirate chief neglected nothing that
could contribute to the comfort of Constanza, and
the count, he refrained from visiting them during
the day, resolved to have no farther communication
with the lovely Castillian, lest his resoluton should
forsake himand under the influence of passion,
increased by the presence of the maiden, he should
throw off all his honourable resolves for her
happiness---the
consequences of which he dare not
contemplate
.
The struggle in hiw own mind was prolonged,
and severe. At one moment he was ready to rush
into her presence, throw himself at her feet, and
plead his deep, unconquerable loveat another
moment he would feed upon the reflection, that she
was in his power, and he resolved that he would
not let her go. Again the wild idea of
challenging
the count to single combat, or the more guilty
one of exposing him in his wounded state to die,
would by turns fire his bosom. The
exclamation
of the count, which he had attributed to sudden
pain, repeatedly occurred to him, and he curled his
lip contemptuously as he said mentally,
He is jealous of me. The proud Frenchman
fears Lafitte may take a fancy to have so fair a
prot
ge;
hatred for him could almost tempt me to
detain
this lovely flower, did I not love her so well as I
too truly dodid I not know that her happiness,
which alone I seek, is bound up in him. Dios! he
has a noble presence, and is a man a lady might
well loveyet I love her too well for this, he
added with feeling. The jealous count should
rather thank my love for the lady's safety, than
show his jealousy. If I loved her not, as I never
loved womanHa, a footstep! Who goes there?
It is but fancy, or but a bat, he said as a slight
noise, which he thought a footstep, at the extremity
of the passage struck his ear. But alas, he
continued
GertrudeI
have loved thee, thou art not
forgotten. Well he shall have herhe hastily
added, and God help me, he shall have her from my
hand---and I will have the approval of my
conscience
,
for at least one disinterested act.
To-morrow
they go! and as he spoke he swung himself
from the terrace on to the rigging of his vessel, and
descending to the deck, forwarded by his presence,
the repairs and preparations for sailing early on the
morning of the coming day.
CHAPTER XII.
The same kind, though not degree, of genius is as necessary to
plan and direct the escape of an individual, from a perilous situation,
as of an army.
Lamb
.
Wine and wassail have taken more strong places than gun or
steel.
Chesterfield
.
PLAN OF ESCAPEJUANA AND THE GUARDSA STRATAGEM.
The
stars burned like lamps in the clear, Indian
skies. The air was motionless, and broken only by
some alarmed bird fluttering chirpingly from tree to
tree, or the suppressed moan of the surge---profound
silence reigned without and within the deep
chambers
of the grotto.
The guard, posted rather to give the alarm when
vessels approached the shore, than to guard the
prisoners
,
paced slowly along the terrace in front of the
cavern, with his cutlass resting carelessly upon his
left arm. The deck of the schooner below him was
covered with sleepers, who, after the fatigues of the
day, had thrown themselves upon it, in various
positions
.
The remainder of the outlaw's crew were
sleeping in the magazine of the cave, where Lafitte
had passed the preceding night.
The outlaw himself, after promenading the
passage
in which we left him, a long time in troubled
thought, threw himself upon the cold pavement,
and also slept; but his dreams were of his lovely
captive.
He was kneeling before an altar in a gloomy and
VOL. I.18
gorgeous temple, beside a veiled female. A priest,
in rich robes, was in the act of pronouncing a
blessing
over them. He was about to press her to his
heart, when she suddenly changed to the bleeding
corse of his young brother. He cried with horror
and awoke.
Again he dreamed Constanza was struggling in
the sea. He sprang into the flood to save her, when
a gigantic monster, with large, beautiful eyes---a
knife buried in his bosom, and blood oozing from
his temples, caught her from his grasp, and
conveyed
her from his sight, into the depths of the
ocean. With a convulsed frame, he started from
his dream.
A third time he slept. He was in the cathedral
of New Orleans, and about to be united to
Constanza
,
who stood beside him, veiled in white.
She was just parting her lips to pronounce the
solemn words which should unite their destinies
forever, when the priest removed his mask, cast off
his robes, and clasped her in his arms. It was the
Count D'Oyley.
In the mean time, the count was in the
chamber, lighted by a single lamp, where he had
been borne the preceding night; but he slept not.
Constanza, with her head resting upon his shoulder,
slumbered peacefully, and her dreams were all of
happiness.
Constanza, my love! awake! said her lover,
gently touching her closed eyes.
He had long been engaged in ruminating upon
his condition, upon the character of Lafitte, and
the probability that he would be in the same mind
in the morning, with regard to their liberation.
The more he reflected, the greater his doubts
became, and when he recalled, with a feeling of
apprehension and indignation, the language, tone,
and manner, of the outlaw, in his interview with
him in the morning, the detached sentences he had
overheard when his footsteps interrupted his
soliloquy
,
his confidence in his promises failed, and he
at once resolved to make his escape before day;
fearing even to remain through the night, subject
to the caprice of his captor.
Awake, love! he said, softly, as he came to
this determination.
What, Alphonse, is it you? Are there more
trials for me? and she looked up into his
face, with her eloquent eyes, suddenly suffused with
tears, and clinging to his arm, with nervous
apprehension
.
No, my ConstanzaI think we may escape
from this placeI dare not trust Captain Lafitte's
firmness till the morning.
Oh, have you fresh cause for alarm or
suspicion
?
Tell me! Leave me not in suspense;
and she looked with an alarmed manner into his
face.
No, love! but I fear he may change his mind,
he is an impulsive being, and if we can escape, it
will not be prudent to remain till morning.
You have heard something, dear Alphonse!
I know you have, that leads you to this sudden
step, and you are still so weakoh, tell me all!
she added, earnestlyam I not worthy of your
confidence.
All, all confidence, dearest!Your suspicions
are true! Not long since, when I walked along
the passage to breathe the cooler air, at the mouth
of the cave, I heard the voice of Lafitte, as you tell
me is his habit, in soliloquy. Thinking I might
learn something which in our situation, could be
improved to advantage, I cautiously approached
the gallery, along which he was pacing backwards
and forwards, and heard sufficient to alarm me for
your safety and my own, and to lead me to place
but slight confidence in his promise, to take us to
Port-au-Prince to-morrow, will you not second me,
dearest?
Can we escape, Alphonse? and why should
we fear to trust Lafitte? He is impulsive, it is
true, but would not, I think, err intentionally, or
deceive us. But I will go with you, dearest! never
will I be separated from you again! Whom do I
love or have to love or care for me, but you, my
Alphonse! Oh, let us go:he may, indeed, be in
another mood in the morning, she added, hastily,
as some part of his first interview with her flashed
on her mind, Oh, I fearfear him much. I will
go with you, let us hastenbut how?
There was a felucca at the foot of the rock,
which I saw, as I was brought in, a prisoner,
containing
a small mast. It was lying opposite the
long passage. If we can gain this boat,
unperceived
,
in an hour we will be beyond pursuit, and,
with a light breeze, by to-morrow evening, be able
to reach Port-au-Prince Now let us arrange our
plan.
Shall I waken Juana?
You would best, she may assist us materially.
The slave, who was asleep in the extremity of
the chamber, was roused, with difficulty, from her
heavy and dreamless sleep, by the count, who was
now excited and cheerful, with the prospect of being
soon far from the presence and power of one whom
he suspected to be his rival, and from whom,
consequently
,
he had every thing to fear. Besides his
desire for personal liberty, he experienced the
intensest
anxiety for the safety and happiness of
Constanza, whose health and mind, already
affected
by what she had passed through, he feared
would be materially injured, if she should be again
exposed to exciting scenes, or, in the morning, meet
with disappointment.
He was, therefore, desirous of removing her, at
once, to a place of security and quietude.
The old slave was informed of their project, to
which she listened with attention and pleasure.
Old Juana tink, massa Doly better wait till
morning come, 'caus if massa Lafitte sa' he let lily
lady and buckra gemman go free---dey sure go---
as Juana 'tan herebut den, if de lily Missy 'fraid
Juana jess go 'long wid her.
Thank you, Juana, said Constanza, we
find, that if escape is possible, we had best leave the
cave to-night. In the morning, perhaps, the crew
of the vessel might, as they often do, oppose his
his commands, and we should then be lost.
Juan' know dat, well 'nough!How tink you
get out, massa Doly?---de guard 'tan at de mouf.---
de schooner down in de basin, full of men---Its
mighty diffikil to get way---Massa Doly, she said,
shaking her head, impressively.
Speak low, Juana, said the count. Listen!
we have thought of this plan. You have a
husband
on the schooner, I am told. Pass the guard,
and say you wish to take some articles of clothing
to him---he will permit it---this carpet, and these
provisions, to place in the boat, shall pass as the
clothing---descend to the vessel---let the watch on
deck see you---speak to him, but do not go below---
take your opportunity, and drop the articles into the
felucca, or the schooner's boat, if you find it
alongside---again
speak to the watch, and ply him with
this spirit which I give you, tell him you wish to
return for something, and that master Thodore
may come back with you. Leave the impression,
that is, make him believe, that you will soon be
there, with Thodore. Tell the guard the same,
and do not forget to ply the bottle freely. Then, if
you can find a cap and cloak, belonging to
Theodore
,
bring it with you here, and I will then tell you
18*
further our plans. Do you understand what I have
said?
Is, massa Doly, ol' Juana no fool! She know
jiss how to do. Leave Juana to herself.
Taking the flask of spirits, which had been left
by the side of the invalid, and muttering, Juana
no de root put in dis, if massa Doly want make
sleep come, the old African disappeared in the
darkness of the passage. In a few moments her
footsteps died away, and the lovers, in silence and
expectation, awaited her return.
Half-way through the cave she turned into a
niche, in which were many cooking utensils, and,
taking a bundle of dry leaves and roots, from an
aperture, she dropped a portion in the flask, and
pursued her way to the mouth of the grotto.
Who is there? said the guard, as the dark
form of the old slave emerged from the gloom of the
cavern.
What for you speak so loud and cross, Gil?
nobody but ol' niggerdon't be frighten.
Diablo!Juana, you are ugly enough to
frighten
the devilhe replied with a loud laugh, what
are you crawling about for this time of night?
I want to see my ol' husbandan' car' dese
tings to himYou know Gil--I've been among
wid dis purty lilly lady, dis more dan week.
Ah, ha, the Castillian, said Gil with a smile,
she is pretty, Juanayou two together must very
well personate light and darkness. But where is
the lady that our wise captain loves so well as to
give his own share of booty for her ransom?--
Sancta Maria! but he must have taken a vow of
chastity.
You mity quisitive Gil--such as you no more
shouldnt open your two ugly eye, to look at such a
lady---dan notin' at all.
Ho now Juana---you jealous,---he replied
tapping
her on the cheek---But what have you in
that flaskthe pure Jamaica or purer Santa Crux
this goes to old blubber lip, the steward, I will
wager, I must take a sip to see if it is not too hot
for the old boy's stomach. You must be tender of
your better half in his old age, Juana.Hapeh!
peh! but this is made of the true grape. Hold, good
Juana! don't be in haste. Let old Crisp sleep, he
would rather rest his venerable limbs now, than
smack his lips over the best quart of aquardiente he
ever stole from the captain's cask
Dere Gil, you hab drink 'noughshe cried
interrupting him and seizing the flask now jess
hol' dis tight, she said walking out on a broad
plank extending from the terrace to the cross trees
of the schooner.
Assisted by Gil the old woman carefully
descended
the shrouds to the deck, which was strewn
with the wearied and sleeping crew.
The watch drowsily leaned against the binnacle
with a half-smoked and fireless segar in his lips; but
as she approached him, he started when he
discovered
her by the light of a lantern, which hung in
the companion-way.
Juana, my beauty, are you picking the men's
pockets of their spare reals?come here and let me
talk with you!
Diego, how you doit long time I seen you
how is my Crisp?
Why, just like yourself, Juana; he grows
handsomer as they call the change in Congo, that
is, blacker every day.
Well I'm glad to know datI'se come aboard
to see himHow long you been on watch, Diego?
It is four bells since, and now you've come it's
five, my beautiful girl,he replied, with
mock-gallantry
.
Now jess stop wid dat nonsense, Diego; you're
always flattering meI'se got ol' and wrinkly
now.---
Yet you've broken many a black lover's heart in
your day---when you lived in Louisiana; is it not so,
bel' Juana?
I can't stop talk now---Diego,---said she
complacently
,
have you been two hours on watch?
and no drink, noffin all time I dare say.
You say most truly and sadly, good Juana, he
replied, Since Mato got drunk on watch, and let
a barge full of men come aboard of us, there's no
more drinking.
Juana know dat, Diego, well 'nough, and she
just bring some---fin to keep the dew from soaking
de heart. I don't forget when you nurse my Crisp,
when he got he head broke.---Dere, Diego---take
two, tree swallow, and gib it back to me.
Miraculo; my queen of clubs, he replied,
gaily
,
but you are a goddess! well this is
good---madre
de dios! where got you such double distilled
nectar? but never mind where it come from so that
we know where it goes to, he added, placing the
mouth of the flask to his own, and quaffing most
generous draughts. Bah, but you are a jewel,
Juana. What's that you cast in the boat? he
added suddenly, and looking over the side.
Only two, tree tings belong to Crisp. I don't
like go below, and sturb dem sleep, dere, you tell
him in de mornin', his close dere in de boat. Is
massa Thodore 'board?
No, it is his next watch toohe'll not be down
in time, I fear.
Neber you fear, Diego, I'll bring him 'long. I'm
comin down by and by to bring Crisp he jacket,
an I'll wake him, and he'll come wid me. Just gib
me one of his cap and him watch coat. Diego
readily
brought them, and said,
Well, Juana, you are a nice girl,---stay, let me
take another sip at that flask. I would kiss you,
Juana, for this, he added, taking the flask from his
lips with a sigh; but the spirit on my breath might
give offence. I never kiss, fair Juana, after taking
wine, without first smoking the flavour off with
genuine Habana.
Good bye, Diego, I must go; you al'ays mity
'ticular gemman, she replied, turning to go.
Adios, Juana, my jetty angel! such spiritual
visits as your's are always welcome to Diego.
The old slave, satisfied that she had given him
enough to intoxicate him, after carefully threading
her way through the sleeping crew, slowly ascended
the shrouds; while Diego, already excited by his
frequent and potent draughts at the mouth of the
flask, began to sing a Spanish bacchanalian song,
parodied from Moreto, by some Castillian Lyceus,
commencing---
Hombres, vino, me mata
Vino es mi muerta y mi vida
Yo, de beber vino, vivo
Y muero, por beber vino.
La ra la, la ra la, la.
Gil, you gone sleep! fy, Gil! guard go sleep on
pos', said she, stepping on to the terrace,
approaching
and shaking him, as he leaned against the face
of the rock.
Dimonios! what, old black witch? he
grumbled
,
ill-humouredly; gigive me my aqa
aquardiente---to, diablo! but it is good, he continued,
as he took another draught.
You hab 'nuff; you drunk now, Gil? she said
inquiringly, wishing to ascertain how far her
stratagem
had taken effect.
Give me more, yo---you hag---mor---more, or I'll
bl---blow (hiccough) you in t-t-the (hiccough) s-sea---
hic, do---hic---do you hear---hugh! and he drew a
pistol from his belt, and the expression of his face
became ferocious.
Dere, take little sip more, Gil---dere, 'nuff, now;
and she snatched the bottle from him, at the same
time dexterously spilling a part of its contents over
the priming of both pistols.
Curse you, Sathan's dam! he quickly
exclaimed
;
is that the way you use good liq---liquor.
Then, after a pause, he added, incoherently, how
thick the sta---stars are, and what other schoon---
schooner's lying side the Gertrude---miraculo! Ju---
Juana---you are de---d---double---(hiccough)---gi---
gi---give me one of them flasks in your ha---hand,
and the intoxicated guard, no longer able to
articulate
distinctly, or support himself against the wall,
slipped gradually from his upright position, and lay
upon his side with his cheek resting upon the cold
stone.
Satisfied with the manner in which she had
obeyed
her instructions, the slave hastened into the
grotto, where the count and Constanza were
waiting
her return with apprehension and anxiety.
END OF VOL. I.